1000
611,e fruit of the vineyard: but the husbandmen beat him, and sent him away empty. 
And again he sent another servant: and they beat him also, and entreated him shamefully, and sent him away empty. 
And again he sent a third: and they wounded him also, and cast him out. 
Then said the lord of the vineyard, What shall I do? I will send my beloved son: it may be they will reverence him when they see him. 
But when the husbandmen saw him, they reasoned among themselves, saying, This is the heir: come, let us kill him, that the inheritance may be ours. 
So they cast him out of the vineyard, and killed him. What 
592,ORD. 
One law and one manner shall be for you, and for the stranger that sojourneth with you. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, When ye come into the land whither I bring you, 
Then it shall be, that, when ye eat of the bread of the land, ye shall offer up an heave offering unto the LORD. 
Ye shall offer up a cake of the first of your dough for an heave offering: as ye do the heave offering of the threshingfloor, so shall ye heave it. 
Of the first of your dough ye shall give unto the LORD an heave offering in your generation
554,s found written, that Mordecai had told of Bigthana and Teresh, two of the king's chamberlains, the keepers of the door, who sought to lay hand on the king Ahasuerus. 
And the king said, What honour and dignity hath been done to Mordecai for this? Then said the king's servants that ministered unto him, There is nothing done for him. 
And the king said, Who is in the court? Now Haman was come into the outward court of the king's house, to speak unto the king to hang Mordecai on the gallows that he had prepared for him. 
And the king's servants said 
633,And Saul said unto his uncle, He told us plainly that the asses were found. But of the matter of the kingdom, whereof Samuel spake, he told him not. 
And Samuel called the people together unto the LORD to Mizpeh; 
And said unto the children of Israel, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, I brought up Israel out of Egypt, and delivered you out of the hand of the Egyptians, and out of the hand of all kingdoms, and of them that oppressed you: 
And ye have this day rejected your God, who himself saved you out of all your adversities and your tribulations; and ye have said unto him, Nay, but set a king over us. Now therefore present
610, from whence came they unto thee? And Hezekiah said, They are come from a far country unto me, even from Babylon. 
Then said he, What have they seen in thine house? And Hezekiah answered, All that is in mine house have they seen: there is nothing among my treasures that I have not shewed them. 
Then said Isaiah to Hezekiah, Hear the word of the LORD of hosts: 
Behold, the days come, that all that is in thine house, and that which thy fathers have laid up in store until this day, shall be carried to Babylon: nothing shall be left, saith the LORD. 
And of thy sons that shall issue from thee, which thou sh
580,hen Job answered the LORD, and said, 
I know that thou canst do every thing, and that no thought can be withholden from thee. 
Who is he that hideth counsel without knowledge? therefore have I uttered that I understood not; things too wonderful for me, which I knew not. 
Hear, I beseech thee, and I will speak: I will demand of thee, and declare thou unto me. 
I have heard of thee by the hearing of the ear: but now mine eye seeth thee. 
Wherefore I abhor myself, and repent in dust and ashes. 
And it was so, that after the LORD had spoken these words unto Job, the LORD said t
577,iah the chief. And Eliezer had none other sons; but the sons of Rehabiah were very many. 
Of the sons of Izhar; Shelomith the chief. 
Of the sons of Hebron; Jeriah the first, Amariah the second, Jahaziel the third, and Jekameam the fourth. 
Of the sons of Uzziel; Micah the first and Jesiah the second. 
The sons of Merari; Mahli, and Mushi. The sons of Mahli; Eleazar, and Kish. 
And Eleazar died, and had no sons, but daughters: and their brethren the sons of Kish took them. 
The sons of Mushi; Mahli, and Eder, and Jeremoth, three. 
These were the sons of Levi after the ho
510,there he reigned seven years and six months: and in Jerusalem he reigned thirty and three years. 
And these were born unto him in Jerusalem; Shimea, and Shobab, and Nathan, and Solomon, four, of Bathshua the daughter of Ammiel: 
Ibhar also, and Elishama, and Eliphelet, 
And Nogah, and Nepheg, and Japhia, 
And Elishama, and Eliada, and Eliphelet, nine. 
These were all the sons of David, beside the sons of the concubines, and Tamar their sister. 
And Solomon's son was Rehoboam, Abia his son, Asa his son, Je
710,ht gain them that are under the law; 
To them that are without law, as without law, (being not without law to God, but under the law to Christ,) that I might gain them that are without law. 
To the weak became I as weak, that I might gain the weak: I am made all things to all men, that I might by all means save some. 
And this I do for the gospel's sake, that I might be partaker thereof with you. 
Know ye not that they which run in a race run all, but one receiveth the prize? So run, that ye may obtain. 
And every man that striveth for the mastery is temperate in all things. Now they do it to obtain a corruptible crown; but we an incorruptible. 
I therefore so run, not as uncertainly; so fight I, not 
668,andmaid, and let me set a morsel of bread before thee; and eat, that thou mayest have strength, when thou goest on thy way. 
But he refused, and said, I will not eat. But his servants, together with the woman, compelled him; and he hearkened unto their voice. So he arose from the earth, and sat upon the bed. 
And the woman had a fat calf in the house; and she hasted, and killed it, and took flour, and kneaded it, and did bake unleavened bread thereof: 
And she brought it before Saul, and before his servants; and they did eat. Then they rose up, and went away that night. 
Now the Philistines gathered together all their armies to Aphek: and the Israelites pitche
650,n behaviour as becometh holiness, not false accusers, not given to much wine, teachers of good things; 
That they may teach the young women to be sober, to love their husbands, to love their children, 
To be discreet, chaste, keepers at home, good, obedient to their own husbands, that the word of God be not blasphemed. 
Young men likewise exhort to be sober minded. 
In all things shewing thyself a pattern of good works: in doctrine shewing uncorruptness, gravity, sincerity, 
Sound speech, that cannot be condemned; that he that is of the contrary part may be ashamed, having no evil thing to say of you. 
Exhort servants to be obedient unto thei
624,of it of purple, the midst thereof being paved with love, for the daughters of Jerusalem. 
Go forth, O ye daughters of Zion, and behold king Solomon with the crown wherewith his mother crowned him in the day of his espousals, and in the day of the gladness of his heart. 
Behold, thou art fair, my love; behold, thou art fair; thou hast doves' eyes within thy locks: thy hair is as a flock of goats, that appear from mount Gilead. 
Thy teeth are like a flock of sheep that are even shorn, which came up from the washing; whereof every one bear twins, and none is barren among them. 
Thy lips are like a thread of scarlet, an
613,their enemies all the days of the judge: for it repented the LORD because of their groanings by reason of them that oppressed them and vexed them. 
And it came to pass, when the judge was dead, that they returned, and corrupted themselves more than their fathers, in following other gods to serve them, and to bow down unto them; they ceased not from their own doings, nor from their stubborn way. 
And the anger of the LORD was hot against Israel; and he said, Because that this people hath transgressed my covenant which I commanded their fathers, and have not hearkened unto my voice; 
I also will not hencefor
556,rth, and in the rocks. 
Among the bushes they brayed; under the nettles they were gathered together. 
They were children of fools, yea, children of base men: they were viler than the earth. 
And now am I their song, yea, I am their byword. 
They abhor me, they flee far from me, and spare not to spit in my face. 
Because he hath loosed my cord, and afflicted me, they have also let loose the bridle before me. 
Upon my right hand rise the youth; they push away my feet, and they raise up against me the ways of their destruction. 
They mar my path, they s
633,en in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel? 
And there was war between Asa and Baasha king of Israel all their days. 
In the third year of Asa king of Judah began Baasha the son of Ahijah to reign over all Israel in Tirzah, twenty and four years. 
And he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way of Jeroboam, and in his sin wherewith he made Israel to sin. 
Then the word of the LORD came to Jehu the son of Hanani against Baasha, saying, 
Forasmuch as I exalted thee out of the dust, and made thee prince over my people Israel; and thou hast walked in the way of Jeroboam, and hast made my people Israel
597,tain of the Pharisees said unto them, Why do ye that which is not lawful to do on the sabbath days? 
And Jesus answering them said, Have ye not read so much as this, what David did, when himself was an hungred, and they which were with him; 
How he went into the house of God, and did take and eat the shewbread, and gave also to them that were with him; which it is not lawful to eat but for the priests alone? 
And he said unto them, That the Son of man is Lord also of the sabbath. 
And it came to pass also on another sabbath, that he entered into the synagogue and taught: and there was a man
711,pened unto me, and there are many adversaries. 
Now if Timotheus come, see that he may be with you without fear: for he worketh the work of the Lord, as I also do. 
Let no man therefore despise him: but conduct him forth in peace, that he may come unto me: for I look for him with the brethren. 
As touching our brother Apollos, I greatly desired him to come unto you with the brethren: but his will was not at all to come at this time; but he will come when he shall have convenient time. 
Watch ye, stand fast in the faith, quit you like men, be strong. 
Let all your things be done with charity. 
I beseech you, brethren, (ye know the house of Stephanas, that it is the firstfruits of Achaia, and that they h
676,u art my hiding place and my shield: I hope in thy word. 
Depart from me, ye evildoers: for I will keep the commandments of my God. 
Uphold me according unto thy word, that I may live: and let me not be ashamed of my hope. 
Hold thou me up, and I shall be safe: and I will have respect unto thy statutes continually. 
Thou hast trodden down all them that err from thy statutes: for their deceit is falsehood. 
Thou puttest away all the wicked of the earth like dross: therefore I love thy testimonies. 
My flesh trembleth for fear of thee; and I am afraid of thy judgments. 
I have done judgment and justice: leave me not to mine oppressors. 
Be surety for thy servant for goo
495,mpets of rams' horns: and the seventh day ye shall compass the city seven times, and the priests shall blow with the trumpets. 
And it shall come to pass, that when they make a long blast with the ram's horn, and when ye hear the sound of the trumpet, all the people shall shout with a great shout; and the wall of the city shall fall down flat, and the people shall ascend up every man straight before him. 
And Joshua the son of Nun called the priests, and said unto them, Take up the ark of t
681,at while it was yet day, David sware, saying, So do God to me, and more also, if I taste bread, or ought else, till the sun be down. 
And all the people took notice of it, and it pleased them: as whatsoever the king did pleased all the people. 
For all the people and all Israel understood that day that it was not of the king to slay Abner the son of Ner. 
And the king said unto his servants, Know ye not that there is a prince and a great man fallen this day in Israel? 
And I am this day weak, though anointed king; and these men the sons of Zeruiah be too hard for me: the LORD shall reward the doer of evil according to his wickedness. 
And when Saul's son heard that Abner w
667, commandments. 
Remove from me reproach and contempt; for I have kept thy testimonies. 
Princes also did sit and speak against me: but thy servant did meditate in thy statutes. 
Thy testimonies also are my delight and my counsellors.leth. 
My soul cleaveth unto the dust: quicken thou me according to thy word. 
I have declared my ways, and thou heardest me: teach me thy statutes. 
Make me to understand the way of thy precepts: so shall I talk of thy wondrous works. 
My soul melteth for heaviness: strengthen thou me according unto thy word. 
Remove from me the way of lying: and grant me thy law graciously. 
I have chosen the way of truth: thy judgments have I l
564,nor two days, nor five days, neither ten days, nor twenty days; 
But even a whole month, until it come out at your nostrils, and it be loathsome unto you: because that ye have despised the LORD which is among you, and have wept before him, saying, Why came we forth out of Egypt? 
And Moses said, The people, among whom I am, are six hundred thousand footmen; and thou hast said, I will give them flesh, that they may eat a whole month. 
Shall the flocks and the herds be slain for them, to suffice them? or shall all the fish of the sea be gathered together for t
697, as the flower of the field: 
The grass withereth, the flower fadeth: because the spirit of the LORD bloweth upon it: surely the people is grass. 
The grass withereth, the flower fadeth: but the word of our God shall stand for ever. 
O Zion, that bringest good tidings, get thee up into the high mountain; O Jerusalem, that bringest good tidings, lift up thy voice with strength; lift it up, be not afraid; say unto the cities of Judah, Behold your God! 
Behold, the Lord GOD will come with strong hand, and his arm shall rule for him: behold, his reward is with him, and his work before him. 
He shall feed his flock like a shepherd: he shall gather the lambs with his arm, and carry them in his 
604, prophets concerning the Son of man shall be accomplished. 
For he shall be delivered unto the Gentiles, and shall be mocked, and spitefully entreated, and spitted on: 
And they shall scourge him, and put him to death: and the third day he shall rise again. 
And they understood none of these things: and this saying was hid from them, neither knew they the things which were spoken. 
And it came to pass, that as he was come nigh unto Jericho, a certain blind man sat by the way side begging: 
And hearing the multitude pass by, he asked what it meant. 
And they told him, that Jesus of Nazareth passeth
662,nd brought forth cattle ringstraked, speckled, and spotted. 
And Jacob did separate the lambs, and set the faces of the flocks toward the ringstraked, and all the brown in the flock of Laban; and he put his own flocks by themselves, and put them not unto Laban's cattle. 
And it came to pass, whensoever the stronger cattle did conceive, that Jacob laid the rods before the eyes of the cattle in the gutters, that they might conceive among the rods. 
But when the cattle were feeble, he put them not in: so the feebler were Laban's, and the stronger Jacob's. 
And the man increased exceedingly, and had much cattle, and maidservants, and menservants, and camels,
720,ll not talk much with you: for the prince of this world cometh, and hath nothing in me. 
But that the world may know that I love the Father; and as the Father gave me commandment, even so I do. Arise, let us go hence. 
I am the true vine, and my Father is the husbandman. 
Every branch in me that beareth not fruit he taketh away: and every branch that beareth fruit, he purgeth it, that it may bring forth more fruit. 
Now ye are clean through the word which I have spoken unto you. 
Abide in me, and I in you. As the branch cannot bear fruit of itself, except it abide in the vine; no more can ye, except ye abide in me. 
I am the vine, ye are the branches: He that abideth in me, and I in him, the same bringeth forth
650,ss at the same time when Gog shall come against the land of Israel, saith the Lord GOD, that my fury shall come up in my face. 
For in my jealousy and in the fire of my wrath have I spoken, Surely in that day there shall be a great shaking in the land of Israel; 
So that the fishes of the sea, and the fowls of the heaven, and the beasts of the field, and all creeping things that creep upon the earth, and all the men that are upon the face of the earth, shall shake at my presence, and the mountains shall be thrown down, and the steep places shall fall, and every wall shall fall to the ground. 
And I will call for a sword against him throughout
485,t we might be justified by the faith of Christ, and not by the works of the law: for by the works of the law shall no flesh be justified. 
But if, while we seek to be justified by Christ, we ourselves also are found sinners, is therefore Christ the minister of sin? God forbid. 
For if I build again the things which I destroyed, I make myself a transgressor. 
For I through the law am dead to the law, that I might live unto God. 
I am crucified with Christ: neverthless I live; yet n
513, ye have heard with your ears. 
Then spake Jeremiah unto all the princes and to all the people, saying, The LORD sent me to prophesy against this house and against this city all the words that ye have heard. 
Therefore now amend your ways and your doings, and obey the voice of the LORD your God; and the LORD will repent him of the evil that he hath pronounced against you. 
As for me, behold, I am in your hand: do with me as seemeth good and meet unto you. 
But know ye for certain, that if ye put me to death,
549,inking, that the man took a golden earring of half a shekel weight, and two bracelets for her hands of ten shekels weight of gold; 
And said, Whose daughter art thou? tell me, I pray thee: is there room in thy father's house for us to lodge in? 
And she said unto him, I am the daughter of Bethuel the son of Milcah, which she bare unto Nahor. 
She said moreover unto him, We have both straw and provender enough, and room to lodge in. 
And the man bowed down his head, and worshipped the LORD. 
And he said, Blessed be the LORD God of my master Abr
533,orth thine hand toward heaven, that there may be hail in all the land of Egypt, upon man, and upon beast, and upon every herb of the field, throughout the land of Egypt. 
And Moses stretched forth his rod toward heaven: and the LORD sent thunder and hail, and the fire ran along upon the ground; and the LORD rained hail upon the land of Egypt. 
So there was hail, and fire mingled with the hail, very grievous, such as there was none like it in all the land of Egypt since it became a nation. 
And the hail smote throughout all the 
709,d Joseph and his mother marvelled at those things which were spoken of him. 
And Simeon blessed them, and said unto Mary his mother, Behold, this child is set for the fall and rising again of many in Israel; and for a sign which shall be spoken against; 
(Yea, a sword shall pierce through thy own soul also,) that the thoughts of many hearts may be revealed. 
And there was one Anna, a prophetess, the daughter of Phanuel, of the tribe of Aser: she was of a great age, and had lived with an husband seven years from her virginity; 
And she was a widow of about fourscore and four years, which departed not from the temple, but served God with fastings and prayers night and day. 
And she coming in that insta
640,elivered up the Canaanites; and they utterly destroyed them and their cities: and he called the name of the place Hormah. 
And they journeyed from mount Hor by the way of the Red sea, to compass the land of Edom: and the soul of the people was much discouraged because of the way. 
And the people spake against God, and against Moses, Wherefore have ye brought us up out of Egypt to die in the wilderness? for there is no bread, neither is there any water; and our soul loatheth this light bread. 
And the LORD sent fiery serpents among the people, and they bit the people; and much people of Israel died. 
Therefore the people came to Mose
700,on her hand, and gave him drink. 
And when she had done giving him drink, she said, I will draw water for thy camels also, until they have done drinking. 
And she hasted, and emptied her pitcher into the trough, and ran again unto the well to draw water, and drew for all his camels. 
And the man wondering at her held his peace, to wit whether the LORD had made his journey prosperous or not. 
And it came to pass, as the camels had done drinking, that the man took a golden earring of half a shekel weight, and two bracelets for her hands of ten shekels weight of gold; 
And said, Whose daughter art thou? tell me, I pray thee: is there room in thy father's house for us to lodge in? 
And she said 
629,I have spread you abroad as the four winds of the heaven, saith the LORD. 
Deliver thyself, O Zion, that dwellest with the daughter of Babylon. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts; After the glory hath he sent me unto the nations which spoiled you: for he that toucheth you toucheth the apple of his eye. 
For, behold, I will shake mine hand upon them, and they shall be a spoil to their servants: and ye shall know that the LORD of hosts hath sent me. 
Sing and rejoice, O daughter of Zion: for, lo, I come, and I will dwell in the midst of thee, saith the LORD. 
And many nations shall be joined to the LORD in that day, and shal
545,ich was the son of Obed, which was the son of Booz, which was the son of Salmon, which was the son of Naasson, 
Which was the son of Aminadab, which was the son of Aram, which was the son of Esrom, which was the son of Phares, which was the son of Juda, 
Which was the son of Jacob, which was the son of Isaac, which was the son of Abraham, which was the son of Thara, which was the son of Nachor, 
Which was the son of Saruch, which was the son of Ragau, which was the son of Phalec, which was the son of Heber, which was the son of Sala, 
Whic
705,ir groaning, and God remembered his covenant with Abraham, with Isaac, and with Jacob. 
And God looked upon the children of Israel, and God had respect unto them. 
Now Moses kept the flock of Jethro his father in law, the priest of Midian: and he led the flock to the backside of the desert, and came to the mountain of God, even to Horeb. 
And the angel of the LORD appeared unto him in a flame of fire out of the midst of a bush: and he looked, and, behold, the bush burned with fire, and the bush was not consumed. 
And Moses said, I will now turn aside, and see this great sight, why the bush is not burnt. 
And when the LORD saw that he turned aside to see, God called unto him out of the midst of th
604,e acceptable in thy sight, O LORD, my strength, and my redeemer. 
The LORD hear thee in the day of trouble; the name of the God of Jacob defend thee; 
Send thee help from the sanctuary, and strengthen thee out of Zion; 
Remember all thy offerings, and accept thy burnt sacrifice; Selah. 
Grant thee according to thine own heart, and fulfil all thy counsel. 
We will rejoice in thy salvation, and in the name of our God we will set up our banners: the LORD fulfil all thy petitions. 
Now know I that the LORD saveth his anointed; he will hear him from his holy heaven with the saving strength of his right
488,as moved with compassion, and loosed him, and forgave him the debt. 
But the same servant went out, and found one of his fellowservants, which owed him an hundred pence: and he laid hands on him, and took him by the throat, saying, Pay me that thou owest. 
And his fellowservant fell down at his feet, and besought him, saying, Have patience with me, and I will pay thee all. 
And he would not: but went and cast him into prison, till he should pay the debt. 
So when his fellowservants s
632,ainst itself shall not stand: 
And if Satan cast out Satan, he is divided against himself; how shall then his kingdom stand? 
And if I by Beelzebub cast out devils, by whom do your children cast them out? therefore they shall be your judges. 
But if I cast out devils by the Spirit of God, then the kingdom of God is come unto you. 
Or else how can one enter into a strong man's house, and spoil his goods, except he first bind the strong man? and then he will spoil his house. 
He that is not with me is against me; and he that gathereth not with me scattereth abroad. 
Wherefore I say unto you, All manner of sin and blasphemy sha
544,el, saying, He that offereth the sacrifice of his peace offerings unto the LORD shall bring his oblation unto the LORD of the sacrifice of his peace offerings. 
His own hands shall bring the offerings of the LORD made by fire, the fat with the breast, it shall he bring, that the breast may be waved for a wave offering before the LORD. 
And the priest shall burn the fat upon the altar: but the breast shall be Aaron's and his sons'. 
And the right shoulder shall ye give unto the priest for an heave offering of the sacrifices of your peace o
525,mmandeth that they return from iniquity. 
If they obey and serve him, they shall spend their days in prosperity, and their years in pleasures. 
But if they obey not, they shall perish by the sword, and they shall die without knowledge. 
But the hypocrites in heart heap up wrath: they cry not when he bindeth them. 
They die in youth, and their life is among the unclean. 
He delivereth the poor in his affliction, and openeth their ears in oppression. 
Even so would he have removed thee out of the strait into a broad place
631,mbalm his father: and the physicians embalmed Israel. 
And forty days were fulfilled for him; for so are fulfilled the days of those which are embalmed: and the Egyptians mourned for him threescore and ten days. 
And when the days of his mourning were past, Joseph spake unto the house of Pharaoh, saying, If now I have found grace in your eyes, speak, I pray you, in the ears of Pharaoh, saying, 
My father made me swear, saying, Lo, I die: in my grave which I have digged for me in the land of Canaan, there shalt thou bury me. Now therefore let me go up, I pray thee, and bury my father, and I will come again. 
And Pharaoh said
520,he altar of the LORD in the presence of all the congregation of Israel, and spread forth his hands: 
For Solomon had made a brasen scaffold of five cubits long, and five cubits broad, and three cubits high, and had set it in the midst of the court: and upon it he stood, and kneeled down upon his knees before all the congregation of Israel, and spread forth his hands toward heaven. 
And said, O LORD God of Israel, there is no God like thee in the heaven, nor in the earth; which keepest covenant, and shewest mercy un
485,rily there is a reward for the righteous: verily he is a God that judgeth in the earth. 
Deliver me from mine enemies, O my God: defend me from them that rise up against me. 
Deliver me from the workers of iniquity, and save me from bloody men. 
For, lo, they lie in wait for my soul: the mighty are gathered against me; not for my transgression, nor for my sin, O LORD. 
They run and prepare themselves without my fault: awake to help me, and behold. 
Thou therefore, O LORD God of ho
481, I perceive, that if Absalom had lived, and all we had died this day, then it had pleased thee well. 
Now therefore arise, go forth, and speak comfortably unto thy servants: for I swear by the LORD, if thou go not forth, there will not tarry one with thee this night: and that will be worse unto thee than all the evil that befell thee from thy youth until now. 
Then the king arose, and sat in the gate. And they told unto all the people, saying, Behold, the king doth sit in the 
648,; for some have not the knowledge of God: I speak this to your shame. 
But some man will say, How are the dead raised up? and with what body do they come? 
Thou fool, that which thou sowest is not quickened, except it die: 
And that which thou sowest, thou sowest not that body that shall be, but bare grain, it may chance of wheat, or of some other grain: 
But God giveth it a body as it hath pleased him, and to every seed his own body. 
All flesh is not the same flesh: but there is one kind of flesh of men, another flesh of beasts, another of fishes, and another of birds. 
There are also celestial bodies, and bodies terrestrial: but the glor
581,and as soon as the sun was down, Joshua commanded that they should take his carcase down from the tree, and cast it at the entering of the gate of the city, and raise thereon a great heap of stones, that remaineth unto this day. 
Then Joshua built an altar unto the LORD God of Israel in mount Ebal, 
As Moses the servant of the LORD commanded the children of Israel, as it is written in the book of the law of Moses, an altar of whole stones, over which no man hath lift up any iron: and they offered thereon burnt offerings unto the LORD, and sacrificed peace offerings. 
And he 
638,nd he shall bring his trespass offering unto the LORD, unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, even a ram for a trespass offering. 
And the priest shall make an atonement for him with the ram of the trespass offering before the LORD for his sin which he hath done: and the sin which he hath done shall be forgiven him. 
And when ye shall come into the land, and shall have planted all manner of trees for food, then ye shall count the fruit thereof as uncircumcised: three years shall it be as uncircumcised unto you: it shall not be eaten of. 
But in the fourth year all the fruit thereof shall be holy to praise the LORD wi
488,he LORD? 
And when Moses heard that, he was content. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and to Aaron, saying unto them, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, These are the beasts which ye shall eat among all the beasts that are on the earth. 
Whatsoever parteth the hoof, and is clovenfooted, and cheweth the cud, among the beasts, that shall ye eat. 
Nevertheless these shall ye not eat of them that chew the cud, or of them that divide the hoof: as the camel, because he cheweth the c
612,ith the oil; for thine olive shall cast his fruit. 
Thou shalt beget sons and daughters, but thou shalt not enjoy them; for they shall go into captivity. 
All thy trees and fruit of thy land shall the locust consume. 
The stranger that is within thee shall get up above thee very high; and thou shalt come down very low. 
He shall lend to thee, and thou shalt not lend to him: he shall be the head, and thou shalt be the tail. 
Moreover all these curses shall come upon thee, and shall pursue thee, and overtake thee, till thou be destroyed; because thou hearkenedst not unto the voice of the LORD thy God, to ke
627,eared unto many. 
Now when the centurion, and they that were with him, watching Jesus, saw the earthquake, and those things that were done, they feared greatly, saying, Truly this was the Son of God. 
And many women were there beholding afar off, which followed Jesus from Galilee, ministering unto him: 
Among which was Mary Magdalene, and Mary the mother of James and Joses, and the mother of Zebedees children. 
When the even was come, there came a rich man of Arimathaea, named Joseph, who also himself was Jesus' disciple: 
He went to Pilate, and begged the body of Jesus. Then Pilate commanded the body to be delivered. 

575,uisheth, all the merryhearted do sigh. 
The mirth of tabrets ceaseth, the noise of them that rejoice endeth, the joy of the harp ceaseth. 
They shall not drink wine with a song; strong drink shall be bitter to them that drink it. 
The city of confusion is broken down: every house is shut up, that no man may come in. 
There is a crying for wine in the streets; all joy is darkened, the mirth of the land is gone. 
In the city is left desolation, and the gate is smitten with destruction. 
When thus it shall be in the midst of the land among the people, there shall be as th
542,drawer of thy water: 
That thou shouldest enter into covenant with the LORD thy God, and into his oath, which the LORD thy God maketh with thee this day: 
That he may establish thee to day for a people unto himself, and that he may be unto thee a God, as he hath said unto thee, and as he hath sworn unto thy fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob. 
Neither with you only do I make this covenant and this oath; 
But with him that standeth here with us this day before the LORD our God, and also with him that is not here with us this day
518,ple, saying, Whosoever is fearful and afraid, let him return and depart early from mount Gilead. And there returned of the people twenty and two thousand; and there remained ten thousand. 
And the LORD said unto Gideon, The people are yet too many; bring them down unto the water, and I will try them for thee there: and it shall be, that of whom I say unto thee, This shall go with thee, the same shall go with thee; and of whomsoever I say unto thee, This shall not go with thee, the same shall not go. 
So he brough
518,nd it even so as the women had said: but him they saw not. 
Then he said unto them, O fools, and slow of heart to believe all that the prophets have spoken: 
Ought not Christ to have suffered these things, and to enter into his glory? 
And beginning at Moses and all the prophets, he expounded unto them in all the scriptures the things concerning himself. 
And they drew nigh unto the village, whither they went: and he made as though he would have gone further. 
But they constrained him, saying, Abide with us: for 
589,orest; it crieth out against me: therefore have I hated it. 
Mine heritage is unto me as a speckled bird, the birds round about are against her; come ye, assemble all the beasts of the field, come to devour. 
Many pastors have destroyed my vineyard, they have trodden my portion under foot, they have made my pleasant portion a desolate wilderness. 
They have made it desolate, and being desolate it mourneth unto me; the whole land is made desolate, because no man layeth it to heart. 
The spoilers are come upon all high places through the wilderness: for the sword of the LORD shall dev
560,s he went out of Jericho with his disciples and a great number of people, blind Bartimaeus, the son of Timaeus, sat by the highway side begging. 
And when he heard that it was Jesus of Nazareth, he began to cry out, and say, Jesus, thou son of David, have mercy on me. 
And many charged him that he should hold his peace: but he cried the more a great deal, Thou son of David, have mercy on me. 
And Jesus stood still, and commanded him to be called. And they call the blind man, saying unto him, Be of good comfort, rise; he calleth thee. 
And he, casting awa
487,ice to them, that they may help me. But they were the ruin of him, and of all Israel. 
And Ahaz gathered together the vessels of the house of God, and cut in pieces the vessels of the house of God, and shut up the doors of the house of the LORD, and he made him altars in every corner of Jerusalem. 
And in every several city of Judah he made high places to burn incense unto other gods, and provoked to anger the LORD God of his fathers. 
Now the rest of his acts and of all his ways, f
556,e unjust still: and he which is filthy, let him be filthy still: and he that is righteous, let him be righteous still: and he that is holy, let him be holy still. 
And, behold, I come quickly; and my reward is with me, to give every man according as his work shall be. 
I am Alpha and Omega, the beginning and the end, the first and the last. 
Blessed are they that do his commandments, that they may have right to the tree of life, and may enter in through the gates into the city. 
For without are dogs, and sorcerers, and whoremongers, and murderers, an
709,is place, and have burned incense in it unto other gods, whom neither they nor their fathers have known, nor the kings of Judah, and have filled this place with the blood of innocents; 
They have built also the high places of Baal, to burn their sons with fire for burnt offerings unto Baal, which I commanded not, nor spake it, neither came it into my mind: 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that this place shall no more be called Tophet, nor The valley of the son of Hinnom, but The valley of slaughter. 
And I will make void the counsel of Judah and Jerusalem in this place; and I will cause them to fall by the sword before their enemies, and by the hands of them that seek their lives: 
663,ye shall sow your seed in vain, for your enemies shall eat it. 
And I will set my face against you, and ye shall be slain before your enemies: they that hate you shall reign over you; and ye shall flee when none pursueth you. 
And if ye will not yet for all this hearken unto me, then I will punish you seven times more for your sins. 
And I will break the pride of your power; and I will make your heaven as iron, and your earth as brass: 
And your strength shall be spent in vain: for your land shall not yield her increase, neither shall the trees of the land yield their fruits. 
And if ye walk contrary unto me, and will not hearken unto me; I will bring sev
532,D, nor make an offering by fire of them upon the altar unto the LORD. 
Either a bullock or a lamb that hath any thing superfluous or lacking in his parts, that mayest thou offer for a freewill offering; but for a vow it shall not be accepted. 
Ye shall not offer unto the LORD that which is bruised, or crushed, or broken, or cut; neither shall ye make any offering thereof in your land. 
Neither from a stranger's hand shall ye offer the bread of your God of any of these; because their corruption is in them, and blemishes be in t
597,dwriting of ordinances that was against us, which was contrary to us, and took it out of the way, nailing it to his cross; 
And having spoiled principalities and powers, he made a shew of them openly, triumphing over them in it. 
Let no man therefore judge you in meat, or in drink, or in respect of an holyday, or of the new moon, or of the sabbath days: 
Which are a shadow of things to come; but the body is of Christ. 
Let no man beguile you of your reward in a voluntary humility and worshipping of angels, intruding into those things which he hath not seen, vainly puffed up by his fleshly m
588,r in the gates: was there a shield or spear seen among forty thousand in Israel? 
My heart is toward the governors of Israel, that offered themselves willingly among the people. Bless ye the LORD. 
Speak, ye that ride on white asses, ye that sit in judgment, and walk by the way. 
They that are delivered from the noise of archers in the places of drawing water, there shall they rehearse the righteous acts of the LORD, even the righteous acts toward the inhabitants of his villages in Israel: then shall the people of the LORD go down to the gates. 
Awake, awake, Deborah: awake, awake,
501,uble, when they cried unto thee, thou heardest them from heaven; and according to thy manifold mercies thou gavest them saviours, who saved them out of the hand of their enemies. 
But after they had rest, they did evil again before thee: therefore leftest thou them in the land of their enemies, so that they had the dominion over them: yet when they returned, and cried unto thee, thou heardest them from heaven; and many times didst thou deliver them according to thy mercies; 
And testifiedst again
663, the LORD, 
So that the priests could not stand to minister because of the cloud: for the glory of the LORD had filled the house of the LORD. 
Then spake Solomon, The LORD said that he would dwell in the thick darkness. 
I have surely built thee an house to dwell in, a settled place for thee to abide in for ever. 
And the king turned his face about, and blessed all the congregation of Israel: (and all the congregation of Israel stood;) 
And he said, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel, which spake with his mouth unto David my father, and hath with his hand fulfilled it, saying, 
Since the day that I brought forth my people Israel out of Egypt, I chose no ci
580,in and without with pitch. 
And this is the fashion which thou shalt make it of: The length of the ark shall be three hundred cubits, the breadth of it fifty cubits, and the height of it thirty cubits. 
A window shalt thou make to the ark, and in a cubit shalt thou finish it above; and the door of the ark shalt thou set in the side thereof; with lower, second, and third stories shalt thou make it. 
And, behold, I, even I, do bring a flood of waters upon the earth, to destroy all flesh, wherein is the breath of life, from under heaven; and every thing that is in the earth sh
679, and be spilled, and the bottles shall perish. 
But new wine must be put into new bottles; and both are preserved. 
No man also having drunk old wine straightway desireth new: for he saith, The old is better. 
And it came to pass on the second sabbath after the first, that he went through the corn fields; and his disciples plucked the ears of corn, and did eat, rubbing them in their hands. 
And certain of the Pharisees said unto them, Why do ye that which is not lawful to do on the sabbath days? 
And Jesus answering them said, Have ye not read so much as this, what David did, when himself was an hungred, and they which were with him; 
How he went into the house of God, a
607,aith the LORD the King of Israel, and his redeemer the LORD of hosts; I am the first, and I am the last; and beside me there is no God. 
And who, as I, shall call, and shall declare it, and set it in order for me, since I appointed the ancient people? and the things that are coming, and shall come, let them shew unto them. 
Fear ye not, neither be afraid: have not I told thee from that time, and have declared it? ye are even my witnesses. Is there a God beside me? yea, there is no God; I know not any. 
They that make a graven image are all of them vanity; and their delectable things shall not profit;
615, understanding. 
For the merchandise of it is better than the merchandise of silver, and the gain thereof than fine gold. 
She is more precious than rubies: and all the things thou canst desire are not to be compared unto her. 
Length of days is in her right hand; and in her left hand riches and honour. 
Her ways are ways of pleasantness, and all her paths are peace. 
She is a tree of life to them that lay hold upon her: and happy is every one that retaineth her. 
The LORD by wisdom hath founded the earth; by understanding hath he established the heavens. 
By his knowledge the depths are broken up, and the c
563, be consecrated in them. 
And that son that is priest in his stead shall put them on seven days, when he cometh into the tabernacle of the congregation to minister in the holy place. 
And thou shalt take the ram of the consecration, and seethe his flesh in the holy place. 
And Aaron and his sons shall eat the flesh of the ram, and the bread that is in the basket by the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And they shall eat those things wherewith the atonement was made, to consecrate and to sanctify them: but a stranger shall not eat thereof, becaus
601,
And he said, I beseech thee, shew me thy glory. 
And he said, I will make all my goodness pass before thee, and I will proclaim the name of the LORD before thee; and will be gracious to whom I will be gracious, and will shew mercy on whom I will shew mercy. 
And he said, Thou canst not see my face: for there shall no man see me, and live. 
And the LORD said, Behold, there is a place by me, and thou shalt stand upon a rock: 
And it shall come to pass, while my glory passeth by, that I will put thee in a clift of the rock, and will cover thee with my hand while I pass by: 
And I will take away m
488,es, and findeth them asleep, and saith unto Peter, What, could ye not watch with me one hour? 
Watch and pray, that ye enter not into temptation: the spirit indeed is willing, but the flesh is weak. 
He went away again the second time, and prayed, saying, O my Father, if this cup may not pass away from me, except I drink it, thy will be done. 
And he came and found them asleep again: for their eyes were heavy. 
And he left them, and went away again, and prayed the third time, saying 
522,ouch any of these, shall it be unclean? And the priests answered and said, It shall be unclean. 
Then answered Haggai, and said, So is this people, and so is this nation before me, saith the LORD; and so is every work of their hands; and that which they offer there is unclean. 
And now, I pray you, consider from this day and upward, from before a stone was laid upon a stone in the temple of the LORD: 
Since those days were, when one came to an heap of twenty measures, there were but ten: when one came to the pressfat
605,d the soothsayers: and I told the dream before them; but they did not make known unto me the interpretation thereof. 
But at the last Daniel came in before me, whose name was Belteshazzar, according to the name of my God, and in whom is the spirit of the holy gods: and before him I told the dream, saying, 
O Belteshazzar, master of the magicians, because I know that the spirit of the holy gods is in thee, and no secret troubleth thee, tell me the visions of my dream that I have seen, and the interpretation thereof. 
Thus were the visions of mine head in my bed; I saw, and behold a tree in the midst
513,ven. 
Neither be ye called masters: for one is your Master, even Christ. 
But he that is greatest among you shall be your servant. 
And whosoever shall exalt himself shall be abased; and he that shall humble himself shall be exalted. 
But woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye shut up the kingdom of heaven against men: for ye neither go in yourselves, neither suffer ye them that are entering to go in. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye devour widows' houses, and for a p
653,; for them that honour me I will honour, and they that despise me shall be lightly esteemed. 
Behold, the days come, that I will cut off thine arm, and the arm of thy father's house, that there shall not be an old man in thine house. 
And thou shalt see an enemy in my habitation, in all the wealth which God shall give Israel: and there shall not be an old man in thine house for ever. 
And the man of thine, whom I shall not cut off from mine altar, shall be to consume thine eyes, and to grieve thine heart: and all the increase of thine house shall die in the flower of their age. 
And this shall be a sign unto thee, that shall come upon thy two so
703,yea, sweeter than honey to my mouth! 
Through thy precepts I get understanding: therefore I hate every false way. 
Thy word is a lamp unto my feet, and a light unto my path. 
I have sworn, and I will perform it, that I will keep thy righteous judgments. 
I am afflicted very much: quicken me, O LORD, according unto thy word. 
Accept, I beseech thee, the freewill offerings of my mouth, O LORD, and teach me thy judgments. 
My soul is continually in my hand: yet do I not forget thy law. 
The wicked have laid a snare for me: yet I erred not from thy precepts. 
Thy testimonies have I taken as an heritage for ever: for they are the rejoicing of my heart. 
I have inclined mine heart to perform thy stat
520,ies, were three thousand and two hundred. 
These be those that were numbered of the families of the sons of Merari, whom Moses and Aaron numbered according to the word of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
All those that were numbered of the Levites, whom Moses and Aaron and the chief of Israel numbered, after their families, and after the house of their fathers, 
From thirty years old and upward even unto fifty years old, every one that came to do the service of the ministry, and the service of the burden in the tabe
639,ailed, she brought forth; before her pain came, she was delivered of a man child. 
Who hath heard such a thing? who hath seen such things? Shall the earth be made to bring forth in one day? or shall a nation be born at once? for as soon as Zion travailed, she brought forth her children. 
Shall I bring to the birth, and not cause to bring forth? saith the LORD: shall I cause to bring forth, and shut the womb? saith thy God. 
Rejoice ye with Jerusalem, and be glad with her, all ye that love her: rejoice for joy with her, all ye that mourn for her: 
That ye may suck, and be satisfied with the breasts of her consolations; that ye may m
682, and was carried by the angels into Abraham's bosom: the rich man also died, and was buried; 
And in hell he lift up his eyes, being in torments, and seeth Abraham afar off, and Lazarus in his bosom. 
And he cried and said, Father Abraham, have mercy on me, and send Lazarus, that he may dip the tip of his finger in water, and cool my tongue; for I am tormented in this flame. 
But Abraham said, Son, remember that thou in thy lifetime receivedst thy good things, and likewise Lazarus evil things: but now he is comforted, and thou art tormented. 
And beside all this, between us and you there is a great gulf fixed: so that they which would pass from hence to you cannot; neither 
582,the ninety and nine, and goeth into the mountains, and seeketh that which is gone astray? 
And if so be that he find it, verily I say unto you, he rejoiceth more of that sheep, than of the ninety and nine which went not astray. 
Even so it is not the will of your Father which is in heaven, that one of these little ones should perish. 
Moreover if thy brother shall trespass against thee, go and tell him his fault between thee and him alone: if he shall hear thee, thou hast gained thy brother. 
But if he will not hear thee, then take with thee one or two more, that in the mouth
604,ken only by Moses? hath he not spoken also by us? And the LORD heard it. 
(Now the man Moses was very meek, above all the men which were upon the face of the earth.) 
And the LORD spake suddenly unto Moses, and unto Aaron, and unto Miriam, Come out ye three unto the tabernacle of the congregation. And they three came out. 
And the LORD came down in the pillar of the cloud, and stood in the door of the tabernacle, and called Aaron and Miriam: and they both came forth. 
And he said, Hear now my words: If there be a prophet among you, I the LORD will make myself known unto him in a vision, and will s
576, cast down many ten thousands: but he shall not be strengthened by it. 
For the king of the north shall return, and shall set forth a multitude greater than the former, and shall certainly come after certain years with a great army and with much riches. 
And in those times there shall many stand up against the king of the south: also the robbers of thy people shall exalt themselves to establish the vision; but they shall fall. 
So the king of the north shall come, and cast up a mount, and take the most fenced cities: and the arms of the south shall not withstand, neithe
522,And the fourth angel sounded, and the third part of the sun was smitten, and the third part of the moon, and the third part of the stars; so as the third part of them was darkened, and the day shone not for a third part of it, and the night likewise. 
And I beheld, and heard an angel flying through the midst of heaven, saying with a loud voice, Woe, woe, woe, to the inhabiters of the earth by reason of the other voices of the trumpet of the three angels, which are yet to sound! 
And the fifth angel sounded, and I saw
528, among the nations. 
For thy mercy is great unto the heavens, and thy truth unto the clouds. 
Be thou exalted, O God, above the heavens: let thy glory be above all the earth. 
Do ye indeed speak righteousness, O congregation? do ye judge uprightly, O ye sons of men? 
Yea, in heart ye work wickedness; ye weigh the violence of your hands in the earth. 
The wicked are estranged from the womb: they go astray as soon as they be born, speaking lies. 
Their poison is like the poison of a serpent: they are like the deaf adder that
700, is a league between me and thee, as there was between my father and thy father: behold, I have sent thee silver and gold; go, break thy league with Baasha king of Israel, that he may depart from me. 
And Benhadad hearkened unto king Asa, and sent the captains of his armies against the cities of Israel; and they smote Ijon, and Dan, and Abelmaim, and all the store cities of Naphtali. 
And it came to pass, when Baasha heard it, that he left off building of Ramah, and let his work cease. 
Then Asa the king took all Judah; and they carried away the stones of Ramah, and the timber thereof, wherewith Baasha was building; and he built therewith Geba and Mizpah. 
And at that time Hanani the seer ca
641,d them to go astray, they have turned them away on the mountains: they have gone from mountain to hill, they have forgotten their restingplace. 
All that found them have devoured them: and their adversaries said, We offend not, because they have sinned against the LORD, the habitation of justice, even the LORD, the hope of their fathers. 
Remove out of the midst of Babylon, and go forth out of the land of the Chaldeans, and be as the he goats before the flocks. 
For, lo, I will raise and cause to come up against Babylon an assembly of great nations from the north country: and they shall set themselves in array against her; from thenc
522,h the LORD, Ye shall not go up, nor fight against your brethren: return every man to his house: for this thing is done of me. And they obeyed the words of the LORD, and returned from going against Jeroboam. 
And Rehoboam dwelt in Jerusalem, and built cities for defence in Judah. 
He built even Bethlehem, and Etam, and Tekoa, 
And Bethzur, and Shoco, and Adullam, 
And Gath, and Mareshah, and Ziph, 
And Adoraim, and Lachish, and Azekah, 
And Zorah, and Aijalon, and Hebron, which are in Judah and in Benjamin fenced citi
664,o lay the foundation of the house. 
And Solomon's builders and Hiram's builders did hew them, and the stonesquarers: so they prepared timber and stones to build the house. 
And it came to pass in the four hundred and eightieth year after the children of Israel were come out of the land of Egypt, in the fourth year of Solomon's reign over Israel, in the month Zif, which is the second month, that he began to build the house of the LORD. 
And the house which king Solomon built for the LORD, the length thereof was threescore cubits, and the breadth thereof twenty cubits, and the height thereof thirty cubits. 
And the porch before the temple of the house, twent
572, secretly enticed, or my mouth hath kissed my hand: 
This also were an iniquity to be punished by the judge: for I should have denied the God that is above. 
If I rejoice at the destruction of him that hated me, or lifted up myself when evil found him: 
Neither have I suffered my mouth to sin by wishing a curse to his soul. 
If the men of my tabernacle said not, Oh that we had of his flesh! we cannot be satisfied. 
The stranger did not lodge in the street: but I opened my doors to the traveller. 
If I covered my transgressions as Adam, by hiding mine iniquity in my 
587,gs, and a target of brass between his shoulders. 
And the staff of his spear was like a weaver's beam; and his spear's head weighed six hundred shekels of iron: and one bearing a shield went before him. 
And he stood and cried unto the armies of Israel, and said unto them, Why are ye come out to set your battle in array? am not I a Philistine, and ye servants to Saul? choose you a man for you, and let him come down to me. 
If he be able to fight with me, and to kill me, then will we be your servants: but if I prevail against him, and kill him, then shall ye be our servants, and se
527,ossession of it. 
And the word of the LORD came to Elijah the Tishbite, saying, 
Arise, go down to meet Ahab king of Israel, which is in Samaria: behold, he is in the vineyard of Naboth, whither he is gone down to possess it. 
And thou shalt speak unto him, saying, Thus saith the LORD, Hast thou killed, and also taken possession? And thou shalt speak unto him, saying, Thus saith the LORD, In the place where dogs licked the blood of Naboth shall dogs lick thy blood, even thine. 
And Ahab said to Elijah, Hast thou found me,
538, he said unto the kinsman, Naomi, that is come again out of the country of Moab, selleth a parcel of land, which was our brother Elimelech's: 
And I thought to advertise thee, saying, Buy it before the inhabitants, and before the elders of my people. If thou wilt redeem it, redeem it: but if thou wilt not redeem it, then tell me, that I may know: for there is none to redeem it beside thee; and I am after thee. And he said, I will redeem it. 
Then said Boaz, What day thou buyest the field of the hand of Naomi, thou must buy it also o
532,nd the hawk after his kind, 
The little owl, and the great owl, and the swan, 
And the pelican, and the gier eagle, and the cormorant, 
And the stork, and the heron after her kind, and the lapwing, and the bat. 
And every creeping thing that flieth is unclean unto you: they shall not be eaten. 
But of all clean fowls ye may eat. 
Ye shall not eat of anything that dieth of itself: thou shalt give it unto the stranger that is in thy gates, that he may eat it; or thou mayest sell it unto an alien: for thou art an holy people unto
614,e LORD with a loud voice, and with shouting, and with trumpets, and with cornets. 
And all Judah rejoiced at the oath: for they had sworn with all their heart, and sought him with their whole desire; and he was found of them: and the LORD gave them rest round about. 
And also concerning Maachah the mother of Asa the king, he removed her from being queen, because she had made an idol in a grove: and Asa cut down her idol, and stamped it, and burnt it at the brook Kidron. 
But the high places were not taken away out of Israel: nevertheless the heart of Asa was perfect all his days. 
And he brought into the ho
542,ty. 
For the priest's lips should keep knowledge, and they should seek the law at his mouth: for he is the messenger of the LORD of hosts. 
But ye are departed out of the way; ye have caused many to stumble at the law; ye have corrupted the covenant of Levi, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Therefore have I also made you contemptible and base before all the people, according as ye have not kept my ways, but have been partial in the law. 
Have we not all one father? hath not one God created us? why do we deal treacherously every man against his
668,t came to pass, when Joshua was by Jericho, that he lifted up his eyes and looked, and, behold, there stood a man over against him with his sword drawn in his hand: and Joshua went unto him, and said unto him, Art thou for us, or for our adversaries? 
And he said, Nay; but as captain of the host of the LORD am I now come. And Joshua fell on his face to the earth, and did worship, and said unto him, What saith my Lord unto his servant? 
And the captain of the LORD's host said unto Joshua, Loose thy shoe from off thy foot; for the place whereon thou standest is holy. And Joshua did so. 
Now Jericho was straitly shut up because of the children of Israel: none wen
521,and. So Esther drew near, and touched the top of the sceptre. 
Then said the king unto her, What wilt thou, queen Esther? and what is thy request? it shall be even given thee to the half of the kingdom. 
And Esther answered, If it seem good unto the king, let the king and Haman come this day unto the banquet that I have prepared for him. 
Then the king said, Cause Haman to make haste, that he may do as Esther hath said. So the king and Haman came to the banquet that Esther had prepared. 
And the king said unto Esthe
549,on: Grace, mercy, and peace, from God the Father and Christ Jesus our Lord. 
I thank God, whom I serve from my forefathers with pure conscience, that without ceasing I have remembrance of thee in my prayers night and day; 
Greatly desiring to see thee, being mindful of thy tears, that I may be filled with joy; 
When I call to remembrance the unfeigned faith that is in thee, which dwelt first in thy grandmother Lois, and thy mother Eunice; and I am persuaded that in thee also. 
Wherefore I put thee in remembrance that thou stir up the gift of G
628,before that thou shalt thrice deny that thou knowest me. 
And he said unto them, When I sent you without purse, and scrip, and shoes, lacked ye any thing? And they said, Nothing. 
Then said he unto them, But now, he that hath a purse, let him take it, and likewise his scrip: and he that hath no sword, let him sell his garment, and buy one. 
For I say unto you, that this that is written must yet be accomplished in me, And he was reckoned among the transgressors: for the things concerning me have an end. 
And they said, Lord, behold, here are two swords. And he said unto them, It is enough. 
And he came out, and went, as h
675,ple were passed clean over Jordan. 
And it came to pass, when all the people were clean passed over Jordan, that the LORD spake unto Joshua, saying, 
Take you twelve men out of the people, out of every tribe a man, 
And command ye them, saying, Take you hence out of the midst of Jordan, out of the place where the priests' feet stood firm, twelve stones, and ye shall carry them over with you, and leave them in the lodging place, where ye shall lodge this night. 
Then Joshua called the twelve men, whom he had prepared of the children of Israel, out of every tribe a man: 
And Joshua said unto them, Pass over before the ark of the LORD your God into the midst of Jordan, 
639,n cattle and cattle. 
And I will set up one shepherd over them, and he shall feed them, even my servant David; he shall feed them, and he shall be their shepherd. 
And I the LORD will be their God, and my servant David a prince among them; I the LORD have spoken it. 
And I will make with them a covenant of peace, and will cause the evil beasts to cease out of the land: and they shall dwell safely in the wilderness, and sleep in the woods. 
And I will make them and the places round about my hill a blessing; and I will cause the shower to come down in his season; there shall be showers of blessing. 
And the tree of the field shall yi
708,rper than a thorn hedge: the day of thy watchmen and thy visitation cometh; now shall be their perplexity. 
Trust ye not in a friend, put ye not confidence in a guide: keep the doors of thy mouth from her that lieth in thy bosom. 
For the son dishonoureth the father, the daughter riseth up against her mother, the daughter in law against her mother in law; a man's enemies are the men of his own house. 
Therefore I will look unto the LORD; I will wait for the God of my salvation: my God will hear me. 
Rejoice not against me, O mine enemy: when I fall, I shall arise; when I sit in darkness, the LORD shall be a light unto me. 
I will bear the indignation of the LORD, because I have sinned against him, u
543,em which fell, severity; but toward thee, goodness, if thou continue in his goodness: otherwise thou also shalt be cut off. 
And they also, if they abide not still in unbelief, shall be graffed in: for God is able to graff them in again. 
For if thou wert cut out of the olive tree which is wild by nature, and wert graffed contrary to nature into a good olive tree: how much more shall these, which be the natural branches, be graffed into their own olive tree? 
For I would not, brethren, that ye should be ignorant of this mystery, lest ye 
592,t he hath opened mine eyes. 
Now we know that God heareth not sinners: but if any man be a worshipper of God, and doeth his will, him he heareth. 
Since the world began was it not heard that any man opened the eyes of one that was born blind. 
If this man were not of God, he could do nothing. 
They answered and said unto him, Thou wast altogether born in sins, and dost thou teach us? And they cast him out. 
Jesus heard that they had cast him out; and when he had found him, he said unto him, Dost thou believe on the Son of God? 
He answered and said, Who is he, Lord, that I might believ
613,r barn; and God feedeth them: how much more are ye better than the fowls? 
And which of you with taking thought can add to his stature one cubit? 
If ye then be not able to do that thing which is least, why take ye thought for the rest? 
Consider the lilies how they grow: they toil not, they spin not; and yet I say unto you, that Solomon in all his glory was not arrayed like one of these. 
If then God so clothe the grass, which is to day in the field, and to morrow is cast into the oven; how much more will he clothe you, O ye of little faith? 
And seek not ye what ye shall eat, or what ye shall drink, neit
644,the queen; and Esther certified the king thereof in Mordecai's name. 
And when inquisition was made of the matter, it was found out; therefore they were both hanged on a tree: and it was written in the book of the chronicles before the king. 
After these things did king Ahasuerus promote Haman the son of Hammedatha the Agagite, and advanced him, and set his seat above all the princes that were with him. 
And all the king's servants, that were in the king's gate, bowed, and reverenced Haman: for the king had so commanded concerning him. But Mordecai bowed not, nor did him reverence. 
Then the king's servants, which were in the king's gat
661,heir face toward the earth, and lick up the dust of thy feet; and thou shalt know that I am the LORD: for they shall not be ashamed that wait for me. 
Shall the prey be taken from the mighty, or the lawful captive delivered? 
But thus saith the LORD, Even the captives of the mighty shall be taken away, and the prey of the terrible shall be delivered: for I will contend with him that contendeth with thee, and I will save thy children. 
And I will feed them that oppress thee with their own flesh; and they shall be drunken with their own blood, as with sweet wine: and all flesh shall know that I the LORD am thy Saviour and thy Redeemer, the mighty One of J
492, over my people Israel, 
And rent the kingdom away from the house of David, and gave it thee: and yet thou hast not been as my servant David, who kept my commandments, and who followed me with all his heart, to do that only which was right in mine eyes; 
But hast done evil above all that were before thee: for thou hast gone and made thee other gods, and molten images, to provoke me to anger, and hast cast me behind thy back: 
Therefore, behold, I will bring evil upon the house of Jeroboa
550,hey went forth, and entered into a ship immediately; and that night they caught nothing. 
But when the morning was now come, Jesus stood on the shore: but the disciples knew not that it was Jesus. 
Then Jesus saith unto them, Children, have ye any meat? They answered him, No. 
And he said unto them, Cast the net on the right side of the ship, and ye shall find. They cast therefore, and now they were not able to draw it for the multitude of fishes. 
Therefore that disciple whom Jesus loved saith unto Peter, It is the Lord. Now when Simon Peter h
598,commanded. 
And these were the sons of Levi by their names; Gershon, and Kohath, and Merari. 
And these are the names of the sons of Gershon by their families; Libni, and Shimei. 
And the sons of Kohath by their families; Amram, and Izehar, Hebron, and Uzziel. 
And the sons of Merari by their families; Mahli, and Mushi. These are the families of the Levites according to the house of their fathers. 
Of Gershon was the family of the Libnites, and the family of the Shimites: these are the families of the Gershonites. 
Those that were numbered of them, according to the number of all the males, f
494,f: for ye have eaten up the vineyard; the spoil of the poor is in your houses. 
What mean ye that ye beat my people to pieces, and grind the faces of the poor? saith the Lord GOD of hosts. 
Moreover the LORD saith, Because the daughters of Zion are haughty, and walk with stretched forth necks and wanton eyes, walking and mincing as they go, and making a tinkling with their feet: 
Therefore the LORD will smite with a scab the crown of the head of the daughters of Zion, and the LORD will dis
672, children of Israel asked the LORD, saying, Who shall go up for us against the Canaanites first, to fight against them? 
And the LORD said, Judah shall go up: behold, I have delivered the land into his hand. 
And Judah said unto Simeon his brother, Come up with me into my lot, that we may fight against the Canaanites; and I likewise will go with thee into thy lot. So Simeon went with him. 
And Judah went up; and the LORD delivered the Canaanites and the Perizzites into their hand: and they slew of them in Bezek ten thousand men. 
And they found Adonibezek in Bezek: and they fought against him, and they slew the Canaanites and the Perizzites. 
But Adonibezek fled; 
703,ry of the celestial is one, and the glory of the terrestrial is another. 
There is one glory of the sun, and another glory of the moon, and another glory of the stars: for one star differeth from another star in glory. 
So also is the resurrection of the dead. It is sown in corruption; it is raised in incorruption: 
It is sown in dishonour; it is raised in glory: it is sown in weakness; it is raised in power: 
It is sown a natural body; it is raised a spiritual body. There is a natural body, and there is a spiritual body. 
And so it is written, The first man Adam was made a living soul; the last Adam was made a quickening spirit. 
Howbeit that was not first which is spiritual, but that which is
491, 
The spirit of God hath made me, and the breath of the Almighty hath given me life. 
If thou canst answer me, set thy words in order before me, stand up. 
Behold, I am according to thy wish in God's stead: I also am formed out of the clay. 
Behold, my terror shall not make thee afraid, neither shall my hand be heavy upon thee. 
Surely thou hast spoken in mine hearing, and I have heard the voice of thy words, saying, 
I am clean without transgression, I am innocent; neither is there ini
490,aying pleased Absalom well, and all the elders of Israel. 
Then said Absalom, Call now Hushai the Archite also, and let us hear likewise what he saith. 
And when Hushai was come to Absalom, Absalom spake unto him, saying, Ahithophel hath spoken after this manner: shall we do after his saying? if not; speak thou. 
And Hushai said unto Absalom, The counsel that Ahithophel hath given is not good at this time. 
For, said Hushai, thou knowest thy father and his men, that they be mighty men,
481,hine, but divide it. 
Then the king answered and said, Give her the living child, and in no wise slay it: she is the mother thereof. 
And all Israel heard of the judgment which the king had judged; and they feared the king: for they saw that the wisdom of God was in him, to do judgment. 
So king Solomon was king over all Israel. 
And these were the princes which he had; Azariah the son of Zadok the priest, 
Elihoreph and Ahiah, the sons of Shisha, scribes; Jehoshaphat the son 
674, of them when thou sittest in thine house, and when thou walkest by the way, and when thou liest down, and when thou risest up. 
And thou shalt bind them for a sign upon thine hand, and they shall be as frontlets between thine eyes. 
And thou shalt write them upon the posts of thy house, and on thy gates. 
And it shall be, when the LORD thy God shall have brought thee into the land which he sware unto thy fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, to give thee great and goodly cities, which thou buildedst not, 
And houses full of all good things, which thou filledst not, and wells digged, which thou diggedst not, vineyards and olive trees, which thou plantedst not
707,ethai, Hodijah, Maaseiah, Kelita, Azariah, Jozabad, Hanan, Pelaiah, and the Levites, caused the people to understand the law: and the people stood in their place. 
So they read in the book in the law of God distinctly, and gave the sense, and caused them to understand the reading. 
And Nehemiah, which is the Tirshatha, and Ezra the priest the scribe, and the Levites that taught the people, said unto all the people, This day is holy unto the LORD your God; mourn not, nor weep. For all the people wept, when they heard the words of the law. 
Then he said unto them, Go your way, eat the fat, and drink the sweet, and send portions unto them for whom nothing is prepared: for this day is holy unto our LOR
512,me upon this generation. 
O Jerusalem, Jerusalem, thou that killest the prophets, and stonest them which are sent unto thee, how often would I have gathered thy children together, even as a hen gathereth her chickens under her wings, and ye would not! 
Behold, your house is left unto you desolate. 
For I say unto you, Ye shall not see me henceforth, till ye shall say, Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the Lord. 
And Jesus went out, and departed from the temple: and his disciples came to him for to sh
637,r unto the tabernacle of the LORD shall die: shall we be consumed with dying? 
And the LORD said unto Aaron, Thou and thy sons and thy father's house with thee shall bear the iniquity of the sanctuary: and thou and thy sons with thee shall bear the iniquity of your priesthood. 
And thy brethren also of the tribe of Levi, the tribe of thy father, bring thou with thee, that they may be joined unto thee, and minister unto thee: but thou and thy sons with thee shall minister before the tabernacle of witness. 
And they shall keep thy charge, and the charge of all the tabernacle: only they shall not come nigh the vessels of the sanctua
557,; because it will surely come, it will not tarry. 
Behold, his soul which is lifted up is not upright in him: but the just shall live by his faith. 
Yea also, because he transgresseth by wine, he is a proud man, neither keepeth at home, who enlargeth his desire as hell, and is as death, and cannot be satisfied, but gathereth unto him all nations, and heapeth unto him all people: 
Shall not all these take up a parable against him, and a taunting proverb against him, and say, Woe to him that increaseth that which is not his! how long? and to him that la
698,sake. 
My heart is inditing a good matter: I speak of the things which I have made touching the king: my tongue is the pen of a ready writer. 
Thou art fairer than the children of men: grace is poured into thy lips: therefore God hath blessed thee for ever. 
Gird thy sword upon thy thigh, O most mighty, with thy glory and thy majesty. 
And in thy majesty ride prosperously because of truth and meekness and righteousness; and thy right hand shall teach thee terrible things. 
Thine arrows are sharp in the heart of the king's enemies; whereby the people fall under thee. 
Thy throne, O God, is for ever and ever: the sceptre of thy kingdom is a right sceptre. 
Thou lovest righteousness, and hate
542,, and eat: for unto this time hath it been kept for thee since I said, I have invited the people. So Saul did eat with Samuel that day. 
And when they were come down from the high place into the city, Samuel communed with Saul upon the top of the house. 
And they arose early: and it came to pass about the spring of the day, that Samuel called Saul to the top of the house, saying, Up, that I may send thee away. And Saul arose, and they went out both of them, he and Samuel, abroad. 
And as they were going down to the end of the city, Samu
602,i over the house of Haman. 
And Esther spake yet again before the king, and fell down at his feet, and besought him with tears to put away the mischief of Haman the Agagite, and his device that he had devised against the Jews. 
Then the king held out the golden sceptre toward Esther. So Esther arose, and stood before the king, 
And said, If it please the king, and if I have favour in his sight, and the thing seem right before the king, and I be pleasing in his eyes, let it be written to reverse the letters devised by Haman the son of Hammedatha the Agagite, which he wrote to destroy the Jews whi
488,r they are thine. 
And all mine are thine, and thine are mine; and I am glorified in them. 
And now I am no more in the world, but these are in the world, and I come to thee. Holy Father, keep through thine own name those whom thou hast given me, that they may be one, as we are. 
While I was with them in the world, I kept them in thy name: those that thou gavest me I have kept, and none of them is lost, but the son of perdition; that the scripture might be fulfilled. 
And now come I 
602,e feasts of the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Command the children of Israel, that they bring unto thee pure oil olive beaten for the light, to cause the lamps to burn continually. 
Without the vail of the testimony, in the tabernacle of the congregation, shall Aaron order it from the evening unto the morning before the LORD continually: it shall be a statute for ever in your generations. 
He shall order the lamps upon the pure candlestick before the LORD continually. 
And thou shalt take fine flour, and bake twelve cakes thereof: two tenth deals shall be in one cake. 
And thou 
658,ars from off all faces; and the rebuke of his people shall he take away from off all the earth: for the LORD hath spoken it. 
And it shall be said in that day, Lo, this is our God; we have waited for him, and he will save us: this is the LORD; we have waited for him, we will be glad and rejoice in his salvation. 
For in this mountain shall the hand of the LORD rest, and Moab shall be trodden down under him, even as straw is trodden down for the dunghill. 
And he shall spread forth his hands in the midst of them, as he that swimmeth spreadeth forth his hands to swim: and he shall bring down their pride together with the spoils of their hands. 
And the
671, establish them for ever, and they are exalted. 
And if they be bound in fetters, and be holden in cords of affliction; 
Then he sheweth them their work, and their transgressions that they have exceeded. 
He openeth also their ear to discipline, and commandeth that they return from iniquity. 
If they obey and serve him, they shall spend their days in prosperity, and their years in pleasures. 
But if they obey not, they shall perish by the sword, and they shall die without knowledge. 
But the hypocrites in heart heap up wrath: they cry not when he bindeth them. 
They die in youth, and their life is among the unclean. 
He delivereth the poor in his affliction, and 
559,he gods of the strangers of the land, whither they go to be among them, and will forsake me, and break my covenant which I have made with them. 
Then my anger shall be kindled against them in that day, and I will forsake them, and I will hide my face from them, and they shall be devoured, and many evils and troubles shall befall them; so that they will say in that day, Are not these evils come upon us, because our God is not among us? 
And I will surely hide my face in that day for all the evils which they shall have wrought, in that they are turned unt
514, answer; when I spake, they did not hear: but they did evil before mine eyes, and chose that in which I delighted not. 
Hear the word of the LORD, ye that tremble at his word; Your brethren that hated you, that cast you out for my name's sake, said, Let the LORD be glorified: but he shall appear to your joy, and they shall be ashamed. 
A voice of noise from the city, a voice from the temple, a voice of the LORD that rendereth recompence to his enemies. 
Before she travailed, she brought forth; before her pain
648, eternal life by Jesus Christ our Lord. 
What shall we say then? Shall we continue in sin, that grace may abound? 
God forbid. How shall we, that are dead to sin, live any longer therein? 
Know ye not, that so many of us as were baptized into Jesus Christ were baptized into his death? 
Therefore we are buried with him by baptism into death: that like as Christ was raised up from the dead by the glory of the Father, even so we also should walk in newness of life. 
For if we have been planted together in the likeness of his death, we shall be also in the likeness of his resurrection: 
Knowing this, that our old man is crucified with him, that
482,in shining garments: 
And as they were afraid, and bowed down their faces to the earth, they said unto them, Why seek ye the living among the dead? 
He is not here, but is risen: remember how he spake unto you when he was yet in Galilee, 
Saying, The Son of man must be delivered into the hands of sinful men, and be crucified, and the third day rise again. 
And they remembered his words, 
And returned from the sepulchre, and told all these things unto the eleven, and to all the 
504, Naphtali; he also took Basmath the daughter of Solomon to wife: 
Baanah the son of Hushai was in Asher and in Aloth: 
Jehoshaphat the son of Paruah, in Issachar: 
Shimei the son of Elah, in Benjamin: 
Geber the son of Uri was in the country of Gilead, in the country of Sihon king of the Amorites, and of Og king of Bashan; and he was the only officer which was in the land. 
Judah and Israel were many, as the sand which is by the sea in multitude, eating and drinking, and making merry. 
And Solomon r
602,ntered into a certain village, there met him ten men that were lepers, which stood afar off: 
And they lifted up their voices, and said, Jesus, Master, have mercy on us. 
And when he saw them, he said unto them, Go shew yourselves unto the priests. And it came to pass, that, as they went, they were cleansed. 
And one of them, when he saw that he was healed, turned back, and with a loud voice glorified God, 
And fell down on his face at his feet, giving him thanks: and he was a Samaritan. 
And Jesus answering said, Were there not ten cleansed? but where are the nine? 
There are not found that ret
679,gypt, and the Egyptian into Assyria, and the Egyptians shall serve with the Assyrians. 
In that day shall Israel be the third with Egypt and with Assyria, even a blessing in the midst of the land: 
Whom the LORD of hosts shall bless, saying, Blessed be Egypt my people, and Assyria the work of my hands, and Israel mine inheritance. 
In the year that Tartan came unto Ashdod, (when Sargon the king of Assyria sent him,) and fought against Ashdod, and took it; 
At the same time spake the LORD by Isaiah the son of Amoz, saying, Go and loose the sackcloth from off thy loins, and put off thy shoe from thy foot. And he did so, walking naked and barefoot. 
And the LORD said, Like 
687,priests, and took an oath of them, that they should do according to this promise. 
Also I shook my lap, and said, So God shake out every man from his house, and from his labour, that performeth not this promise, even thus be he shaken out, and emptied. And all the congregation said, Amen, and praised the LORD. And the people did according to this promise. 
Moreover from the time that I was appointed to be their governor in the land of Judah, from the twentieth year even unto the two and thirtieth year of Artaxerxes the king, that is, twelve years, I and my brethren have not eaten the bread of the governor. 
But the former governors that had been before me were chargeable unto th
712, 
He is gone up to Bajith, and to Dibon, the high places, to weep: Moab shall howl over Nebo, and over Medeba: on all their heads shall be baldness, and every beard cut off. 
In their streets they shall gird themselves with sackcloth: on the tops of their houses, and in their streets, every one shall howl, weeping abundantly. 
And Heshbon shall cry, and Elealeh: their voice shall be heard even unto Jahaz: therefore the armed soldiers of Moab shall cry out; his life shall be grievous unto him. 
My heart shall cry out for Moab; his fugitives shall flee unto Zoar, an heifer of three years old: for by the mounting up of Luhith with weeping shall they go it up; for in the way of Horonaim they shall raise up 
517,e shut up unto the day of their death, living in widowhood. 
Then said the king to Amasa, Assemble me the men of Judah within three days, and be thou here present. 
So Amasa went to assemble the men of Judah: but he tarried longer than the set time which he had appointed him. 
And David said to Abishai, Now shall Sheba the son of Bichri do us more harm than did Absalom: take thou thy lord's servants, and pursue after him, lest he get him fenced cities, and escape us. 
And there went out after him Joab's men, and
639,r and supplications, with fasting, and sackcloth, and ashes: 
And I prayed unto the LORD my God, and made my confession, and said, O Lord, the great and dreadful God, keeping the covenant and mercy to them that love him, and to them that keep his commandments; 
We have sinned, and have committed iniquity, and have done wickedly, and have rebelled, even by departing from thy precepts and from thy judgments: 
Neither have we hearkened unto thy servants the prophets, which spake in thy name to our kings, our princes, and our fathers, and to all the people of the land. 
O LORD, righteousness belongeth unto thee, but unto us confusion o
650,at thou art mindful of him? or the son of man that thou visitest him? 
Thou madest him a little lower than the angels; thou crownedst him with glory and honour, and didst set him over the works of thy hands: 
Thou hast put all things in subjection under his feet. For in that he put all in subjection under him, he left nothing that is not put under him. But now we see not yet all things put under him. 
But we see Jesus, who was made a little lower than the angels for the suffering of death, crowned with glory and honour; that he by the grace of God should taste death for every man. 
For it became him, for whom are all things, and by whom are a
511,th the world: and this is the victory that overcometh the world, even our faith. 
Who is he that overcometh the world, but he that believeth that Jesus is the Son of God? 
This is he that came by water and blood, even Jesus Christ; not by water only, but by water and blood. And it is the Spirit that beareth witness, because the Spirit is truth. 
For there are three that bear record in heaven, the Father, the Word, and the Holy Ghost: and these three are one. 
And there are three that bear witness in earth,
542,naan, for the corn which they bought: and Joseph brought the money into Pharaoh's house. 
And when money failed in the land of Egypt, and in the land of Canaan, all the Egyptians came unto Joseph, and said, Give us bread: for why should we die in thy presence? for the money faileth. 
And Joseph said, Give your cattle; and I will give you for your cattle, if money fail. 
And they brought their cattle unto Joseph: and Joseph gave them bread in exchange for horses, and for the flocks, and for the cattle of the herds, and for the asses: and
590,y set in it four rows of stones: the first row was a sardius, a topaz, and a carbuncle: this was the first row. 
And the second row, an emerald, a sapphire, and a diamond. 
And the third row, a ligure, an agate, and an amethyst. 
And the fourth row, a beryl, an onyx, and a jasper: they were inclosed in ouches of gold in their inclosings. 
And the stones were according to the names of the children of Israel, twelve, according to their names, like the engravings of a signet, every one with his name, according to the twelve tribes. 
And they made upon the breastplate chains at the ends,
594,men; we are no spies: 
We be twelve brethren, sons of our father; one is not, and the youngest is this day with our father in the land of Canaan. 
And the man, the lord of the country, said unto us, Hereby shall I know that ye are true men; leave one of your brethren here with me, and take food for the famine of your households, and be gone: 
And bring your youngest brother unto me: then shall I know that ye are no spies, but that ye are true men: so will I deliver you your brother, and ye shall traffick in the land. 
And it came to pass as they emptied their sacks, that, behold, every m
695,nd fetch olive branches, and pine branches, and myrtle branches, and palm branches, and branches of thick trees, to make booths, as it is written. 
So the people went forth, and brought them, and made themselves booths, every one upon the roof of his house, and in their courts, and in the courts of the house of God, and in the street of the water gate, and in the street of the gate of Ephraim. 
And all the congregation of them that were come again out of the captivity made booths, and sat under the booths: for since the days of Jeshua the son of Nun unto that day had not the children of Israel done so. And there was very great gladness. 
Also day by day, from the first day unto the last
630,ng two tenth deals of flour mingled with the third part of an hin of oil. 
And for a drink offering thou shalt offer the third part of an hin of wine, for a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And when thou preparest a bullock for a burnt offering, or for a sacrifice in performing a vow, or peace offerings unto the LORD: 
Then shall he bring with a bullock a meat offering of three tenth deals of flour mingled with half an hin of oil. 
And thou shalt bring for a drink offering half an hin of wine, for an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
Thus shall it be done for one bullock, or for one ram, or for a lamb, o
664,ad examined me, would have let me go, because there was no cause of death in me. 
But when the Jews spake against it, I was constrained to appeal unto Caesar; not that I had ought to accuse my nation of. 
For this cause therefore have I called for you, to see you, and to speak with you: because that for the hope of Israel I am bound with this chain. 
And they said unto him, We neither received letters out of Judaea concerning thee, neither any of the brethren that came shewed or spake any harm of thee. 
But we desire to hear of thee what thou thinkest: for as concerning this sect, we know that every where it is spoken against. 
And when they had appointed 
487,generation to generation. 
For I will cleanse their blood that I have not cleansed: for the LORD dwelleth in Zion. 
The words of Amos, who was among the herdmen of Tekoa, which he saw concerning Israel in the days of Uzziah king of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam the son of Joash king of Israel, two years before the earthquake. 
And he said, The LORD will roar from Zion, and utter his voice from Jerusalem; and the habitations of the shepherds shall mourn, and the top of Carmel sh
605, wicked ones thy ways. 
Also in thy skirts is found the blood of the souls of the poor innocents: I have not found it by secret search, but upon all these. 
Yet thou sayest, Because I am innocent, surely his anger shall turn from me. Behold, I will plead with thee, because thou sayest, I have not sinned. 
Why gaddest thou about so much to change thy way? thou also shalt be ashamed of Egypt, as thou wast ashamed of Assyria. 
Yea, thou shalt go forth from him, and thine hands upon thine head: for the LORD hath rejected thy confidences, and thou shalt not prosper in them. 
They say, If a man put away 
489,s wife, as the LORD hath spoken. 
And it came to pass, that, when Abraham's servant heard their words, he worshipped the LORD, bowing himself to the earth. 
And the servant brought forth jewels of silver, and jewels of gold, and raiment, and gave them to Rebekah: he gave also to her brother and to her mother precious things. 
And they did eat and drink, he and the men that were with him, and tarried all night; and they rose up in the morning, and he said, Send me away unto my master. 
633,Israel went every man unto his inheritance to possess the land. 
And the people served the LORD all the days of Joshua, and all the days of the elders that outlived Joshua, who had seen all the great works of the LORD, that he did for Israel. 
And Joshua the son of Nun, the servant of the LORD, died, being an hundred and ten years old. 
And they buried him in the border of his inheritance in Timnathheres, in the mount of Ephraim, on the north side of the hill Gaash. 
And also all that generation were gathered unto their fathers: and there arose another generation after them, which knew not the LORD, nor yet the works which he
712,ranates, and of the figs. 
The place was called the brook Eshcol, because of the cluster of grapes which the children of Israel cut down from thence. 
And they returned from searching of the land after forty days. 
And they went and came to Moses, and to Aaron, and to all the congregation of the children of Israel, unto the wilderness of Paran, to Kadesh; and brought back word unto them, and unto all the congregation, and shewed them the fruit of the land. 
And they told him, and said, We came unto the land whither thou sentest us, and surely it floweth with milk and honey; and this is the fruit of it. 
Nevertheless the people be strong that dwell in the land, and the cities are walled, and very great: 
625,er of the house of Rechab. 
Now these were the sons of David, which were born unto him in Hebron; the firstborn Amnon, of Ahinoam the Jezreelitess; the second Daniel, of Abigail the Carmelitess: 
The third, Absalom the son of Maachah the daughter of Talmai king of Geshur: the fourth, Adonijah the son of Haggith: 
The fifth, Shephatiah of Abital: the sixth, Ithream by Eglah his wife. 
These six were born unto him in Hebron; and there he reigned seven years and six months: and in Jerusalem he reigned thirty and three years. 
And these were born unto him in Jerusalem; Shimea, and Shobab, and Nathan, and Solomon, four, of
549, cast down, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD, Stand ye in the ways, and see, and ask for the old paths, where is the good way, and walk therein, and ye shall find rest for your souls. But they said, We will not walk therein. 
Also I set watchmen over you, saying, Hearken to the sound of the trumpet. But they said, We will not hearken. 
Therefore hear, ye nations, and know, O congregation, what is among them. 
Hear, O earth: behold, I will bring evil upon this people, even the fruit of their thoughts, because they have not hearkened unto my
540,paths of uprightness, to walk in the ways of darkness; 
Who rejoice to do evil, and delight in the frowardness of the wicked; 
Whose ways are crooked, and they froward in their paths: 
To deliver thee from the strange woman, even from the stranger which flattereth with her words; 
Which forsaketh the guide of her youth, and forgetteth the covenant of her God. 
For her house inclineth unto death, and her paths unto the dead. 
None that go unto her return again, neither take they hold of the paths of life. 
That thou mayest walk in the 
583,were slaying them, and I was left, that I fell upon my face, and cried, and said, Ah Lord GOD! wilt thou destroy all the residue of Israel in thy pouring out of thy fury upon Jerusalem? 
Then said he unto me, The iniquity of the house of Israel and Judah is exceeding great, and the land is full of blood, and the city full of perverseness: for they say, The LORD hath forsaken the earth, and the LORD seeth not. 
And as for me also, mine eye shall not spare, neither will I have pity, but I will recompense their way upon their head. 
And, behold, the man clothed with linen, which 
515,r year; and David enquired of the LORD. And the LORD answered, It is for Saul, and for his bloody house, because he slew the Gibeonites. 
And the king called the Gibeonites, and said unto them; (now the Gibeonites were not of the children of Israel, but of the remnant of the Amorites; and the children of Israel had sworn unto them: and Saul sought to slay them in his zeal to the children of Israel and Judah.) 
Wherefore David said unto the Gibeonites, What shall I do for you? and wherewith shall I make the ato
525,buried him in the city of David among the kings, because he had done good in Israel, both toward God, and toward his house. 
Now after the death of Jehoiada came the princes of Judah, and made obeisance to the king. Then the king hearkened unto them. 
And they left the house of the LORD God of their fathers, and served groves and idols: and wrath came upon Judah and Jerusalem for this their trespass. 
Yet he sent prophets to them, to bring them again unto the LORD; and they testified against them: but they would not giv
658,r on the north, and in Issachar on the east. 
And Manasseh had in Issachar and in Asher Bethshean and her towns, and Ibleam and her towns, and the inhabitants of Dor and her towns, and the inhabitants of Endor and her towns, and the inhabitants of Taanach and her towns, and the inhabitants of Megiddo and her towns, even three countries. 
Yet the children of Manasseh could not drive out the inhabitants of those cities; but the Canaanites would dwell in that land. 
Yet it came to pass, when the children of Israel were waxen strong, that they put the Canaanites to tribute, but did not utterly drive them out. 
And the children of Joseph spake unto Joshua
687,said, Behold, I have heard that there is corn in Egypt: get you down thither, and buy for us from thence; that we may live, and not die. 
And Joseph's ten brethren went down to buy corn in Egypt. 
But Benjamin, Joseph's brother, Jacob sent not with his brethren; for he said, Lest peradventure mischief befall him. 
And the sons of Israel came to buy corn among those that came: for the famine was in the land of Canaan. 
And Joseph was the governor over the land, and he it was that sold to all the people of the land: and Joseph's brethren came, and bowed down themselves before him with their faces to the earth. 
And Joseph saw his brethren, and he knew them, but made himself strang
546, of their sanctuary, and had no compassion upon young man or maiden, old man, or him that stooped for age: he gave them all into his hand. 
And all the vessels of the house of God, great and small, and the treasures of the house of the LORD, and the treasures of the king, and of his princes; all these he brought to Babylon. 
And they burnt the house of God, and brake down the wall of Jerusalem, and burnt all the palaces thereof with fire, and destroyed all the goodly vessels thereof. 
And them that had escaped from the sword carried he away
631,e counsel of Ahithophel into foolishness. 
And it came to pass, that when David was come to the top of the mount, where he worshipped God, behold, Hushai the Archite came to meet him with his coat rent, and earth upon his head: 
Unto whom David said, If thou passest on with me, then thou shalt be a burden unto me: 
But if thou return to the city, and say unto Absalom, I will be thy servant, O king; as I have been thy father's servant hitherto, so will I now also be thy servant: then mayest thou for me defeat the counsel of Ahithophel. 
And hast thou not there with thee Zadok and Abiathar the priests? therefore it shall be, 
493,of him a sign from heaven. 
But he, knowing their thoughts, said unto them, Every kingdom divided against itself is brought to desolation; and a house divided against a house falleth. 
If Satan also be divided against himself, how shall his kingdom stand? because ye say that I cast out devils through Beelzebub. 
And if I by Beelzebub cast out devils, by whom do your sons cast them out? therefore shall they be your judges. 
But if I with the finger of God cast out devils, no doubt the king
684,ers of Archi to Ataroth, 
And goeth down westward to the coast of Japhleti, unto the coast of Bethhoron the nether, and to Gezer; and the goings out thereof are at the sea. 
So the children of Joseph, Manasseh and Ephraim, took their inheritance. 
And the border of the children of Ephraim according to their families was thus: even the border of their inheritance on the east side was Atarothaddar, unto Bethhoron the upper; 
And the border went out toward the sea to Michmethah on the north side; and the border went about eastward unto Taanathshiloh, and passed by it on the east to Janohah; 
And it went down from Janohah to Ataroth, and to Naarath, and came to Jericho, and went 
512, followers together of me, and mark them which walk so as ye have us for an ensample. 
(For many walk, of whom I have told you often, and now tell you even weeping, that they are the enemies of the cross of Christ: 
Whose end is destruction, whose God is their belly, and whose glory is in their shame, who mind earthly things.) 
For our conversation is in heaven; from whence also we look for the Saviour, the Lord Jesus Christ: 
Who shall change our vile body, that it may be fashioned like unto his glorious b
575, let it go again to his own place, that it slay us not, and our people: for there was a deadly destruction throughout all the city; the hand of God was very heavy there. 
And the men that died not were smitten with the emerods: and the cry of the city went up to heaven. 
And the ark of the LORD was in the country of the Philistines seven months. 
And the Philistines called for the priests and the diviners, saying, What shall we do to the ark of the LORD? tell us wherewith we shall send it to his place. 
And they said, If ye send away the ark of the God of Israel, send 
654,d them, saying, Thus shall ye speak unto my lord Esau; Thy servant Jacob saith thus, I have sojourned with Laban, and stayed there until now: 
And I have oxen, and asses, flocks, and menservants, and womenservants: and I have sent to tell my lord, that I may find grace in thy sight. 
And the messengers returned to Jacob, saying, We came to thy brother Esau, and also he cometh to meet thee, and four hundred men with him. 
Then Jacob was greatly afraid and distressed: and he divided the people that was with him, and the flocks, and herds, and the camels, into two bands; 
And said, If Esau come to the one company, and smite it, then the other compan
681,and hatest thy friends. For thou hast declared this day, that thou regardest neither princes nor servants: for this day I perceive, that if Absalom had lived, and all we had died this day, then it had pleased thee well. 
Now therefore arise, go forth, and speak comfortably unto thy servants: for I swear by the LORD, if thou go not forth, there will not tarry one with thee this night: and that will be worse unto thee than all the evil that befell thee from thy youth until now. 
Then the king arose, and sat in the gate. And they told unto all the people, saying, Behold, the king doth sit in the gate. And all the people came before the king: for Israel had fled every man to h
580,rding unto the days that ye abode there. 
Then we turned, and took our journey into the wilderness by the way of the Red sea, as the LORD spake unto me: and we compassed mount Seir many days. 
And the LORD spake unto me, saying, 
Ye have compassed this mountain long enough: turn you northward. 
And command thou the people, saying, Ye are to pass through the coast of your brethren the children of Esau, which dwell in Seir; and they shall be afraid of you: take ye good heed unto yourselves therefore: 
Meddle not with them; for I will not give you of their land, no, not so muc
493,uch the uncleanness of man, whatsoever uncleanness it be that a man shall be defiled withal, and it be hid from him; when he knoweth of it, then he shall be guilty. 
Or if a soul swear, pronouncing with his lips to do evil, or to do good, whatsoever it be that a man shall pronounce with an oath, and it be hid from him; when he knoweth of it, then he shall be guilty in one of these. 
And it shall be, when he shall be guilty in one of these things, that he shall confess that he hath sinned 
605,r two young pigeons. 
And, behold, there was a man in Jerusalem, whose name was Simeon; and the same man was just and devout, waiting for the consolation of Israel: and the Holy Ghost was upon him. 
And it was revealed unto him by the Holy Ghost, that he should not see death, before he had seen the Lord's Christ. 
And he came by the Spirit into the temple: and when the parents brought in the child Jesus, to do for him after the custom of the law, 
Then took he him up in his arms, and blessed God, and said, 
Lord, now lettest thou thy servant depart in peace, according to thy word: 
For mine eyes ha
717,the way of this people, saying, 
Say ye not, A confederacy, to all them to whom this people shall say, A confederacy; neither fear ye their fear, nor be afraid. 
Sanctify the LORD of hosts himself; and let him be your fear, and let him be your dread. 
And he shall be for a sanctuary; but for a stone of stumbling and for a rock of offence to both the houses of Israel, for a gin and for a snare to the inhabitants of Jerusalem. 
And many among them shall stumble, and fall, and be broken, and be snared, and be taken. 
Bind up the testimony, seal the law among my disciples. 
And I will wait upon the LORD, that hideth his face from the house of Jacob, and I will look for him. 
Behold, I and the children whom the L
635, said unto him, Man, thy sins are forgiven thee. 
And the scribes and the Pharisees began to reason, saying, Who is this which speaketh blasphemies? Who can forgive sins, but God alone? 
But when Jesus perceived their thoughts, he answering said unto them, What reason ye in your hearts? 
Whether is easier, to say, Thy sins be forgiven thee; or to say, Rise up and walk? 
But that ye may know that the Son of man hath power upon earth to forgive sins, (he said unto the sick of the palsy,) I say unto thee, Arise, and take up thy couch, and go into thine house. 
And immediately he rose up before them, and took up that whereon he lay
531, speak. 
Now before the feast of the passover, when Jesus knew that his hour was come that he should depart out of this world unto the Father, having loved his own which were in the world, he loved them unto the end. 
And supper being ended, the devil having now put into the heart of Judas Iscariot, Simon's son, to betray him; 
Jesus knowing that the Father had given all things into his hands, and that he was come from God, and went to God; 
He riseth from supper, and laid aside his garments; and took a towel, and girded hims
680,t excel; because thou wentest up to thy father's bed; then defiledst thou it: he went up to my couch. 
Simeon and Levi are brethren; instruments of cruelty are in their habitations. 
O my soul, come not thou into their secret; unto their assembly, mine honour, be not thou united: for in their anger they slew a man, and in their selfwill they digged down a wall. 
Cursed be their anger, for it was fierce; and their wrath, for it was cruel: I will divide them in Jacob, and scatter them in Israel. 
Judah, thou art he whom thy brethren shall praise: thy hand shall be in the neck of thine enemies; thy father's children shall bow down before thee. 
Judah is a lion's whelp: from 
710,behold behind him a ram caught in a thicket by his horns: and Abraham went and took the ram, and offered him up for a burnt offering in the stead of his son. 
And Abraham called the name of that place Jehovahjireh: as it is said to this day, In the mount of the LORD it shall be seen. 
And the angel of the LORD called unto Abraham out of heaven the second time, 
And said, By myself have I sworn, saith the LORD, for because thou hast done this thing, and hast not withheld thy son, thine only son: 
That in blessing I will bless thee, and in multiplying I will multiply thy seed as the stars of the heaven, and as the sand which is upon the sea shore; and thy seed shall possess the gate of his enemies; 
And
599,ring, with his brasen grate, his staves, and all his vessels, the laver and his foot, 
The hangings of the court, his pillars, and their sockets, and the hanging for the door of the court, 
The pins of the tabernacle, and the pins of the court, and their cords, 
The cloths of service, to do service in the holy place, the holy garments for Aaron the priest, and the garments of his sons, to minister in the priest's office. 
And all the congregation of the children of Israel departed from the presence of Moses. 
And they came, every one whose heart stirred him up, and every one whom his spirit m
614,blood of the bullock, and sprinkle it upon the mercy seat, and before the mercy seat: 
And he shall make an atonement for the holy place, because of the uncleanness of the children of Israel, and because of their transgressions in all their sins: and so shall he do for the tabernacle of the congregation, that remaineth among them in the midst of their uncleanness. 
And there shall be no man in the tabernacle of the congregation when he goeth in to make an atonement in the holy place, until he come out, and have made an atonement for himself, and for his household, and for all the congregation of Israel. 
An
523,ce the iniquity, that they may be taken. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because ye have made your iniquity to be remembered, in that your transgressions are discovered, so that in all your doings your sins do appear; because, I say, that ye are come to remembrance, ye shall be taken with the hand. 
And thou, profane wicked prince of Israel, whose day is come, when iniquity shall have an end, 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Remove the diadem, and take off the crown: this shall not be the same: exalt him that is low, and
496,hat the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, take up a lamentation for Pharaoh king of Egypt, and say unto him, Thou art like a young lion of the nations, and thou art as a whale in the seas: and thou camest forth with thy rivers, and troubledst the waters with thy feet, and fouledst their rivers. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will therefore spread out my net over thee with a company of many people; and they shall bring thee up in my net. 
Then will I leave thee upon the land, I
534, where it is spoken against. 
And when they had appointed him a day, there came many to him into his lodging; to whom he expounded and testified the kingdom of God, persuading them concerning Jesus, both out of the law of Moses, and out of the prophets, from morning till evening. 
And some believed the things which were spoken, and some believed not. 
And when they agreed not among themselves, they departed, after that Paul had spoken one word, Well spake the Holy Ghost by Esaias the prophet unto our fathers, 
Saying, Go unto th
484,RD of hosts! 
My soul longeth, yea, even fainteth for the courts of the LORD: my heart and my flesh crieth out for the living God. 
Yea, the sparrow hath found an house, and the swallow a nest for herself, where she may lay her young, even thine altars, O LORD of hosts, my King, and my God. 
Blessed are they that dwell in thy house: they will be still praising thee. Selah. 
Blessed is the man whose strength is in thee; in whose heart are the ways of them. 
Who passing through the
662,and Abigail. And the sons of Zeruiah; Abishai, and Joab, and Asahel, three. 
And Abigail bare Amasa: and the father of Amasa was Jether the Ishmeelite. 
And Caleb the son of Hezron begat children of Azubah his wife, and of Jerioth: her sons are these; Jesher, and Shobab, and Ardon. 
And when Azubah was dead, Caleb took unto him Ephrath, which bare him Hur. 
And Hur begat Uri, and Uri begat Bezaleel. 
And afterward Hezron went in to the daughter of Machir the father of Gilead, whom he married when he was threescore years old; and she bare him Segub. 
And Segub begat Jair, who had three and twenty cities in the land of Gilead. 
And he took Geshur, and Aram
530,unto Jeremiah, I am afraid of the Jews that are fallen to the Chaldeans, lest they deliver me into their hand, and they mock me. 
But Jeremiah said, They shall not deliver thee. Obey, I beseech thee, the voice of the LORD, which I speak unto thee: so it shall be well unto thee, and thy soul shall live. 
But if thou refuse to go forth, this is the word that the LORD hath shewed me: 
And, behold, all the women that are left in the king of Judah's house shall be brought forth to the king of Babylon's princes, and those women sh
699,t hand, and as a destruction from the Almighty shall it come. 
Is not the meat cut off before our eyes, yea, joy and gladness from the house of our God? 
The seed is rotten under their clods, the garners are laid desolate, the barns are broken down; for the corn is withered. 
How do the beasts groan! the herds of cattle are perplexed, because they have no pasture; yea, the flocks of sheep are made desolate. 
O LORD, to thee will I cry: for the fire hath devoured the pastures of the wilderness, and the flame hath burned all the trees of the field. 
The beasts of the field cry also unto thee: for the rivers of waters are dried up, and the fire hath devoured the pastures of the wilderness. 
Bl
555,e earth stood up, and the rulers were gathered together against the Lord, and against his Christ. 
For of a truth against thy holy child Jesus, whom thou hast anointed, both Herod, and Pontius Pilate, with the Gentiles, and the people of Israel, were gathered together, 
For to do whatsoever thy hand and thy counsel determined before to be done. 
And now, Lord, behold their threatenings: and grant unto thy servants, that with all boldness they may speak thy word, 
By stretching forth thine hand to heal; and that signs and wonders may be done by the n
533, to deliver thee, and to give up thine enemies before thee; therefore shall thy camp be holy: that he see no unclean thing in thee, and turn away from thee. 
Thou shalt not deliver unto his master the servant which is escaped from his master unto thee: 
He shall dwell with thee, even among you, in that place which he shall choose in one of thy gates, where it liketh him best: thou shalt not oppress him. 
There shall be no whore of the daughters of Israel, nor a sodomite of the sons of Israel. 
Thou shalt not bring the hire of a
616,ord of the LORD came to Elijah the Tishbite, saying, 
Arise, go down to meet Ahab king of Israel, which is in Samaria: behold, he is in the vineyard of Naboth, whither he is gone down to possess it. 
And thou shalt speak unto him, saying, Thus saith the LORD, Hast thou killed, and also taken possession? And thou shalt speak unto him, saying, Thus saith the LORD, In the place where dogs licked the blood of Naboth shall dogs lick thy blood, even thine. 
And Ahab said to Elijah, Hast thou found me, O mine enemy? And he answered, I have found thee: because thou hast sold thyself to work evil in the sight of the L
593,h thou wouldest needs be gone, because thou sore longedst after thy father's house, yet wherefore hast thou stolen my gods? 
And Jacob answered and said to Laban, Because I was afraid: for I said, Peradventure thou wouldest take by force thy daughters from me. 
With whomsoever thou findest thy gods, let him not live: before our brethren discern thou what is thine with me, and take it to thee. For Jacob knew not that Rachel had stolen them. 
And Laban went into Jacob's tent, and into Leah's tent, and into the two maidservants' tents; but he found them not. Then went he out of Leah's tent
652,fter this did Jehoshaphat king of Judah join himself with Ahaziah king of Israel, who did very wickedly: 
And he joined himself with him to make ships to go to Tarshish: and they made the ships in Eziongaber. 
Then Eliezer the son of Dodavah of Mareshah prophesied against Jehoshaphat, saying, Because thou hast joined thyself with Ahaziah, the LORD hath broken thy works. And the ships were broken, that they were not able to go to Tarshish. 
Now Jehoshaphat slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David. And Jehoram his son reigned in his stead. 
And he had brethren the sons of Jehoshaphat, Azariah, and Jehiel, and Z
557,the charge of the sanctuary. 
Of Merari was the family of the Mahlites, and the family of the Mushites: these are the families of Merari. 
And those that were numbered of them, according to the number of all the males, from a month old and upward, were six thousand and two hundred. 
And the chief of the house of the father of the families of Merari was Zuriel the son of Abihail: these shall pitch on the side of the tabernacle northward. 
And under the custody and charge of the sons of Merari shall be the boards of the tabernacle, and the bars thereof,
676, 
Be not hasty to go out of his sight: stand not in an evil thing; for he doeth whatsoever pleaseth him. 
Where the word of a king is, there is power: and who may say unto him, What doest thou? 
Whoso keepeth the commandment shall feel no evil thing: and a wise man's heart discerneth both time and judgment. 
Because to every purpose there is time and judgment, therefore the misery of man is great upon him. 
For he knoweth not that which shall be: for who can tell him when it shall be? 
There is no man that hath power over the spirit to retain the spirit; neither hath he power in the day of death: and there is no discharge in that war; neither shall wickedness deliver 
526,heir brethren, being arrayed in white linen, having cymbals and psalteries and harps, stood at the east end of the altar, and with them an hundred and twenty priests sounding with trumpets:) 
It came even to pass, as the trumpeters and singers were as one, to make one sound to be heard in praising and thanking the LORD; and when they lifted up their voice with the trumpets and cymbals and instruments of musick, and praised the LORD, saying, For he is good; for his mercy endureth for ever: that then the house was filled w
553,nd about, and their cords, and all the instruments of their service, and all that is made for them: so shall they serve. 
At the appointment of Aaron and his sons shall be all the service of the sons of the Gershonites, in all their burdens, and in all their service: and ye shall appoint unto them in charge all their burdens. 
This is the service of the families of the sons of Gershon in the tabernacle of the congregation: and their charge shall be under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest. 
As for the sons of Merari, thou shalt number
538, even the king's daughters, and all the people that remained in Mizpah, whom Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had committed to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam: and Ishmael the son of Nethaniah carried them away captive, and departed to go over to the Ammonites. 
But when Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were with him, heard of all the evil that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah had done, 
Then they took all the men, and went to fight with Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and found him by the great waters tha
516,? 
And God said to Solomon, Because this was in thine heart, and thou hast not asked riches, wealth, or honour, nor the life of thine enemies, neither yet hast asked long life; but hast asked wisdom and knowledge for thyself, that thou mayest judge my people, over whom I have made thee king: 
Wisdom and knowledge is granted unto thee; and I will give thee riches, and wealth, and honour, such as none of the kings have had that have been before thee, neither shall there any after thee have the like. 
Then Solomon
665,parted thence. 
And when he was come into his own country, he taught them in their synagogue, insomuch that they were astonished, and said, Whence hath this man this wisdom, and these mighty works? 
Is not this the carpenter's son? is not his mother called Mary? and his brethren, James, and Joses, and Simon, and Judas? 
And his sisters, are they not all with us? Whence then hath this man all these things? 
And they were offended in him. But Jesus said unto them, A prophet is not without honour, save in his own country, and in his own house. 
And he did not many mighty works there because of their unbelief. 
At that time Herod the tetrarch heard of the fame 
565,my sin. 
But mine enemies are lively, and they are strong: and they that hate me wrongfully are multiplied. 
They also that render evil for good are mine adversaries; because I follow the thing that good is. 
Forsake me not, O LORD: O my God, be not far from me. 
Make haste to help me, O Lord my salvation. 
I said, I will take heed to my ways, that I sin not with my tongue: I will keep my mouth with a bridle, while the wicked is before me. 
I was dumb with silence, I held my peace, even from good; and my sorrow was stirred. 
My heart was hot within me, while 
597,a certain place, and tarried there all night, because the sun was set; and he took of the stones of that place, and put them for his pillows, and lay down in that place to sleep. 
And he dreamed, and behold a ladder set up on the earth, and the top of it reached to heaven: and behold the angels of God ascending and descending on it. 
And, behold, the LORD stood above it, and said, I am the LORD God of Abraham thy father, and the God of Isaac: the land whereon thou liest, to thee will I give it, and to thy seed; 
And thy seed shall be as the dust of the earth, and thou shalt spread abroad to
521,stines round about, to publish it in the house of their idols, and among the people. 
And they put his armour in the house of Ashtaroth: and they fastened his body to the wall of Bethshan. 
And when the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead heard of that which the Philistines had done to Saul; 
All the valiant men arose, and went all night, and took the body of Saul and the bodies of his sons from the wall of Bethshan, and came to Jabesh, and burnt them there. 
And they took their bones, and buried them under a tree at Jabesh
552,r went down to the men which were sent unto him from Cornelius; and said, Behold, I am he whom ye seek: what is the cause wherefore ye are come? 
And they said, Cornelius the centurion, a just man, and one that feareth God, and of good report among all the nation of the Jews, was warned from God by an holy angel to send for thee into his house, and to hear words of thee. 
Then called he them in, and lodged them. And on the morrow Peter went away with them, and certain brethren from Joppa accompanied him. 
And the morrow after they entered into Ca
678,Christ, if we hold the beginning of our confidence stedfast unto the end; 
While it is said, To day if ye will hear his voice, harden not your hearts, as in the provocation. 
For some, when they had heard, did provoke: howbeit not all that came out of Egypt by Moses. 
But with whom was he grieved forty years? was it not with them that had sinned, whose carcases fell in the wilderness? 
And to whom sware he that they should not enter into his rest, but to them that believed not? 
So we see that they could not enter in because of unbelief. 
Let us therefore fear, lest, a promise being left us of entering into his rest, any of you should seem to come short of it. 
For unto
539,is in thine heart. 
And as for thine asses that were lost three days ago, set not thy mind on them; for they are found. And on whom is all the desire of Israel? Is it not on thee, and on all thy father's house? 
And Saul answered and said, Am not I a Benjamite, of the smallest of the tribes of Israel? and my family the least of all the families of the tribe of Benjamin? wherefore then speakest thou so to me? 
And Samuel took Saul and his servant, and brought them into the parlour, and made them sit in the chiefest place among them th
685,king and the princes; and the king did according to the word of Memucan: 
For he sent letters into all the king's provinces, into every province according to the writing thereof, and to every people after their language, that every man should bear rule in his own house, and that it should be published according to the language of every people. 
After these things, when the wrath of king Ahasuerus was appeased, he remembered Vashti, and what she had done, and what was decreed against her. 
Then said the king's servants that ministered unto him, Let there be fair young virgins sought for the king: 
And let the king appoint officers in all the provinces of his kingdom, that they 
633,e congregation of the LORD for ever: 
Because they met you not with bread and with water in the way, when ye came forth out of Egypt; and because they hired against thee Balaam the son of Beor of Pethor of Mesopotamia, to curse thee. 
Nevertheless the LORD thy God would not hearken unto Balaam; but the LORD thy God turned the curse into a blessing unto thee, because the LORD thy God loved thee. 
Thou shalt not seek their peace nor their prosperity all thy days for ever. 
Thou shalt not abhor an Edomite; for he is thy brother: thou shalt not abhor an Egyptian; because thou wast a stranger in his land. 
The children that are be
710,offering and the sacrifices; and the glory of the LORD filled the house. 
And the priests could not enter into the house of the LORD, because the glory of the LORD had filled the LORD's house. 
And when all the children of Israel saw how the fire came down, and the glory of the LORD upon the house, they bowed themselves with their faces to the ground upon the pavement, and worshipped, and praised the LORD, saying, For he is good; for his mercy endureth for ever. 
Then the king and all the people offered sacrifices before the LORD. 
And king Solomon offered a sacrifice of twenty and two thousand oxen, and an hundred and twenty thousand sheep: so the king and all the people dedicated the house of God. 

522,nabas, that he should go as far as Antioch. 
Who, when he came, and had seen the grace of God, was glad, and exhorted them all, that with purpose of heart they would cleave unto the Lord. 
For he was a good man, and full of the Holy Ghost and of faith: and much people was added unto the Lord. 
Then departed Barnabas to Tarsus, for to seek Saul: 
And when he had found him, he brought him unto Antioch. And it came to pass, that a whole year they assembled themselves with the church, and taught much people. And the disc
538,a good work we stone thee not; but for blasphemy; and because that thou, being a man, makest thyself God. 
Jesus answered them, Is it not written in your law, I said, Ye are gods? 
If he called them gods, unto whom the word of God came, and the scripture cannot be broken; 
Say ye of him, whom the Father hath sanctified, and sent into the world, Thou blasphemest; because I said, I am the Son of God? 
If I do not the works of my Father, believe me not. 
But if I do, though ye believe not me, believe the works: that ye may know, and be
627, shall become briers and thorns. 
And on all hills that shall be digged with the mattock, there shall not come thither the fear of briers and thorns: but it shall be for the sending forth of oxen, and for the treading of lesser cattle. 
Moreover the LORD said unto me, Take thee a great roll, and write in it with a man's pen concerning Mahershalalhashbaz. 
And I took unto me faithful witnesses to record, Uriah the priest, and Zechariah the son of Jeberechiah. 
And I went unto the prophetess; and she conceived, and bare a son. Then said the LORD to me, Call his name Mahershalalhashbaz. 
For before the child shall have kno
657, before their face: should I be enquired of at all by them? 
Therefore speak unto them, and say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Every man of the house of Israel that setteth up his idols in his heart, and putteth the stumblingblock of his iniquity before his face, and cometh to the prophet; I the LORD will answer him that cometh according to the multitude of his idols; 
That I may take the house of Israel in their own heart, because they are all estranged from me through their idols. 
Therefore say unto the house of Israel, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Repent, and turn yourselves from your idols; and turn away your faces from all your abominations. 
686, clean, and afterward ye shall come into the camp. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take the sum of the prey that was taken, both of man and of beast, thou, and Eleazar the priest, and the chief fathers of the congregation: 
And divide the prey into two parts; between them that took the war upon them, who went out to battle, and between all the congregation: 
And levy a tribute unto the LORD of the men of war which went out to battle: one soul of five hundred, both of the persons, and of the beeves, and of the asses, and of the sheep: 
Take it of their half, and give it unto Eleazar the priest, for an heave offering of the LORD. 
And of the children of Israel's half, th
670,u hast spoiled many nations, all the remnant of the people shall spoil thee; because of men's blood, and for the violence of the land, of the city, and of all that dwell therein. 
Woe to him that coveteth an evil covetousness to his house, that he may set his nest on high, that he may be delivered from the power of evil! 
Thou hast consulted shame to thy house by cutting off many people, and hast sinned against thy soul. 
For the stone shall cry out of the wall, and the beam out of the timber shall answer it. 
Woe to him that buildeth a town with blood, and stablisheth a city by iniquity! 
Behold, is it not of the LORD of hosts that the people shall labour in th
718,e of Judah, that enter in at these gates to worship the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, Amend your ways and your doings, and I will cause you to dwell in this place. 
Trust ye not in lying words, saying, The temple of the LORD, The temple of the LORD, The temple of the LORD, are these. 
For if ye throughly amend your ways and your doings; if ye throughly execute judgment between a man and his neighbour; 
If ye oppress not the stranger, the fatherless, and the widow, and shed not innocent blood in this place, neither walk after other gods to your hurt: 
Then will I cause you to dwell in this place, in the land that I gave to your fathers, for ever and ever. 
Behold, ye trust in lying wo
629,g had set up. 
Then the princes, the governors, and captains, the judges, the treasurers, the counsellors, the sheriffs, and all the rulers of the provinces, were gathered together unto the dedication of the image that Nebuchadnezzar the king had set up; and they stood before the image that Nebuchadnezzar had set up. 
Then an herald cried aloud, To you it is commanded, O people, nations, and languages, 
That at what time ye hear the sound of the cornet, flute, harp, sackbut, psaltery, dulcimer, and all kinds of musick, ye fall down and worship the golden image that Nebuchadnezzar the king hath set up: 
And whoso falleth n
651, Joab the son of Zeruiah, 
Ira the Ithrite, Gareb the Ithrite, 
Uriah the Hittite, Zabad the son of Ahlai, 
Adina the son of Shiza the Reubenite, a captain of the Reubenites, and thirty with him, 
Hanan the son of Maachah, and Joshaphat the Mithnite, 
Uzzia the Ashterathite, Shama and Jehiel the sons of Hothan the Aroerite, 
Jediael the son of Shimri, and Joha his brother, the Tizite, 
Eliel the Mahavite, and Jeribai, and Joshaviah, the sons of Elnaam, and Ithmah the Moabite, 
Eliel, and Obed, and Jasiel the Mesobaite. 
Now these are they that came to David to Ziklag, while he yet kept himself close because of Saul the son of Kish: and they we
561, which was at the side of the gate, into the holy chambers of the priests, which looked toward the north: and, behold, there was a place on the two sides westward. 
Then said he unto me, This is the place where the priests shall boil the trespass offering and the sin offering, where they shall bake the meat offering; that they bear them not out into the utter court, to sanctify the people. 
Then he brought me forth into the utter court, and caused me to pass by the four corners of the court; and, behold, in every corner of the court there was a court. 
In
530, people and the chief priests and the scribes came together, and led him into their council, saying, 
Art thou the Christ? tell us. And he said unto them, If I tell you, ye will not believe: 
And if I also ask you, ye will not answer me, nor let me go. 
Hereafter shall the Son of man sit on the right hand of the power of God. 
Then said they all, Art thou then the Son of God? And he said unto them, Ye say that I am. 
And they said, What need we any further witness? for we ourselves have heard of his own mouth. 
And the whole
720,e the stays. 
And twelve lions stood there on the one side and on the other upon the six steps: there was not the like made in any kingdom. 
And all king Solomon's drinking vessels were of gold, and all the vessels of the house of the forest of Lebanon were of pure gold; none were of silver: it was nothing accounted of in the days of Solomon. 
For the king had at sea a navy of Tharshish with the navy of Hiram: once in three years came the navy of Tharshish, bringing gold, and silver, ivory, and apes, and peacocks. 
So king Solomon exceeded all the kings of the earth for riches and for wisdom. 
And all the earth sought to Solomon, to hear his wisdom, which God had put in his heart. 
And they brought every man hi
597, of the city by night, by the way of the king's garden, by the gate betwixt the two walls: and he went out the way of the plain. 
But the Chaldeans' army pursued after them, and overtook Zedekiah in the plains of Jericho: and when they had taken him, they brought him up to Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon to Riblah in the land of Hamath, where he gave judgment upon him. 
Then the king of Babylon slew the sons of Zedekiah in Riblah before his eyes: also the king of Babylon slew all the nobles of Judah. 
Moreover he put out Zedekiah's eyes, and bound him with chains, to carry him to Babylon. 
A
506,are written in the story of the book of the kings. And Amaziah his son reigned in his stead. 
Amaziah was twenty and five years old when he began to reign, and he reigned twenty and nine years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was Jehoaddan of Jerusalem. 
And he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD, but not with a perfect heart. 
Now it came to pass, when the kingdom was established to him, that he slew his servants that had killed the king his father. 
But he slew not their children, b
692,ding to his purpose. 
For whom he did foreknow, he also did predestinate to be conformed to the image of his Son, that he might be the firstborn among many brethren. 
Moreover whom he did predestinate, them he also called: and whom he called, them he also justified: and whom he justified, them he also glorified. 
What shall we then say to these things? If God be for us, who can be against us? 
He that spared not his own Son, but delivered him up for us all, how shall he not with him also freely give us all things? 
Who shall lay any thing to the charge of God's elect? It is God that justifieth. 
Who is he that condemneth? It is Christ that died, yea rather, that is risen again, who i
612,ty of death. 
And some began to spit on him, and to cover his face, and to buffet him, and to say unto him, Prophesy: and the servants did strike him with the palms of their hands. 
And as Peter was beneath in the palace, there cometh one of the maids of the high priest: 
And when she saw Peter warming himself, she looked upon him, and said, And thou also wast with Jesus of Nazareth. 
But he denied, saying, I know not, neither understand I what thou sayest. And he went out into the porch; and the cock crew. 
And a maid saw him again, and began to say to them that stood by, This is one of them. 
And he den
553,shall become a spoil to the nations. 
And her daughters which are in the field shall be slain by the sword; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will bring upon Tyrus Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, a king of kings, from the north, with horses, and with chariots, and with horsemen, and companies, and much people. 
He shall slay with the sword thy daughters in the field: and he shall make a fort against thee, and cast a mount against thee, and lift up the buckler against thee. 
And he shall set engines of 
694,ars. 
Then Asa was wroth with the seer, and put him in a prison house; for he was in a rage with him because of this thing. And Asa oppressed some of the people the same time. 
And, behold, the acts of Asa, first and last, lo, they are written in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel. 
And Asa in the thirty and ninth year of his reign was diseased in his feet, until his disease was exceeding great: yet in his disease he sought not to the LORD, but to the physicians. 
And Asa slept with his fathers, and died in the one and fortieth year of his reign. 
And they buried him in his own sepulchres, which he had made for himself in the city of David, and laid him in the bed which was fill
546, The LORD forbid it me, that I should give the inheritance of my fathers unto thee. 
And Ahab came into his house heavy and displeased because of the word which Naboth the Jezreelite had spoken to him: for he had said, I will not give thee the inheritance of my fathers. And he laid him down upon his bed, and turned away his face, and would eat no bread. 
But Jezebel his wife came to him, and said unto him, Why is thy spirit so sad, that thou eatest no bread? 
And he said unto her, Because I spake unto Naboth the Jezreelite, and said unto hi
536,hy holy sabbath, and commandedst them precepts, statutes, and laws, by the hand of Moses thy servant: 
And gavest them bread from heaven for their hunger, and broughtest forth water for them out of the rock for their thirst, and promisedst them that they should go in to possess the land which thou hadst sworn to give them. 
But they and our fathers dealt proudly, and hardened their necks, and hearkened not to thy commandments, 
And refused to obey, neither were mindful of thy wonders that thou didst among them; but hardened their 
587,ow what it was, and why it was. 
So Hatach went forth to Mordecai unto the street of the city, which was before the king's gate. 
And Mordecai told him of all that had happened unto him, and of the sum of the money that Haman had promised to pay to the king's treasuries for the Jews, to destroy them. 
Also he gave him the copy of the writing of the decree that was given at Shushan to destroy them, to shew it unto Esther, and to declare it unto her, and to charge her that she should go in unto the king, to make supplication unto him, and to make request before him for her people. 

533,n atonement for them, and it shall be forgiven them. 
And he shall carry forth the bullock without the camp, and burn him as he burned the first bullock: it is a sin offering for the congregation. 
When a ruler hath sinned, and done somewhat through ignorance against any of the commandments of the LORD his God concerning things which should not be done, and is guilty; 
Or if his sin, wherein he hath sinned, come to his knowledge; he shall bring his offering, a kid of the goats, a male without blemish: 
And he shall lay his hand
521, their charges, and encouraged them to the service of the house of the LORD, 
And said unto the Levites that taught all Israel, which were holy unto the LORD, Put the holy ark in the house which Solomon the son of David king of Israel did build; it shall not be a burden upon your shoulders: serve now the LORD your God, and his people Israel, 
And prepare yourselves by the houses of your fathers, after your courses, according to the writing of David king of Israel, and according to the writing of Solomon his son. 
An
570,is thy countenance fallen? 
If thou doest well, shalt thou not be accepted? and if thou doest not well, sin lieth at the door. And unto thee shall be his desire, and thou shalt rule over him. 
And Cain talked with Abel his brother: and it came to pass, when they were in the field, that Cain rose up against Abel his brother, and slew him. 
And the LORD said unto Cain, Where is Abel thy brother? And he said, I know not: Am I my brother's keeper? 
And he said, What hast thou done? the voice of thy brother's blood crieth unto me from the ground. 
And now art thou curs
617,, and boast themselves in the multitude of their riches; 
None of them can by any means redeem his brother, nor give to God a ransom for him: 
(For the redemption of their soul is precious, and it ceaseth for ever:) 
That he should still live for ever, and not see corruption. 
For he seeth that wise men die, likewise the fool and the brutish person perish, and leave their wealth to others. 
Their inward thought is, that their houses shall continue for ever, and their dwelling places to all generations; they call their lands after their own names. 
Nevertheless man being in honour abideth not: he is like the be
566,between thy seed and her seed; it shall bruise thy head, and thou shalt bruise his heel. 
Unto the woman he said, I will greatly multiply thy sorrow and thy conception; in sorrow thou shalt bring forth children; and thy desire shall be to thy husband, and he shall rule over thee. 
And unto Adam he said, Because thou hast hearkened unto the voice of thy wife, and hast eaten of the tree, of which I commanded thee, saying, Thou shalt not eat of it: cursed is the ground for thy sake; in sorrow shalt thou eat of it all the days of thy life; 
Thorns also and thistle
675,will do to Pharaoh: for with a strong hand shall he let them go, and with a strong hand shall he drive them out of his land. 
And God spake unto Moses, and said unto him, I am the LORD: 
And I appeared unto Abraham, unto Isaac, and unto Jacob, by the name of God Almighty, but by my name JEHOVAH was I not known to them. 
And I have also established my covenant with them, to give them the land of Canaan, the land of their pilgrimage, wherein they were strangers. 
And I have also heard the groaning of the children of Israel, whom the Egyptians keep in bondage; and I have remembered my covenant. 
Wherefore say unto the children of Israel, I am the LORD, and I will bring 
650,rning, It will be foul weather to day: for the sky is red and lowering. O ye hypocrites, ye can discern the face of the sky; but can ye not discern the signs of the times? 
A wicked and adulterous generation seeketh after a sign; and there shall no sign be given unto it, but the sign of the prophet Jonas. And he left them, and departed. 
And when his disciples were come to the other side, they had forgotten to take bread. 
Then Jesus said unto them, Take heed and beware of the leaven of the Pharisees and of the Sadducees. 
And they reasoned among themselves, saying, It is because we have taken no bread. 
Which when Jesus perceived, he said un
641,n iron, and I will make thy hoofs brass: and thou shalt beat in pieces many people: and I will consecrate their gain unto the LORD, and their substance unto the Lord of the whole earth. 
Now gather thyself in troops, O daughter of troops: he hath laid siege against us: they shall smite the judge of Israel with a rod upon the cheek. 
But thou, Bethlehem Ephratah, though thou be little among the thousands of Judah, yet out of thee shall he come forth unto me that is to be ruler in Israel; whose goings forth have been from of old, from everlasting. 
Therefore will he give them up, until the time that she which travaileth hath brought fo
566,because of these abominations the LORD thy God doth drive them out from before thee. 
Thou shalt be perfect with the LORD thy God. 
For these nations, which thou shalt possess, hearkened unto observers of times, and unto diviners: but as for thee, the LORD thy God hath not suffered thee so to do. 
The LORD thy God will raise up unto thee a Prophet from the midst of thee, of thy brethren, like unto me; unto him ye shall hearken; 
According to all that thou desiredst of the LORD thy God in Horeb in the day of the assembly, saying, Let me not hear again the voice
564, trust in a lie. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will cast thee from off the face of the earth: this year thou shalt die, because thou hast taught rebellion against the LORD. 
So Hananiah the prophet died the same year in the seventh month. 
Now these are the words of the letter that Jeremiah the prophet sent from Jerusalem unto the residue of the elders which were carried away captives, and to the priests, and to the prophets, and to all the people whom Nebuchadnezzar had carried away captive from Jerusalem to Babylon; 
(After that Jeconiah the ki
611,alled Peter, and Andrew his brother, casting a net into the sea: for they were fishers. 
And he saith unto them, Follow me, and I will make you fishers of men. 
And they straightway left their nets, and followed him. 
And going on from thence, he saw other two brethren, James the son of Zebedee, and John his brother, in a ship with Zebedee their father, mending their nets; and he called them. 
And they immediately left the ship and their father, and followed him. 
And Jesus went about all Galilee, teaching in their synagogues, and preaching the gospel of the kingdom, and healing all manner of sickness an
633,the towns thereof, even threescore cities. All these belonged to the sons of Machir the father of Gilead. 
And after that Hezron was dead in Calebephratah, then Abiah Hezron's wife bare him Ashur the father of Tekoa. 
And the sons of Jerahmeel the firstborn of Hezron were, Ram the firstborn, and Bunah, and Oren, and Ozem, and Ahijah. 
Jerahmeel had also another wife, whose name was Atarah; she was the mother of Onam. 
And the sons of Ram the firstborn of Jerahmeel were, Maaz, and Jamin, and Eker. 
And the sons of Onam were, Shammai, and Jada. And the sons of Shammai; Nadab and Abishur. 
And the name of the wife of Abishur was
601,very city where we have preached the word of the LORD, and see how they do. 
And Barnabas determined to take with them John, whose surname was Mark. 
But Paul thought not good to take him with them, who departed from them from Pamphylia, and went not with them to the work. 
And the contention was so sharp between them, that they departed asunder one from the other: and so Barnabas took Mark, and sailed unto Cyprus; 
And Paul chose Silas, and departed, being recommended by the brethren unto the grace of God. 
And he went through Syria and Cilicia, confirming the churches. 
Then came he to Derbe 
607,ol when he is filled with meat; 
For an odious woman when she is married; and an handmaid that is heir to her mistress. 
There be four things which are little upon the earth, but they are exceeding wise: 
The ants are a people not strong, yet they prepare their meat in the summer; 
The conies are but a feeble folk, yet make they their houses in the rocks; 
The locusts have no king, yet go they forth all of them by bands; 
The spider taketh hold with her hands, and is in kings' palaces. 
There be three things which go well, yea, four are comely in going: 
A lion which is strongest among beasts, and tu
602,bles, even all the judges of the earth. 
I love them that love me; and those that seek me early shall find me. 
Riches and honour are with me; yea, durable riches and righteousness. 
My fruit is better than gold, yea, than fine gold; and my revenue than choice silver. 
I lead in the way of righteousness, in the midst of the paths of judgment: 
That I may cause those that love me to inherit substance; and I will fill their treasures. 
The LORD possessed me in the beginning of his way, before his works of old. 
I was set up from everlasting, from the beginning, or ever the earth was. 
When there w
663,, and I will perform it, that I will keep thy righteous judgments. 
I am afflicted very much: quicken me, O LORD, according unto thy word. 
Accept, I beseech thee, the freewill offerings of my mouth, O LORD, and teach me thy judgments. 
My soul is continually in my hand: yet do I not forget thy law. 
The wicked have laid a snare for me: yet I erred not from thy precepts. 
Thy testimonies have I taken as an heritage for ever: for they are the rejoicing of my heart. 
I have inclined mine heart to perform thy statutes alway, even unto the end. 
I hate vain thoughts: but thy law do I love. 
Thou art my hiding place and my shield: I hope in thy word. 
Depart f
563,min, Naphtali, Gad, and Asher. 
The sons of Judah; Er, and Onan, and Shelah: which three were born unto him of the daughter of Shua the Canaanitess. And Er, the firstborn of Judah, was evil in the sight of the LORD; and he slew him. 
And Tamar his daughter in law bore him Pharez and Zerah. All the sons of Judah were five. 
The sons of Pharez; Hezron, and Hamul. 
And the sons of Zerah; Zimri, and Ethan, and Heman, and Calcol, and Dara: five of them in all. 
And the sons of Carmi; Achar, the troubler of Israel, who transgressed in the thing accursed. 
And the
603,ethren the Jews. 
For there were that said, We, our sons, and our daughters, are many: therefore we take up corn for them, that we may eat, and live. 
Some also there were that said, We have mortgaged our lands, vineyards, and houses, that we might buy corn, because of the dearth. 
There were also that said, We have borrowed money for the king's tribute, and that upon our lands and vineyards. 
Yet now our flesh is as the flesh of our brethren, our children as their children: and, lo, we bring into bondage our sons and our daughters to be servants, and some of our daughters are brought unto bondag
660,nd put my sword in his hand: but I will break Pharaoh's arms, and he shall groan before him with the groanings of a deadly wounded man. 
But I will strengthen the arms of the king of Babylon, and the arms of Pharaoh shall fall down; and they shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall put my sword into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall stretch it out upon the land of Egypt. 
And I will scatter the Egyptians among the nations, and disperse them among the countries; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
And it came to pass in the eleventh year, in the third month, in the first day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me, sayin
569,ep: and a great number of priests sanctified themselves. 
And all the congregation of Judah, with the priests and the Levites, and all the congregation that came out of Israel, and the strangers that came out of the land of Israel, and that dwelt in Judah, rejoiced. 
So there was great joy in Jerusalem: for since the time of Solomon the son of David king of Israel there was not the like in Jerusalem. 
Then the priests the Levites arose and blessed the people: and their voice was heard, and their prayer came up to his holy dwelling place, even unto heaven. 
Now wh
559,t rise, and stand upon thy feet: for I have appeared unto thee for this purpose, to make thee a minister and a witness both of these things which thou hast seen, and of those things in the which I will appear unto thee; 
Delivering thee from the people, and from the Gentiles, unto whom now I send thee, 
To open their eyes, and to turn them from darkness to light, and from the power of Satan unto God, that they may receive forgiveness of sins, and inheritance among them which are sanctified by faith that is in me. 
Whereupon, O king Agrippa, I was not di
575,u art polluted with their idols. 
Thou hast walked in the way of thy sister; therefore will I give her cup into thine hand. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Thou shalt drink of thy sister's cup deep and large: thou shalt be laughed to scorn and had in derision; it containeth much. 
Thou shalt be filled with drunkenness and sorrow, with the cup of astonishment and desolation, with the cup of thy sister Samaria. 
Thou shalt even drink it and suck it out, and thou shalt break the sherds thereof, and pluck off thine own breasts: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD. 
Therefor
579,rding to thy name, O God, so is thy praise unto the ends of the earth: thy right hand is full of righteousness. 
Let mount Zion rejoice, let the daughters of Judah be glad, because of thy judgments. 
Walk about Zion, and go round about her: tell the towers thereof. 
Mark ye well her bulwarks, consider her palaces; that ye may tell it to the generation following. 
For this God is our God for ever and ever: he will be our guide even unto death. 
Hear this, all ye people; give ear, all ye inhabitants of the world: 
Both low and high, rich and poor, together. 
My mouth shall s
685, of the covenant before the people; 
And as they that bare the ark were come unto Jordan, and the feet of the priests that bare the ark were dipped in the brim of the water, (for Jordan overfloweth all his banks all the time of harvest,) 
That the waters which came down from above stood and rose up upon an heap very far from the city Adam, that is beside Zaretan: and those that came down toward the sea of the plain, even the salt sea, failed, and were cut off: and the people passed over right against Jericho. 
And the priests that bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD stood firm on dry ground in the midst of Jordan, and all the Israelites passed over on dry ground, until al
613,e covenant that was found in the house of the LORD. 
And the king stood in his place, and made a covenant before the LORD, to walk after the LORD, and to keep his commandments, and his testimonies, and his statutes, with all his heart, and with all his soul, to perform the words of the covenant which are written in this book. 
And he caused all that were present in Jerusalem and Benjamin to stand to it. And the inhabitants of Jerusalem did according to the covenant of God, the God of their fathers. 
And Josiah took away all the abominations out of all the countries that pertained to the children of Israel,
516, have committed fornication with her, and the merchants of the earth are waxed rich through the abundance of her delicacies. 
And I heard another voice from heaven, saying, Come out of her, my people, that ye be not partakers of her sins, and that ye receive not of her plagues. 
For her sins have reached unto heaven, and God hath remembered her iniquities. 
Reward her even as she rewarded you, and double unto her double according to her works: in the cup which she hath filled fill to her double. 
How much she h
557,way to the high priest: and with him were assembled all the chief priests and the elders and the scribes. 
And Peter followed him afar off, even into the palace of the high priest: and he sat with the servants, and warmed himself at the fire. 
And the chief priests and all the council sought for witness against Jesus to put him to death; and found none. 
For many bare false witness against him, but their witness agreed not together. 
And there arose certain, and bare false witness against him, saying, 
We heard him say, I will destroy this temple that
607,ds and ten horns, and upon his horns ten crowns, and upon his heads the name of blasphemy. 
And the beast which I saw was like unto a leopard, and his feet were as the feet of a bear, and his mouth as the mouth of a lion: and the dragon gave him his power, and his seat, and great authority. 
And I saw one of his heads as it were wounded to death; and his deadly wound was healed: and all the world wondered after the beast. 
And they worshipped the dragon which gave power unto the beast: and they worshipped the beast, saying, Who is like unto the beast? who is able to make war with him? 
And there was 
520, above all gods. 
But who is able to build him an house, seeing the heaven and heaven of heavens cannot contain him? who am I then, that I should build him an house, save only to burn sacrifice before him? 
Send me now therefore a man cunning to work in gold, and in silver, and in brass, and in iron, and in purple, and crimson, and blue, and that can skill to grave with the cunning men that are with me in Judah and in Jerusalem, whom David my father did provide. 
Send me also cedar trees, fir trees, and algum trees
486,I require at thine hand. 
Nevertheless, if thou warn the wicked of his way to turn from it; if he do not turn from his way, he shall die in his iniquity; but thou hast delivered thy soul. 
Therefore, O thou son of man, speak unto the house of Israel; Thus ye speak, saying, If our transgressions and our sins be upon us, and we pine away in them, how should we then live? 
Say unto them, As I live, saith the Lord GOD, I have no pleasure in the death of the wicked; but that the wicked 
713,d the LORD said unto me, Arise, take thy journey before the people, that they may go in and possess the land, which I sware unto their fathers to give unto them. 
And now, Israel, what doth the LORD thy God require of thee, but to fear the LORD thy God, to walk in all his ways, and to love him, and to serve the LORD thy God with all thy heart and with all thy soul, 
To keep the commandments of the LORD, and his statutes, which I command thee this day for thy good? 
Behold, the heaven and the heaven of heavens is the LORD's thy God, the earth also, with all that therein is. 
Only the LORD had a delight in thy fathers to love them, and he chose their seed after them, even you above all people, as it is thi
690,rincipal thing; therefore get wisdom: and with all thy getting get understanding. 
Exalt her, and she shall promote thee: she shall bring thee to honour, when thou dost embrace her. 
She shall give to thine head an ornament of grace: a crown of glory shall she deliver to thee. 
Hear, O my son, and receive my sayings; and the years of thy life shall be many. 
I have taught thee in the way of wisdom; I have led thee in right paths. 
When thou goest, thy steps shall not be straitened; and when thou runnest, thou shalt not stumble. 
Take fast hold of instruction; let her not go: keep her; for she is thy life. 
Enter not into the path of the wicked, and go not in the way of evil men. 
A
638, of trouble. 
And they that know thy name will put their trust in thee: for thou, LORD, hast not forsaken them that seek thee. 
Sing praises to the LORD, which dwelleth in Zion: declare among the people his doings. 
When he maketh inquisition for blood, he remembereth them: he forgetteth not the cry of the humble. 
Have mercy upon me, O LORD; consider my trouble which I suffer of them that hate me, thou that liftest me up from the gates of death: 
That I may shew forth all thy praise in the gates of the daughter of Zion: I will rejoice in thy salvation. 
The heathen are sunk down in the pit that they made: in the net which they hi
600,that is upon the bank of the river Arnon, and the city that is in the midst of the river, and all the plain of Medeba unto Dibon; 
And all the cities of Sihon king of the Amorites, which reigned in Heshbon, unto the border of the children of Ammon; 
And Gilead, and the border of the Geshurites and Maachathites, and all mount Hermon, and all Bashan unto Salcah; 
All the kingdom of Og in Bashan, which reigned in Ashtaroth and in Edrei, who remained of the remnant of the giants: for these did Moses smite, and cast them out. 
Nevertheless the children of Israel expelled not the Geshurites, nor the
577,than all my teachers: for thy testimonies are my meditation. 
I understand more than the ancients, because I keep thy precepts. 
I have refrained my feet from every evil way, that I might keep thy word. 
I have not departed from thy judgments: for thou hast taught me. 
How sweet are thy words unto my taste! yea, sweeter than honey to my mouth! 
Through thy precepts I get understanding: therefore I hate every false way. 
Thy word is a lamp unto my feet, and a light unto my path. 
I have sworn, and I will perform it, that I will keep thy righteous judgments. 
I am afflicte
588, he spake unadvisedly with his lips. 
They did not destroy the nations, concerning whom the LORD commanded them: 
But were mingled among the heathen, and learned their works. 
And they served their idols: which were a snare unto them. 
Yea, they sacrificed their sons and their daughters unto devils, 
And shed innocent blood, even the blood of their sons and of their daughters, whom they sacrificed unto the idols of Canaan: and the land was polluted with blood. 
Thus were they defiled with their own works, and went a whoring with their own inventions. 
Therefore was the wrath of the
604, of the elders of Israel: 
And they saw the God of Israel: and there was under his feet as it were a paved work of a sapphire stone, and as it were the body of heaven in his clearness. 
And upon the nobles of the children of Israel he laid not his hand: also they saw God, and did eat and drink. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Come up to me into the mount, and be there: and I will give thee tables of stone, and a law, and commandments which I have written; that thou mayest teach them. 
And Moses rose up, and his minister Joshua: and Moses went up into the mount of God. 
And he said unto the elders, 
665,upon her. 
So Esther was taken unto king Ahasuerus into his house royal in the tenth month, which is the month Tebeth, in the seventh year of his reign. 
And the king loved Esther above all the women, and she obtained grace and favour in his sight more than all the virgins; so that he set the royal crown upon her head, and made her queen instead of Vashti. 
Then the king made a great feast unto all his princes and his servants, even Esther's feast; and he made a release to the provinces, and gave gifts, according to the state of the king. 
And when the virgins were gathered together the second time, then Mordecai sat in the king's gate. 
Esther had not yet 
684,ist, in the sight of God and our Father; 
Knowing, brethren beloved, your election of God. 
For our gospel came not unto you in word only, but also in power, and in the Holy Ghost, and in much assurance; as ye know what manner of men we were among you for your sake. 
And ye became followers of us, and of the Lord, having received the word in much affliction, with joy of the Holy Ghost. 
So that ye were ensamples to all that believe in Macedonia and Achaia. 
For from you sounded out the word of the Lord not only in Macedonia and Achaia, but also in every place your faith to God-ward is spread abroad; so that we need not to speak any thing. 
For they themselves shew of us what 
521,e: the whole head is sick, and the whole heart faint. 
From the sole of the foot even unto the head there is no soundness in it; but wounds, and bruises, and putrifying sores: they have not been closed, neither bound up, neither mollified with ointment. 
Your country is desolate, your cities are burned with fire: your land, strangers devour it in your presence, and it is desolate, as overthrown by strangers. 
And the daughter of Zion is left as a cottage in a vineyard, as a lodge in a garden of cucumbers, as a besie
549, manner; 
And the spirit of jealousy come upon him, and he be jealous of his wife, and she be defiled: or if the spirit of jealousy come upon him, and he be jealous of his wife, and she be not defiled: 
Then shall the man bring his wife unto the priest, and he shall bring her offering for her, the tenth part of an ephah of barley meal; he shall pour no oil upon it, nor put frankincense thereon; for it is an offering of jealousy, an offering of memorial, bringing iniquity to remembrance. 
And the priest shall bring her near, and set her before 
712,the inheritance of the congregation of Jacob. 
And he was king in Jeshurun, when the heads of the people and the tribes of Israel were gathered together. 
Let Reuben live, and not die; and let not his men be few. 
And this is the blessing of Judah: and he said, Hear, LORD, the voice of Judah, and bring him unto his people: let his hands be sufficient for him; and be thou an help to him from his enemies. 
And of Levi he said, Let thy Thummim and thy Urim be with thy holy one, whom thou didst prove at Massah, and with whom thou didst strive at the waters of Meribah; 
Who said unto his father and to his mother, I have not seen him; neither did he acknowledge his brethren, nor knew his own children: for the
618,there is no God else beside me; a just God and a Saviour; there is none beside me. 
Look unto me, and be ye saved, all the ends of the earth: for I am God, and there is none else. 
I have sworn by myself, the word is gone out of my mouth in righteousness, and shall not return, That unto me every knee shall bow, every tongue shall swear. 
Surely, shall one say, in the LORD have I righteousness and strength: even to him shall men come; and all that are incensed against him shall be ashamed. 
In the LORD shall all the seed of Israel be justified, and shall glory. 
Bel boweth down, Nebo stoopeth, their idols were u
568,ernal life. 
Little children, keep yourselves from idols. Amen. 
The elder unto the elect lady and her children, whom I love in the truth; and not I only, but also all they that have known the truth; 
For the truth's sake, which dwelleth in us, and shall be with us for ever. 
Grace be with you, mercy, and peace, from God the Father, and from the Lord Jesus Christ, the Son of the Father, in truth and love. 
I rejoiced greatly that I found of thy children walking in truth, as we have received a commandment from the Father. 
And now I beseech thee, lady, not as tho
597,e joined himself with him to make ships to go to Tarshish: and they made the ships in Eziongaber. 
Then Eliezer the son of Dodavah of Mareshah prophesied against Jehoshaphat, saying, Because thou hast joined thyself with Ahaziah, the LORD hath broken thy works. And the ships were broken, that they were not able to go to Tarshish. 
Now Jehoshaphat slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David. And Jehoram his son reigned in his stead. 
And he had brethren the sons of Jehoshaphat, Azariah, and Jehiel, and Zechariah, and Azariah, and Michael, and Shephatiah: all 
693, myself: but the Father that dwelleth in me, he doeth the works. 
Believe me that I am in the Father, and the Father in me: or else believe me for the very works' sake. 
Verily, verily, I say unto you, He that believeth on me, the works that I do shall he do also; and greater works than these shall he do; because I go unto my Father. 
And whatsoever ye shall ask in my name, that will I do, that the Father may be glorified in the Son. 
If ye shall ask any thing in my name, I will do it. 
If ye love me, keep my commandments. 
And I will pray the Father, and he shall give you another Comforter, that he may abide with you for ever; 
Even the Spirit of truth; whom the world cannot receive,
636,ell with the devouring fire? who among us shall dwell with everlasting burnings? 
He that walketh righteously, and speaketh uprightly; he that despiseth the gain of oppressions, that shaketh his hands from holding of bribes, that stoppeth his ears from hearing of blood, and shutteth his eyes from seeing evil; 
He shall dwell on high: his place of defence shall be the munitions of rocks: bread shall be given him; his waters shall be sure. 
Thine eyes shall see the king in his beauty: they shall behold the land that is very far off. 
Thine heart shall meditate terror. Where is the scribe? where is the receiver? where is he that co
664,mar, the sons of Aaron which were left alive, saying, 
Wherefore have ye not eaten the sin offering in the holy place, seeing it is most holy, and God hath given it you to bear the iniquity of the congregation, to make atonement for them before the LORD? 
Behold, the blood of it was not brought in within the holy place: ye should indeed have eaten it in the holy place, as I commanded. 
And Aaron said unto Moses, Behold, this day have they offered their sin offering and their burnt offering before the LORD; and such things have befallen me: and if I had eaten the sin offering to day, should it have been accepted in the sight of the LORD? 
And when Moses hea
499,e, as of a trumpet, 
Saying, I am Alpha and Omega, the first and the last: and, What thou seest, write in a book, and send it unto the seven churches which are in Asia; unto Ephesus, and unto Smyrna, and unto Pergamos, and unto Thyatira, and unto Sardis, and unto Philadelphia, and unto Laodicea. 
And I turned to see the voice that spake with me. And being turned, I saw seven golden candlesticks; 
And in the midst of the seven candlesticks one like unto the Son of man, clothed with a garment dow
524,unto them; so is every one that trusteth in them. 
O Israel, trust thou in the LORD: he is their help and their shield. 
O house of Aaron, trust in the LORD: he is their help and their shield. 
Ye that fear the LORD, trust in the LORD: he is their help and their shield. 
The LORD hath been mindful of us: he will bless us; he will bless the house of Israel; he will bless the house of Aaron. 
He will bless them that fear the LORD, both small and great. 
The LORD shall increase you more and more, you and your children. 
Y
625,t defrauded us, nor oppressed us, neither hast thou taken ought of any man's hand. 
And he said unto them, The LORD is witness against you, and his anointed is witness this day, that ye have not found ought in my hand. And they answered, He is witness. 
And Samuel said unto the people, It is the LORD that advanced Moses and Aaron, and that brought your fathers up out of the land of Egypt. 
Now therefore stand still, that I may reason with you before the LORD of all the righteous acts of the LORD, which he did to you and to your fathers. 
When Jacob was come into Egypt, and your fathers cried unto the LORD, then the LO
644,Hannah, she spake in her heart; only her lips moved, but her voice was not heard: therefore Eli thought she had been drunken. 
And Eli said unto her, How long wilt thou be drunken? put away thy wine from thee. 
And Hannah answered and said, No, my lord, I am a woman of a sorrowful spirit: I have drunk neither wine nor strong drink, but have poured out my soul before the LORD. 
Count not thine handmaid for a daughter of Belial: for out of the abundance of my complaint and grief have I spoken hitherto. 
Then Eli answered and said, Go in peace: and the God of Israel grant thee thy petition that thou hast asked of him. 
And she said, Let th
580,and let not thine heart be hasty to utter any thing before God: for God is in heaven, and thou upon earth: therefore let thy words be few. 
For a dream cometh through the multitude of business; and a fool's voice is known by multitude of words. 
When thou vowest a vow unto God, defer not to pay it; for he hath no pleasure in fools: pay that which thou hast vowed. 
Better is it that thou shouldest not vow, than that thou shouldest vow and not pay. 
Suffer not thy mouth to cause thy flesh to sin; neither say thou before the angel, that it was an error: wherefore should God be
590,the midst of the noonday; hide the outcasts; bewray not him that wandereth. 
Let mine outcasts dwell with thee, Moab; be thou a covert to them from the face of the spoiler: for the extortioner is at an end, the spoiler ceaseth, the oppressors are consumed out of the land. 
And in mercy shall the throne be established: and he shall sit upon it in truth in the tabernacle of David, judging, and seeking judgment, and hasting righteousness. 
We have heard of the pride of Moab; he is very proud: even of his haughtiness, and his pride, and his wrath: but his lies shall not be so. 
Therefore
481,e, and they are turned away back. 
So they shall bring out all thy wives and thy children to the Chaldeans: and thou shalt not escape out of their hand, but shalt be taken by the hand of the king of Babylon: and thou shalt cause this city to be burned with fire. 
Then said Zedekiah unto Jeremiah, Let no man know of these words, and thou shalt not die. 
But if the princes hear that I have talked with thee, and they come unto thee, and say unto thee, Declare unto us now what tho
512,e wayside; they have set gins for me. Selah. 
I said unto the LORD, Thou art my God: hear the voice of my supplications, O LORD. 
O GOD the Lord, the strength of my salvation, thou hast covered my head in the day of battle. 
Grant not, O LORD, the desires of the wicked: further not his wicked device; lest they exalt themselves. Selah. 
As for the head of those that compass me about, let the mischief of their own lips cover them. 
Let burning coals fall upon them: let them be cast into the fire; into deep pi
693,D came to the city of David, that Michal, the daughter of Saul looking out at a window saw king David dancing and playing: and she despised him in her heart. 
So they brought the ark of God, and set it in the midst of the tent that David had pitched for it: and they offered burnt sacrifices and peace offerings before God. 
And when David had made an end of offering the burnt offerings and the peace offerings, he blessed the people in the name of the LORD. 
And he dealt to every one of Israel, both man and woman, to every one a loaf of bread, and a good piece of flesh, and a flagon of wine. 
And he appointed certain of the Levites to minister before the ark of the LORD, and to record, 
681,nd bring thee in unto the Amorites, and the Hittites, and the Perizzites, and the Canaanites, the Hivites, and the Jebusites: and I will cut them off. 
Thou shalt not bow down to their gods, nor serve them, nor do after their works: but thou shalt utterly overthrow them, and quite break down their images. 
And ye shall serve the LORD your God, and he shall bless thy bread, and thy water; and I will take sickness away from the midst of thee. 
There shall nothing cast their young, nor be barren, in thy land: the number of thy days I will fulfil. 
I will send my fear before thee, and will destroy all the people to whom thou shalt come, and I will make all thine enemies turn t
495,we also serve the LORD; for he is our God. 
And Joshua said unto the people, Ye cannot serve the LORD: for he is an holy God; he is a jealous God; he will not forgive your transgressions nor your sins. 
If ye forsake the LORD, and serve strange gods, then he will turn and do you hurt, and consume you, after that he hath done you good. 
And the people said unto Joshua, Nay; but we will serve the LORD. 
And Joshua said unto the people, Ye are witnesses against yourselves that ye have chosen y
641,fter the chariots, and after the host, unto Harosheth of the Gentiles: and all the host of Sisera fell upon the edge of the sword; and there was not a man left. 
Howbeit Sisera fled away on his feet to the tent of Jael the wife of Heber the Kenite: for there was peace between Jabin the king of Hazor and the house of Heber the Kenite. 
And Jael went out to meet Sisera, and said unto him, Turn in, my lord, turn in to me; fear not. And when he had turned in unto her into the tent, she covered him with a mantle. 
And he said unto her, Give me, I pray thee, a little water to drink; for I am thirsty. And she opened a bottle of milk, and ga
623,not save! 
Why dost thou shew me iniquity, and cause me to behold grievance? for spoiling and violence are before me: and there are that raise up strife and contention. 
Therefore the law is slacked, and judgment doth never go forth: for the wicked doth compass about the righteous; therefore wrong judgment proceedeth. 
Behold ye among the heathen, and regard, and wonder marvelously: for I will work a work in your days which ye will not believe, though it be told you. 
For, lo, I raise up the Chaldeans, that bitter and hasty nation, which shall march through the breadth of the land, to possess the dwellingplaces that
594,and take a pledge of him for a strange woman. 
Bread of deceit is sweet to a man; but afterwards his mouth shall be filled with gravel. 
Every purpose is established by counsel: and with good advice make war. 
He that goeth about as a talebearer revealeth secrets: therefore meddle not with him that flattereth with his lips. 
Whoso curseth his father or his mother, his lamp shall be put out in obscure darkness. 
An inheritance may be gotten hastily at the beginning; but the end thereof shall not be blessed. 
Say not thou, I will recompense evil; but wait on the LORD, and he shall save the
539,sabbath: 
Therefore the Son of man is Lord also of the sabbath. 
And he entered again into the synagogue; and there was a man there which had a withered hand. 
And they watched him, whether he would heal him on the sabbath day; that they might accuse him. 
And he saith unto the man which had the withered hand, Stand forth. 
And he saith unto them, Is it lawful to do good on the sabbath days, or to do evil? to save life, or to kill? But they held their peace. 
And when he had looked round about on them with anger, being grieved for th
484,hou wast perfect in thy ways from the day that thou wast created, till iniquity was found in thee. 
By the multitude of thy merchandise they have filled the midst of thee with violence, and thou hast sinned: therefore I will cast thee as profane out of the mountain of God: and I will destroy thee, O covering cherub, from the midst of the stones of fire. 
Thine heart was lifted up because of thy beauty, thou hast corrupted thy wisdom by reason of thy brightness: I will cast thee t
586,id unto Samuel, Look not on his countenance, or on the height of his stature; because I have refused him: for the LORD seeth not as man seeth; for man looketh on the outward appearance, but the LORD looketh on the heart. 
Then Jesse called Abinadab, and made him pass before Samuel. And he said, Neither hath the LORD chosen this. 
Then Jesse made Shammah to pass by. And he said, Neither hath the LORD chosen this. 
Again, Jesse made seven of his sons to pass before Samuel. And Samuel said unto Jesse, The LORD hath not chosen these. 
And Samuel said unto Jesse, Are here all thy chil
659,nsel, and mighty in work: for thine eyes are open upon all the ways of the sons of men: to give every one according to his ways, and according to the fruit of his doings: 
Which hast set signs and wonders in the land of Egypt, even unto this day, and in Israel, and among other men; and hast made thee a name, as at this day; 
And hast brought forth thy people Israel out of the land of Egypt with signs, and with wonders, and with a strong hand, and with a stretched out arm, and with great terror; 
And hast given them this land, which thou didst swear to their fathers to give them, a land flowing with milk and honey; 
And they came in, and possessed it; 
538, which before these days madest an uproar, and leddest out into the wilderness four thousand men that were murderers? 
But Paul said, I am a man which am a Jew of Tarsus, a city in Cilicia, a citizen of no mean city: and, I beseech thee, suffer me to speak unto the people. 
And when he had given him licence, Paul stood on the stairs, and beckoned with the hand unto the people. And when there was made a great silence, he spake unto them in the Hebrew tongue, saying, 
Men, brethren, and fathers, hear ye my defence which I make now unt
618,
He brought me to the banqueting house, and his banner over me was love. 
Stay me with flagons, comfort me with apples: for I am sick of love. 
His left hand is under my head, and his right hand doth embrace me. 
I charge you, O ye daughters of Jerusalem, by the roes, and by the hinds of the field, that ye stir not up, nor awake my love, till he please. 
The voice of my beloved! behold, he cometh leaping upon the mountains, skipping upon the hills. 
My beloved is like a roe or a young hart: behold, he standeth behind our wall, he looketh forth at the windows, shewing himself through the lattice. 
My beloved spa
563,r, O ye princes; I, even I, will sing unto the LORD; I will sing praise to the LORD God of Israel. 
LORD, when thou wentest out of Seir, when thou marchedst out of the field of Edom, the earth trembled, and the heavens dropped, the clouds also dropped water. 
The mountains melted from before the LORD, even that Sinai from before the LORD God of Israel. 
In the days of Shamgar the son of Anath, in the days of Jael, the highways were unoccupied, and the travellers walked through byways. 
The inhabitants of the villages ceased, they ceased in Israel, until tha
574, are dismayed at them. 
For the customs of the people are vain: for one cutteth a tree out of the forest, the work of the hands of the workman, with the axe. 
They deck it with silver and with gold; they fasten it with nails and with hammers, that it move not. 
They are upright as the palm tree, but speak not: they must needs be borne, because they cannot go. Be not afraid of them; for they cannot do evil, neither also is it in them to do good. 
Forasmuch as there is none like unto thee, O LORD; thou art great, and thy name is great in might. 
Who would not fear thee,
510,uler of the synagogue, and beat him before the judgment seat. And Gallio cared for none of those things. 
And Paul after this tarried there yet a good while, and then took his leave of the brethren, and sailed thence into Syria, and with him Priscilla and Aquila; having shorn his head in Cenchrea: for he had a vow. 
And he came to Ephesus, and left them there: but he himself entered into the synagogue, and reasoned with the Jews. 
When they desired him to tarry longer time with them, he consented not; 
Bu
507, year of Asa king of Judah began Elah the son of Baasha to reign over Israel in Tirzah, two years. 
And his servant Zimri, captain of half his chariots, conspired against him, as he was in Tirzah, drinking himself drunk in the house of Arza steward of his house in Tirzah. 
And Zimri went in and smote him, and killed him, in the twenty and seventh year of Asa king of Judah, and reigned in his stead. 
And it came to pass, when he began to reign, as soon as he sat on his throne, that he slew all the house
503,ich is Hermon, 
And all the plain on this side Jordan eastward, even unto the sea of the plain, under the springs of Pisgah. 
And Moses called all Israel, and said unto them, Hear, O Israel, the statutes and judgments which I speak in your ears this day, that ye may learn them, and keep, and do them. 
The LORD our God made a covenant with us in Horeb. 
The LORD made not this covenant with our fathers, but with us, even us, who are all of us here alive this day. 
The LORD talked with you face to fac
592, and careth not for the sheep. 
I am the good shepherd, and know my sheep, and am known of mine. 
As the Father knoweth me, even so know I the Father: and I lay down my life for the sheep. 
And other sheep I have, which are not of this fold: them also I must bring, and they shall hear my voice; and there shall be one fold, and one shepherd. 
Therefore doth my Father love me, because I lay down my life, that I might take it again. 
No man taketh it from me, but I lay it down of myself. I have power to lay it down, and I have power to take it again. This commandment have I received of my
501, ye shall lie down, and none shall make you afraid: and I will rid evil beasts out of the land, neither shall the sword go through your land. 
And ye shall chase your enemies, and they shall fall before you by the sword. 
And five of you shall chase an hundred, and an hundred of you shall put ten thousand to flight: and your enemies shall fall before you by the sword. 
For I will have respect unto you, and make you fruitful, and multiply you, and establish my covenant with you. 
And ye shall eat 
635,went to one target. 
And three hundred shields made he of beaten gold: three hundred shekels of gold went to one shield. And the king put them in the house of the forest of Lebanon. 
Moreover the king made a great throne of ivory, and overlaid it with pure gold. 
And there were six steps to the throne, with a footstool of gold, which were fastened to the throne, and stays on each side of the sitting place, and two lions standing by the stays: 
And twelve lions stood there on the one side and on the other upon the six steps. There was not the like made in any kingdom. 
And all the drinking vessels of king Solomon were of gold, a
630,nd thee this thing to day. 
And it shall be, if he say unto thee, I will not go away from thee; because he loveth thee and thine house, because he is well with thee; 
Then thou shalt take an aul, and thrust it through his ear unto the door, and he shall be thy servant for ever. And also unto thy maidservant thou shalt do likewise. 
It shall not seem hard unto thee, when thou sendest him away free from thee; for he hath been worth a double hired servant to thee, in serving thee six years: and the LORD thy God shall bless thee in all that thou doest. 
All the firstling males that come of thy herd and of thy flock thou shalt 
575,ty shall stone him with stones, that he die: so shalt thou put evil away from among you; and all Israel shall hear, and fear. 
And if a man have committed a sin worthy of death, and he be to be put to death, and thou hang him on a tree: 
His body shall not remain all night upon the tree, but thou shalt in any wise bury him that day; (for he that is hanged is accursed of God;) that thy land be not defiled, which the LORD thy God giveth thee for an inheritance. 
Thou shalt not see thy brother's ox or his sheep go astray, and hide thyself from them: thou shalt in any case
551, you again, and your heart shall rejoice, and your joy no man taketh from you. 
And in that day ye shall ask me nothing. Verily, verily, I say unto you, Whatsoever ye shall ask the Father in my name, he will give it you. 
Hitherto have ye asked nothing in my name: ask, and ye shall receive, that your joy may be full. 
These things have I spoken unto you in proverbs: but the time cometh, when I shall no more speak unto you in proverbs, but I shall shew you plainly of the Father. 
At that day ye shall ask in my name: and I say not unto you, that I
512, my mother's womb, and naked shall I return thither: the LORD gave, and the LORD hath taken away; blessed be the name of the LORD. 
In all this Job sinned not, nor charged God foolishly. 
Again there was a day when the sons of God came to present themselves before the LORD, and Satan came also among them to present himself before the LORD. 
And the LORD said unto Satan, From whence comest thou? And Satan answered the LORD, and said, From going to and fro in the earth, and from walking up and down in it. 
An
485,ore the angel. 
And he answered and spake unto those that stood before him, saying, Take away the filthy garments from him. And unto him he said, Behold, I have caused thine iniquity to pass from thee, and I will clothe thee with change of raiment. 
And I said, Let them set a fair mitre upon his head. So they set a fair mitre upon his head, and clothed him with garments. And the angel of the LORD stood by. 
And the angel of the LORD protested unto Joshua, saying, 
Thus saith the L
653,Uzzia the Ashterathite, Shama and Jehiel the sons of Hothan the Aroerite, 
Jediael the son of Shimri, and Joha his brother, the Tizite, 
Eliel the Mahavite, and Jeribai, and Joshaviah, the sons of Elnaam, and Ithmah the Moabite, 
Eliel, and Obed, and Jasiel the Mesobaite. 
Now these are they that came to David to Ziklag, while he yet kept himself close because of Saul the son of Kish: and they were among the mighty men, helpers of the war. 
They were armed with bows, and could use both the right hand and the left in hurling stones and shooting arrows out of a bow, even of Saul's brethren of Benjamin. 
The chief was Ahiezer, then Joash, the sons 
554,ne, into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand of their enemies, and into the hand of those that seek their life: and he shall smite them with the edge of the sword; he shall not spare them, neither have pity, nor have mercy. 
And unto this people thou shalt say, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I set before you the way of life, and the way of death. 
He that abideth in this city shall die by the sword, and by the famine, and by the pestilence: but he that goeth out, and falleth to the Chaldeans that besiege you, he shall live, 
573,hall cast them into a furnace of fire: there shall be wailing and gnashing of teeth. 
Then shall the righteous shine forth as the sun in the kingdom of their Father. Who hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
Again, the kingdom of heaven is like unto treasure hid in a field; the which when a man hath found, he hideth, and for joy thereof goeth and selleth all that he hath, and buyeth that field. 
Again, the kingdom of heaven is like unto a merchant man, seeking goodly pearls: 
Who, when he had found one pearl of great price, went and sold all that he had, and bought it. 

670,ow that I am the LORD. 
The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face against the Ammonites, and prophesy against them; 
And say unto the Ammonites, Hear the word of the Lord GOD; Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou saidst, Aha, against my sanctuary, when it was profaned; and against the land of Israel, when it was desolate; and against the house of Judah, when they went into captivity; 
Behold, therefore I will deliver thee to the men of the east for a possession, and they shall set their palaces in thee, and make their dwellings in thee: they shall eat thy fruit, and they shall drink thy milk. 
And I will make Rabbah a stable for
594,f Israel; and worship ye afar off. 
And Moses alone shall come near the LORD: but they shall not come nigh; neither shall the people go up with him. 
And Moses came and told the people all the words of the LORD, and all the judgments: and all the people answered with one voice, and said, All the words which the LORD hath said will we do. 
And Moses wrote all the words of the LORD, and rose up early in the morning, and builded an altar under the hill, and twelve pillars, according to the twelve tribes of Israel. 
And he sent young men of the children of Israel, which offered burnt offerin
554,me. 
And of his fulness have all we received, and grace for grace. 
For the law was given by Moses, but grace and truth came by Jesus Christ. 
No man hath seen God at any time, the only begotten Son, which is in the bosom of the Father, he hath declared him. 
And this is the record of John, when the Jews sent priests and Levites from Jerusalem to ask him, Who art thou? 
And he confessed, and denied not; but confessed, I am not the Christ. 
And they asked him, What then? Art thou Elias? And he saith, I am not. Art thou that prophet? And he answered,
702, made him lord of his house, and ruler of all his substance: 
To bind his princes at his pleasure; and teach his senators wisdom. 
Israel also came into Egypt; and Jacob sojourned in the land of Ham. 
And he increased his people greatly; and made them stronger than their enemies. 
He turned their heart to hate his people, to deal subtilly with his servants. 
He sent Moses his servant; and Aaron whom he had chosen. 
They shewed his signs among them, and wonders in the land of Ham. 
He sent darkness, and made it dark; and they rebelled not against his word. 
He turned their waters into blood, and slew their fish. 
Their land brought forth frogs in abundance, in the chambers of their kings. 
He s
595, was king of the Moabites at that time. 
He sent messengers therefore unto Balaam the son of Beor to Pethor, which is by the river of the land of the children of his people, to call him, saying, Behold, there is a people come out from Egypt: behold, they cover the face of the earth, and they abide over against me: 
Come now therefore, I pray thee, curse me this people; for they are too mighty for me: peradventure I shall prevail, that we may smite them, and that I may drive them out of the land: for I wot that he whom thou blessest is blessed, and he whom thou cursest is cursed. 
And the 
600,em hither to me. 
And he commanded the multitude to sit down on the grass, and took the five loaves, and the two fishes, and looking up to heaven, he blessed, and brake, and gave the loaves to his disciples, and the disciples to the multitude. 
And they did all eat, and were filled: and they took up of the fragments that remained twelve baskets full. 
And they that had eaten were about five thousand men, beside women and children. 
And straightway Jesus constrained his disciples to get into a ship, and to go before him unto the other side, while he sent the multitudes away. 
And when he had se
704, street: but I opened my doors to the traveller. 
If I covered my transgressions as Adam, by hiding mine iniquity in my bosom: 
Did I fear a great multitude, or did the contempt of families terrify me, that I kept silence, and went not out of the door? 
Oh that one would hear me! behold, my desire is, that the Almighty would answer me, and that mine adversary had written a book. 
Surely I would take it upon my shoulder, and bind it as a crown to me. 
I would declare unto him the number of my steps; as a prince would I go near unto him. 
If my land cry against me, or that the furrows likewise thereof complain; 
If I have eaten the fruits thereof without money, or have caused the owners thereof to
653, poured out water: the skies sent out a sound: thine arrows also went abroad. 
The voice of thy thunder was in the heaven: the lightnings lightened the world: the earth trembled and shook. 
Thy way is in the sea, and thy path in the great waters, and thy footsteps are not known. 
Thou leddest thy people like a flock by the hand of Moses and Aaron. 
Give ear, O my people, to my law: incline your ears to the words of my mouth. 
I will open my mouth in a parable: I will utter dark sayings of old: 
Which we have heard and known, and our fathers have told us. 
We will not hide them from their children, shewing to the generation to come the praises of
656, to him, and said unto him, What meanest thou, O sleeper? arise, call upon thy God, if so be that God will think upon us, that we perish not. 
And they said every one to his fellow, Come, and let us cast lots, that we may know for whose cause this evil is upon us. So they cast lots, and the lot fell upon Jonah. 
Then said they unto him, Tell us, we pray thee, for whose cause this evil is upon us; What is thine occupation? and whence comest thou? what is thy country? and of what people art thou? 
And he said unto them, I am an Hebrew; and I fear the LORD, the God of heaven, which hath made the sea and the dry land. 
Then were the men exceedingly afr
696,id, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, I took thee from the sheepcote, from following the sheep, to be ruler over my people, over Israel: 
And I was with thee whithersoever thou wentest, and have cut off all thine enemies out of thy sight, and have made thee a great name, like unto the name of the great men that are in the earth. 
Moreover I will appoint a place for my people Israel, and will plant them, that they may dwell in a place of their own, and move no more; neither shall the children of wickedness afflict them any more, as beforetime, 
And as since the time that I commanded judges to be over my people Israel, and have caused thee to rest from all thine enemies. Also the LORD telleth 
704,il to tail, and put a firebrand in the midst between two tails. 
And when he had set the brands on fire, he let them go into the standing corn of the Philistines, and burnt up both the shocks, and also the standing corn, with the vineyards and olives. 
Then the Philistines said, Who hath done this? And they answered, Samson, the son in law of the Timnite, because he had taken his wife, and given her to his companion. And the Philistines came up, and burnt her and her father with fire. 
And Samson said unto them, Though ye have done this, yet will I be avenged of you, and after that I will cease. 
And he smote them hip and thigh with a great slaughter: and he went down and dwelt in the top of the
535,and was there three days. 
And I arose in the night, I and some few men with me; neither told I any man what my God had put in my heart to do at Jerusalem: neither was there any beast with me, save the beast that I rode upon. 
And I went out by night by the gate of the valley, even before the dragon well, and to the dung port, and viewed the walls of Jerusalem, which were broken down, and the gates thereof were consumed with fire. 
Then I went on to the gate of the fountain, and to the king's pool: but there was no place for the 
571,he manner; 
And the spirit of jealousy come upon him, and he be jealous of his wife, and she be defiled: or if the spirit of jealousy come upon him, and he be jealous of his wife, and she be not defiled: 
Then shall the man bring his wife unto the priest, and he shall bring her offering for her, the tenth part of an ephah of barley meal; he shall pour no oil upon it, nor put frankincense thereon; for it is an offering of jealousy, an offering of memorial, bringing iniquity to remembrance. 
And the priest shall bring her near, and set her before the LORD: 
And the p
644,ll in them. Woe to the inhabiters of the earth and of the sea! for the devil is come down unto you, having great wrath, because he knoweth that he hath but a short time. 
And when the dragon saw that he was cast unto the earth, he persecuted the woman which brought forth the man child. 
And to the woman were given two wings of a great eagle, that she might fly into the wilderness, into her place, where she is nourished for a time, and times, and half a time, from the face of the serpent. 
And the serpent cast out of his mouth water as a flood after the woman, that he might cause her to be carried away of the flood. 
And the earth helped
523,ttle to Ramothgilead? And Jehoshaphat said to the king of Israel, I am as thou art, my people as thy people, my horses as thy horses. 
And Jehoshaphat said unto the king of Israel, Enquire, I pray thee, at the word of the LORD to day. 
Then the king of Israel gathered the prophets together, about four hundred men, and said unto them, Shall I go against Ramothgilead to battle, or shall I forbear? And they said, Go up; for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand of the king. 
And Jehoshaphat said, Is there not here a pr
675,ses of God? God forbid: for if there had been a law given which could have given life, verily righteousness should have been by the law. 
But the scripture hath concluded all under sin, that the promise by faith of Jesus Christ might be given to them that believe. 
But before faith came, we were kept under the law, shut up unto the faith which should afterwards be revealed. 
Wherefore the law was our schoolmaster to bring us unto Christ, that we might be justified by faith. 
But after that faith is come, we are no longer under a schoolmaster. 
For ye are all the children of God by faith in Christ Jesus. 
For as many of you as have been baptized into Christ have put o
685,all the firstborn in Egypt; the chief of their strength in the tabernacles of Ham: 
But made his own people to go forth like sheep, and guided them in the wilderness like a flock. 
And he led them on safely, so that they feared not: but the sea overwhelmed their enemies. 
And he brought them to the border of his sanctuary, even to this mountain, which his right hand had purchased. 
He cast out the heathen also before them, and divided them an inheritance by line, and made the tribes of Israel to dwell in their tents. 
Yet they tempted and provoked the most high God, and kept not his testimonies: 
But turned back, and dealt unfaithfully like their fathers: they were turned asid
565,he third heaven. 
And I knew such a man, (whether in the body, or out of the body, I cannot tell: God knoweth;) 
How that he was caught up into paradise, and heard unspeakable words, which it is not lawful for a man to utter. 
Of such an one will I glory: yet of myself I will not glory, but in mine infirmities. 
For though I would desire to glory, I shall not be a fool; for I will say the truth: but now I forbear, lest any man should think of me above that which he seeth me to be, or that he heareth of me. 
And lest I should be exalted above measure through t
675,he days of old, and as in former years. 
And I will come near to you to judgment; and I will be a swift witness against the sorcerers, and against the adulterers, and against false swearers, and against those that oppress the hireling in his wages, the widow, and the fatherless, and that turn aside the stranger from his right, and fear not me, saith the LORD of hosts. 
For I am the LORD, I change not; therefore ye sons of Jacob are not consumed. 
Even from the days of your fathers ye are gone away from mine ordinances, and have not kept them. Return unto me, and I will return unto you, saith the LORD of hosts. But ye said, Wherein shall we return? 
Will a man rob God
600,he pavement which was for the utter court, was gallery against gallery in three stories. 
And before the chambers was a walk to ten cubits breadth inward, a way of one cubit; and their doors toward the north. 
Now the upper chambers were shorter: for the galleries were higher than these, than the lower, and than the middlemost of the building. 
For they were in three stories, but had not pillars as the pillars of the courts: therefore the building was straitened more than the lowest and the middlemost from the ground. 
And the wall that was without over against the chambers, toward the utter c
498,elders of the people, and officers over them; and bring them unto the tabernacle of the congregation, that they may stand there with thee. 
And I will come down and talk with thee there: and I will take of the spirit which is upon thee, and will put it upon them; and they shall bear the burden of the people with thee, that thou bear it not thyself alone. 
And say thou unto the people, Sanctify yourselves against to morrow, and ye shall eat flesh: for ye have wept in the ears of the LORD, sayin
671,lace and nation. 
And one of them, named Caiaphas, being the high priest that same year, said unto them, Ye know nothing at all, 
Nor consider that it is expedient for us, that one man should die for the people, and that the whole nation perish not. 
And this spake he not of himself: but being high priest that year, he prophesied that Jesus should die for that nation; 
And not for that nation only, but that also he should gather together in one the children of God that were scattered abroad. 
Then from that day forth they took counsel together for to put him to death. 
Jesus therefore walked no more openly among the Jews; but went thence unto a country near to th
626,eld, and draw near to battle. 
Harness the horses; and get up, ye horsemen, and stand forth with your helmets; furbish the spears, and put on the brigandines. 
Wherefore have I seen them dismayed and turned away back? and their mighty ones are beaten down, and are fled apace, and look not back: for fear was round about, saith the LORD. 
Let not the swift flee away, nor the mighty man escape; they shall stumble, and fall toward the north by the river Euphrates. 
Who is this that cometh up as a flood, whose waters are moved as the rivers? 
Egypt riseth up like a flood, and his waters are moved like the rivers; and he sai
487,nd thy breasts to clusters of grapes. 
I said, I will go up to the palm tree, I will take hold of the boughs thereof: now also thy breasts shall be as clusters of the vine, and the smell of thy nose like apples; 
And the roof of thy mouth like the best wine for my beloved, that goeth down sweetly, causing the lips of those that are asleep to speak. 
I am my beloved's, and his desire is toward me. 
Come, my beloved, let us go forth into the field; let us lodge in the villages. 
Let u
615, will I hide my face any more from them: for I have poured out my spirit upon the house of Israel, saith the Lord GOD. 
In the five and twentieth year of our captivity, in the beginning of the year, in the tenth day of the month, in the fourteenth year after that the city was smitten, in the selfsame day the hand of the LORD was upon me, and brought me thither. 
In the visions of God brought he me into the land of Israel, and set me upon a very high mountain, by which was as the frame of a city on the south. 
And he brought me thither, and, behold, there was a man, whose appearance was like the appearance of
680,nst your brethren the children of Israel: return every man to his house; for this thing is from me. They hearkened therefore to the word of the LORD, and returned to depart, according to the word of the LORD. 
Then Jeroboam built Shechem in mount Ephraim, and dwelt therein; and went out from thence, and built Penuel. 
And Jeroboam said in his heart, Now shall the kingdom return to the house of David: 
If this people go up to do sacrifice in the house of the LORD at Jerusalem, then shall the heart of this people turn again unto their lord, even unto Rehoboam king of Judah, and they shall kill me, and go again to Rehoboam king of Judah. 
Whereupon the king took counsel, and
583,and put them upon his shoulders, and carried them up to the top of an hill that is before Hebron. 
And it came to pass afterward, that he loved a woman in the valley of Sorek, whose name was Delilah. 
And the lords of the Philistines came up unto her, and said unto her, Entice him, and see wherein his great strength lieth, and by what means we may prevail against him, that we may bind him to afflict him; and we will give thee every one of us eleven hundred pieces of silver. 
And Delilah said to Samson, Tell me, I pray thee, wherein thy great strength lieth, and wherewith thou 
700,old of us, and pain, as of a woman in travail. 
Go not forth into the field, nor walk by the way; for the sword of the enemy and fear is on every side. 
O daughter of my people, gird thee with sackcloth, and wallow thyself in ashes: make thee mourning, as for an only son, most bitter lamentation: for the spoiler shall suddenly come upon us. 
I have set thee for a tower and a fortress among my people, that thou mayest know and try their way. 
They are all grievous revolters, walking with slanders: they are brass and iron; they are all corrupters. 
The bellows are burned, the lead is consumed of the fire; the founder melteth in vain: for the wicked are not plucked away. 
Reprobate silver shall
709,heard that the LORD had dried up the waters of Jordan from before the children of Israel, until we were passed over, that their heart melted, neither was there spirit in them any more, because of the children of Israel. 
At that time the LORD said unto Joshua, Make thee sharp knives, and circumcise again the children of Israel the second time. 
And Joshua made him sharp knives, and circumcised the children of Israel at the hill of the foreskins. 
And this is the cause why Joshua did circumcise: All the people that came out of Egypt, that were males, even all the men of war, died in the wilderness by the way, after they came out of Egypt. 
Now all the people that came out were circumcised: but all the
712,er in his tabernacle sacrifices of joy; I will sing, yea, I will sing praises unto the LORD. 
Hear, O LORD, when I cry with my voice: have mercy also upon me, and answer me. 
When thou saidst, Seek ye my face; my heart said unto thee, Thy face, LORD, will I seek. 
Hide not thy face far from me; put not thy servant away in anger: thou hast been my help; leave me not, neither forsake me, O God of my salvation. 
When my father and my mother forsake me, then the LORD will take me up. 
Teach me thy way, O LORD, and lead me in a plain path, because of mine enemies. 
Deliver me not over unto the will of mine enemies: for false witnesses are risen up against me, and such as breathe out cruelty. 
I had fainted, 
512,hold a smoking furnace, and a burning lamp that passed between those pieces. 
In the same day the LORD made a covenant with Abram, saying, Unto thy seed have I given this land, from the river of Egypt unto the great river, the river Euphrates: 
The Kenites, and the Kenizzites, and the Kadmonites, 
And the Hittites, and the Perizzites, and the Rephaims, 
And the Amorites, and the Canaanites, and the Girgashites, and the Jebusites. 
Now Sarai Abram's wife bare him no children: and she had an handmaid, an Egyp
489,e: and forthwith the doors were shut. 
And as they went about to kill him, tidings came unto the chief captain of the band, that all Jerusalem was in an uproar. 
Who immediately took soldiers and centurions, and ran down unto them: and when they saw the chief captain and the soldiers, they left beating of Paul. 
Then the chief captain came near, and took him, and commanded him to be bound with two chains; and demanded who he was, and what he had done. 
And some cried one thing, some a
591,e anointed; thou woundedst the head out of the house of the wicked, by discovering the foundation unto the neck. Selah. 
Thou didst strike through with his staves the head of his villages: they came out as a whirlwind to scatter me: their rejoicing was as to devour the poor secretly. 
Thou didst walk through the sea with thine horses, through the heap of great waters. 
When I heard, my belly trembled; my lips quivered at the voice: rottenness entered into my bones, and I trembled in myself, that I might rest in the day of trouble: when he cometh up unto the people, he will invade them
499, thou hast served us. 
Happy shall he be, that taketh and dasheth thy little ones against the stones. 
I will praise thee with my whole heart: before the gods will I sing praise unto thee. 
I will worship toward thy holy temple, and praise thy name for thy lovingkindness and for thy truth: for thou hast magnified thy word above all thy name. 
In the day when I cried thou answeredst me, and strengthenedst me with strength in my soul. 
All the kings of the earth shall praise thee, O LORD, when th
627,lf, now to appear in the presence of God for us: 
Nor yet that he should offer himself often, as the high priest entereth into the holy place every year with blood of others; 
For then must he often have suffered since the foundation of the world: but now once in the end of the world hath he appeared to put away sin by the sacrifice of himself. 
And as it is appointed unto men once to die, but after this the judgment: 
So Christ was once offered to bear the sins of many; and unto them that look for him shall he appear the second time without sin unto salvation. 
For the law having a shadow of good things to come, and no
600,, 
The LORD hath been sore displeased with your fathers. 
Therefore say thou unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Turn ye unto me, saith the LORD of hosts, and I will turn unto you, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Be ye not as your fathers, unto whom the former prophets have cried, saying, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Turn ye now from your evil ways, and from your evil doings: but they did not hear, nor hearken unto me, saith the LORD. 
Your fathers, where are they? and the prophets, do they live for ever? 
But my words and my statutes, which I commanded my servants the prophets, did they not t
603, Hananiah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The seventeenth to Joshbekashah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The eighteenth to Hanani, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The nineteenth to Mallothi, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The twentieth to Eliathah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The one and twentieth to Hothir, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The two and twentieth to Giddalti, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The three and twentieth to Mahazioth, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The 
518,Now Rachel had taken the images, and put them in the camel's furniture, and sat upon them. And Laban searched all the tent, but found them not. 
And she said to her father, Let it not displease my lord that I cannot rise up before thee; for the custom of women is upon me. And he searched but found not the images. 
And Jacob was wroth, and chode with Laban: and Jacob answered and said to Laban, What is my trespass? what is my sin, that thou hast so hotly pursued after me? 
Whereas thou hast searched all my stuff, 
658,brewess, go free; that none should serve himself of them, to wit, of a Jew his brother. 
Now when all the princes, and all the people, which had entered into the covenant, heard that every one should let his manservant, and every one his maidservant, go free, that none should serve themselves of them any more, then they obeyed, and let them go. 
But afterward they turned, and caused the servants and the handmaids, whom they had let go free, to return, and brought them into subjection for servants and for handmaids. 
Therefore the word of the LORD came to Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel; I made a covenant with y
703,God was to give them one heart to do the commandment of the king and of the princes, by the word of the LORD. 
And there assembled at Jerusalem much people to keep the feast of unleavened bread in the second month, a very great congregation. 
And they arose and took away the altars that were in Jerusalem, and all the altars for incense took they away, and cast them into the brook Kidron. 
Then they killed the passover on the fourteenth day of the second month: and the priests and the Levites were ashamed, and sanctified themselves, and brought in the burnt offerings into the house of the LORD. 
And they stood in their place after their manner, according to the law of Moses the man of God: the p
621, finger upon the mercy seat eastward; and before the mercy seat shall he sprinkle of the blood with his finger seven times. 
Then shall he kill the goat of the sin offering, that is for the people, and bring his blood within the vail, and do with that blood as he did with the blood of the bullock, and sprinkle it upon the mercy seat, and before the mercy seat: 
And he shall make an atonement for the holy place, because of the uncleanness of the children of Israel, and because of their transgressions in all their sins: and so shall he do for the tabernacle of the congregation, that remaineth among them in the midst
543,s, as they also lusted. 
Neither be ye idolaters, as were some of them; as it is written, The people sat down to eat and drink, and rose up to play. 
Neither let us commit fornication, as some of them committed, and fell in one day three and twenty thousand. 
Neither let us tempt Christ, as some of them also tempted, and were destroyed of serpents. 
Neither murmur ye, as some of them also murmured, and were destroyed of the destroyer. 
Now all these things happened unto them for ensamples: and they are written for our admonition, upon wh
663,, and for the stranger that sojourneth among them. 
But the soul that doeth ought presumptuously, whether he be born in the land, or a stranger, the same reproacheth the LORD; and that soul shall be cut off from among his people. 
Because he hath despised the word of the LORD, and hath broken his commandment, that soul shall utterly be cut off; his iniquity shall be upon him. 
And while the children of Israel were in the wilderness, they found a man that gathered sticks upon the sabbath day. 
And they that found him gathering sticks brought him unto Moses and Aaron, and unto all the congregation. 
And they put him in ward, because it was not declared what
550, thirsted there for water; and the people murmured against Moses, and said, Wherefore is this that thou hast brought us up out of Egypt, to kill us and our children and our cattle with thirst? 
And Moses cried unto the LORD, saying, What shall I do unto this people? they be almost ready to stone me. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Go on before the people, and take with thee of the elders of Israel; and thy rod, wherewith thou smotest the river, take in thine hand, and go. 
Behold, I will stand before thee there upon the rock in Horeb; and thou s
537,, which were committed before you, and that ye defile not yourselves therein: I am the LORD your God. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto all the congregation of the children of Israel, and say unto them, Ye shall be holy: for I the LORD your God am holy. 
Ye shall fear every man his mother, and his father, and keep my sabbaths: I am the LORD your God. 
Turn ye not unto idols, nor make to yourselves molten gods: I am the LORD your God. 
And if ye offer a sacrifice of peace offerings unto the LORD, ye shall offer it 
667,ath, he is passed to Migron; at Michmash he hath laid up his carriages: 
They are gone over the passage: they have taken up their lodging at Geba; Ramah is afraid; Gibeah of Saul is fled. 
Lift up thy voice, O daughter of Gallim: cause it to be heard unto Laish, O poor Anathoth. 
Madmenah is removed; the inhabitants of Gebim gather themselves to flee. 
As yet shall he remain at Nob that day: he shall shake his hand against the mount of the daughter of Zion, the hill of Jerusalem. 
Behold, the Lord, the LORD of hosts, shall lop the bough with terror: and the high ones of stature shall be hewn down, and the haughty shall be humbled. 
And he shall cut down the t
712,here is hallowed bread; if the young men have kept themselves at least from women. 
And David answered the priest, and said unto him, Of a truth women have been kept from us about these three days, since I came out, and the vessels of the young men are holy, and the bread is in a manner common, yea, though it were sanctified this day in the vessel. 
So the priest gave him hallowed bread: for there was no bread there but the shewbread, that was taken from before the LORD, to put hot bread in the day when it was taken away. 
Now a certain man of the servants of Saul was there that day, detained before the LORD; and his name was Doeg, an Edomite, the chiefest of the herdmen that belonged to Saul. 
And Davi
679,esus is the Son of God? 
This is he that came by water and blood, even Jesus Christ; not by water only, but by water and blood. And it is the Spirit that beareth witness, because the Spirit is truth. 
For there are three that bear record in heaven, the Father, the Word, and the Holy Ghost: and these three are one. 
And there are three that bear witness in earth, the Spirit, and the water, and the blood: and these three agree in one. 
If we receive the witness of men, the witness of God is greater: for this is the witness of God which he hath testified of his Son. 
He that believeth on the Son of God hath the witness in himself: he that believeth not God hath made him a l
516,ominion for ever and ever. Amen. 
By Silvanus, a faithful brother unto you, as I suppose, I have written briefly, exhorting, and testifying that this is the true grace of God wherein ye stand. 
The church that is at Babylon, elected together with you, saluteth you; and so doth Marcus my son. 
Greet ye one another with a kiss of charity. Peace be with you all that are in Christ Jesus. Amen. 
Simon Peter, a servant and an apostle of Jesus Christ, to them that have obtained like precious faith with us through the 
520,ling, and careth not for the sheep. 
I am the good shepherd, and know my sheep, and am known of mine. 
As the Father knoweth me, even so know I the Father: and I lay down my life for the sheep. 
And other sheep I have, which are not of this fold: them also I must bring, and they shall hear my voice; and there shall be one fold, and one shepherd. 
Therefore doth my Father love me, because I lay down my life, that I might take it again. 
No man taketh it from me, but I lay it down of myself. I have power to lay it do
582,hat ye are true men: so will I deliver you your brother, and ye shall traffick in the land. 
And it came to pass as they emptied their sacks, that, behold, every man's bundle of money was in his sack: and when both they and their father saw the bundles of money, they were afraid. 
And Jacob their father said unto them, Me have ye bereaved of my children: Joseph is not, and Simeon is not, and ye will take Benjamin away: all these things are against me. 
And Reuben spake unto his father, saying, Slay my two sons, if I bring him not to thee: deliver him into my hand, and I will 
572,ntiles as a vessel wherein is no pleasure. 
For they are gone up to Assyria, a wild ass alone by himself: Ephraim hath hired lovers. 
Yea, though they have hired among the nations, now will I gather them, and they shall sorrow a little for the burden of the king of princes. 
Because Ephraim hath made many altars to sin, altars shall be unto him to sin. 
I have written to him the great things of my law, but they were counted as a strange thing. 
They sacrifice flesh for the sacrifices of mine offerings, and eat it; but the LORD accepteth them not; now will he remembe
696,usness, have not submitted themselves unto the righteousness of God. 
For Christ is the end of the law for righteousness to every one that believeth. 
For Moses describeth the righteousness which is of the law, That the man which doeth those things shall live by them. 
But the righteousness which is of faith speaketh on this wise, Say not in thine heart, Who shall ascend into heaven? (that is, to bring Christ down from above:) 
Or, Who shall descend into the deep? (that is, to bring up Christ again from the dead.) 
But what saith it? The word is nigh thee, even in thy mouth, and in thy heart: that is, the word of faith, which we preach; 
That if thou shalt confess with thy mouth the Lord
720,er of the women, appointed. And Esther obtained favour in the sight of all them that looked upon her. 
So Esther was taken unto king Ahasuerus into his house royal in the tenth month, which is the month Tebeth, in the seventh year of his reign. 
And the king loved Esther above all the women, and she obtained grace and favour in his sight more than all the virgins; so that he set the royal crown upon her head, and made her queen instead of Vashti. 
Then the king made a great feast unto all his princes and his servants, even Esther's feast; and he made a release to the provinces, and gave gifts, according to the state of the king. 
And when the virgins were gathered together the second time, then Mordecai sat in 
528,ake away from thee the desire of thine eyes with a stroke: yet neither shalt thou mourn nor weep, neither shall thy tears run down. 
Forbear to cry, make no mourning for the dead, bind the tire of thine head upon thee, and put on thy shoes upon thy feet, and cover not thy lips, and eat not the bread of men. 
So I spake unto the people in the morning: and at even my wife died; and I did in the morning as I was commanded. 
And the people said unto me, Wilt thou not tell us what these things are to us, that thou doest so? 
Th
578, a wound cleanseth away evil: so do stripes the inward parts of the belly. 
The king's heart is in the hand of the LORD, as the rivers of water: he turneth it whithersoever he will. 
Every way of a man is right in his own eyes: but the LORD pondereth the hearts. 
To do justice and judgment is more acceptable to the LORD than sacrifice. 
An high look, and a proud heart, and the plowing of the wicked, is sin. 
The thoughts of the diligent tend only to plenteousness; but of every one that is hasty only to want. 
The getting of treasures by a lying tongue is a vanity tossed t
501,is father or his mother. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that removeth his neighbour's landmark. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that maketh the blind to wander out of the way. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that perverteth the judgment of the stranger, fatherless, and widow. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with his father's wife; because he uncovereth his father's skirt. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Curse
673,ven them of the corn of heaven. 
Man did eat angels' food: he sent them meat to the full. 
He caused an east wind to blow in the heaven: and by his power he brought in the south wind. 
He rained flesh also upon them as dust, and feathered fowls like as the sand of the sea: 
And he let it fall in the midst of their camp, round about their habitations. 
So they did eat, and were well filled: for he gave them their own desire; 
They were not estranged from their lust. But while their meat was yet in their mouths, 
The wrath of God came upon them, and slew the fattest of them, and smote down the chosen men of Israel. 
For all this they sinned still, and believed not fo
555,gregation. 
All her people sigh, they seek bread; they have given their pleasant things for meat to relieve the soul: see, O LORD, and consider; for I am become vile. 
Is it nothing to you, all ye that pass by? behold, and see if there be any sorrow like unto my sorrow, which is done unto me, wherewith the LORD hath afflicted me in the day of his fierce anger. 
From above hath he sent fire into my bones, and it prevaileth against them: he hath spread a net for my feet, he hath turned me back: he hath made me desolate and faint all the day. 
The yoke
486,which he had built in Samaria. 
And Ahab made a grove; and Ahab did more to provoke the LORD God of Israel to anger than all the kings of Israel that were before him. 
In his days did Hiel the Bethelite build Jericho: he laid the foundation thereof in Abiram his firstborn, and set up the gates thereof in his youngest son Segub, according to the word of the LORD, which he spake by Joshua the son of Nun. 
And Elijah the Tishbite, who was of the inhabitants of Gilead, said unto Ahab, 
548,y and night, for the children of Israel thy servants, and confess the sins of the children of Israel, which we have sinned against thee: both I and my father's house have sinned. 
We have dealt very corruptly against thee, and have not kept the commandments, nor the statutes, nor the judgments, which thou commandedst thy servant Moses. 
Remember, I beseech thee, the word that thou commandedst thy servant Moses, saying, If ye transgress, I will scatter you abroad among the nations: 
But if ye turn unto me, and keep my commandments, and do them
703,Zidonians also, and the Amalekites, and the Maonites, did oppress you; and ye cried to me, and I delivered you out of their hand. 
Yet ye have forsaken me, and served other gods: wherefore I will deliver you no more. 
Go and cry unto the gods which ye have chosen; let them deliver you in the time of your tribulation. 
And the children of Israel said unto the LORD, We have sinned: do thou unto us whatsoever seemeth good unto thee; deliver us only, we pray thee, this day. 
And they put away the strange gods from among them, and served the LORD: and his soul was grieved for the misery of Israel. 
Then the children of Ammon were gathered together, and encamped in Gilead. And the children of Israel 
487, feast unto all his servants: and he lifted up the head of the chief butler and of the chief baker among his servants. 
And he restored the chief butler unto his butlership again; and he gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand: 
But he hanged the chief baker: as Joseph had interpreted to them. 
Yet did not the chief butler remember Joseph, but forgat him. 
And it came to pass at the end of two full years, that Pharaoh dreamed: and, behold, he stood by the river. 
And, behold, there came up
627,day when the LORD spake unto Moses in the land of Egypt, 
That the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, I am the LORD: speak thou unto Pharaoh king of Egypt all that I say unto thee. 
And Moses said before the LORD, Behold, I am of uncircumcised lips, and how shall Pharaoh hearken unto me? 
And the LORD said unto Moses, See, I have made thee a god to Pharaoh: and Aaron thy brother shall be thy prophet. 
Thou shalt speak all that I command thee: and Aaron thy brother shall speak unto Pharaoh, that he send the children of Israel out of his land. 
And I will harden Pharaoh's heart, and multiply my signs and my wonders in the lan
624, 
Also pure gold for the fleshhooks, and the bowls, and the cups: and for the golden basons he gave gold by weight for every bason; and likewise silver by weight for every bason of silver: 
And for the altar of incense refined gold by weight; and gold for the pattern of the chariot of the cherubims, that spread out their wings, and covered the ark of the covenant of the LORD. 
All this, said David, the LORD made me understand in writing by his hand upon me, even all the works of this pattern. 
And David said to Solomon his son, Be strong and of good courage, and do it: fear not, nor be dismayed: for the LORD God, eve
691,? but turn thee yet again, and thou shalt see greater abominations. 
And he brought me to the door of the court; and when I looked, behold a hole in the wall. 
Then said he unto me, Son of man, dig now in the wall: and when I had digged in the wall, behold a door. 
And he said unto me, Go in, and behold the wicked abominations that they do here. 
So I went in and saw; and behold every form of creeping things, and abominable beasts, and all the idols of the house of Israel, pourtrayed upon the wall round about. 
And there stood before them seventy men of the ancients of the house of Israel, and in the midst of them stood Jaazaniah the son of Shaphan, with every man his censer in his 
572, the way, but found them not. 
So the two men returned, and descended from the mountain, and passed over, and came to Joshua the son of Nun, and told him all things that befell them: 
And they said unto Joshua, Truly the LORD hath delivered into our hands all the land; for even all the inhabitants of the country do faint because of us. 
And Joshua rose early in the morning; and they removed from Shittim, and came to Jordan, he and all the children of Israel, and lodged there before they passed over. 
And it came to pass after three days, that the officers went throu
697,o the land of his possession. 
So these things shall be for a statute of judgment unto you throughout your generations in all your dwellings. 
Whoso killeth any person, the murderer shall be put to death by the mouth of witnesses: but one witness shall not testify against any person to cause him to die. 
Moreover ye shall take no satisfaction for the life of a murderer, which is guilty of death: but he shall be surely put to death. 
And ye shall take no satisfaction for him that is fled to the city of his refuge, that he should come again to dwell in the land, until the death of the priest. 
So ye shall not pollute the land wherein ye are: for blood it defileth the land: and the land cann
544,as the son of Joanna, which was the son of Rhesa, which was the son of Zorobabel, which was the son of Salathiel, which was the son of Neri, 
Which was the son of Melchi, which was the son of Addi, which was the son of Cosam, which was the son of Elmodam, which was the son of Er, 
Which was the son of Jose, which was the son of Eliezer, which was the son of Jorim, which was the son of Matthat, which was the son of Levi, 
Which was the son of Simeon, which was the son of Juda, which was the son of Joseph, which was the son of Jonan, which 
687,nd five on the left, before the oracle, with the flowers, and the lamps, and the tongs of gold, 
And the bowls, and the snuffers, and the basons, and the spoons, and the censers of pure gold; and the hinges of gold, both for the doors of the inner house, the most holy place, and for the doors of the house, to wit, of the temple. 
So was ended all the work that king Solomon made for the house of the LORD. And Solomon brought in the things which David his father had dedicated; even the silver, and the gold, and the vessels, did he put among the treasures of the house of the LORD. 
Then Solomon assembled the elders of Israel, and all the heads of the tribes, the chief of the father
662, be for the two corners. 
And they shall be eight boards, and their sockets of silver, sixteen sockets; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another board. 
And thou shalt make bars of shittim wood; five for the boards of the one side of the tabernacle, 
And five bars for the boards of the other side of the tabernacle, and five bars for the boards of the side of the tabernacle, for the two sides westward. 
And the middle bar in the midst of the boards shall reach from end to end. 
And thou shalt overlay the boards with gold, and make their rings of gold for places for the bars: and thou shalt overlay the bars with gold. 
And thou shalt rear
542, ears of the king. 
So the king sent Jehudi to fetch the roll: and he took it out of Elishama the scribe's chamber. And Jehudi read it in the ears of the king, and in the ears of all the princes which stood beside the king. 
Now the king sat in the winterhouse in the ninth month: and there was a fire on the hearth burning before him. 
And it came to pass, that when Jehudi had read three or four leaves, he cut it with the penknife, and cast it into the fire that was on the hearth, until all the roll was consumed in the fire that was on t
578,ive, saith the King, whose name is the LORD of hosts, Surely as Tabor is among the mountains, and as Carmel by the sea, so shall he come. 
O thou daughter dwelling in Egypt, furnish thyself to go into captivity: for Noph shall be waste and desolate without an inhabitant. 
Egypt is like a very fair heifer, but destruction cometh; it cometh out of the north. 
Also her hired men are in the midst of her like fatted bullocks; for they also are turned back, and are fled away together: they did not stand, because the day of their calamity was come upon them, and the time of thei
519,oth. 
And David went up from thence, and dwelt in strong holds at Engedi. 
And it came to pass, when Saul was returned from following the Philistines, that it was told him, saying, Behold, David is in the wilderness of Engedi. 
Then Saul took three thousand chosen men out of all Israel, and went to seek David and his men upon the rocks of the wild goats. 
And he came to the sheepcotes by the way, where was a cave; and Saul went in to cover his feet: and David and his men remained in the sides of the cave. 
And the
502, of Becher; Zemira, and Joash, and Eliezer, and Elioenai, and Omri, and Jerimoth, and Abiah, and Anathoth, and Alameth. All these are the sons of Becher. 
And the number of them, after their genealogy by their generations, heads of the house of their fathers, mighty men of valour, was twenty thousand and two hundred. 
The sons also of Jediael; Bilhan: and the sons of Bilhan; Jeush, and Benjamin, and Ehud, and Chenaanah, and Zethan, and Tharshish, and Ahishahar. 
All these the sons of Jediael, by t
658,hood. 
And the Tirshatha said unto them, that they should not eat of the most holy things, till there stood up a priest with Urim and with Thummim. 
The whole congregation together was forty and two thousand three hundred and threescore, 
Beside their servants and their maids, of whom there were seven thousand three hundred thirty and seven: and there were among them two hundred singing men and singing women. 
Their horses were seven hundred thirty and six; their mules, two hundred forty and five; 
Their camels, four hundred thirty and five; their asses, six thousand seven hundred and twenty. 
And some of the chief of the fathers, when they came to t
705,Joshua returned, and all Israel with him, to Debir; and fought against it: 
And he took it, and the king thereof, and all the cities thereof; and they smote them with the edge of the sword, and utterly destroyed all the souls that were therein; he left none remaining: as he had done to Hebron, so he did to Debir, and to the king thereof; as he had done also to Libnah, and to her king. 
So Joshua smote all the country of the hills, and of the south, and of the vale, and of the springs, and all their kings: he left none remaining, but utterly destroyed all that breathed, as the LORD God of Israel commanded. 
And Joshua smote them from Kadeshbarnea even unto Gaza, and all the country of Goshen, even
615,enerations, that among the children of Israel they have no inheritance. 
But the tithes of the children of Israel, which they offer as an heave offering unto the LORD, I have given to the Levites to inherit: therefore I have said unto them, Among the children of Israel they shall have no inheritance. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Thus speak unto the Levites, and say unto them, When ye take of the children of Israel the tithes which I have given you from them for your inheritance, then ye shall offer up an heave offering of it for the LORD, even a tenth part of the tithe. 
And this your heave offer
566,ong you any one that maketh his son or his daughter to pass through the fire, or that useth divination, or an observer of times, or an enchanter, or a witch. 
Or a charmer, or a consulter with familiar spirits, or a wizard, or a necromancer. 
For all that do these things are an abomination unto the LORD: and because of these abominations the LORD thy God doth drive them out from before thee. 
Thou shalt be perfect with the LORD thy God. 
For these nations, which thou shalt possess, hearkened unto observers of times, and unto diviners: but as for thee, the LORD
627,ll fight against you with an outstretched hand and with a strong arm, even in anger, and in fury, and in great wrath. 
And I will smite the inhabitants of this city, both man and beast: they shall die of a great pestilence. 
And afterward, saith the LORD, I will deliver Zedekiah king of Judah, and his servants, and the people, and such as are left in this city from the pestilence, from the sword, and from the famine, into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand of their enemies, and into the hand of those that seek their life: and he shall smite them with the edge of the sword; he shall not spare t
580,orth his armies, and destroyed those murderers, and burned up their city. 
Then saith he to his servants, The wedding is ready, but they which were bidden were not worthy. 
Go ye therefore into the highways, and as many as ye shall find, bid to the marriage. 
So those servants went out into the highways, and gathered together all as many as they found, both bad and good: and the wedding was furnished with guests. 
And when the king came in to see the guests, he saw there a man which had not on a wedding garment: 
And he saith unto him, Friend, how camest thou in hither not 
588,and for his bloody house, because he slew the Gibeonites. 
And the king called the Gibeonites, and said unto them; (now the Gibeonites were not of the children of Israel, but of the remnant of the Amorites; and the children of Israel had sworn unto them: and Saul sought to slay them in his zeal to the children of Israel and Judah.) 
Wherefore David said unto the Gibeonites, What shall I do for you? and wherewith shall I make the atonement, that ye may bless the inheritance of the LORD? 
And the Gibeonites said unto him, We will have no silver nor gold of Saul, nor of his house; nei
644,vy, and I will add to your yoke: my father also chastised you with whips, but I will chastise you with scorpions. 
Wherefore the king hearkened not unto the people; for the cause was from the LORD, that he might perform his saying, which the LORD spake by Ahijah the Shilonite unto Jeroboam the son of Nebat. 
So when all Israel saw that the king hearkened not unto them, the people answered the king, saying, What portion have we in David? neither have we inheritance in the son of Jesse: to your tents, O Israel: now see to thine own house, David. So Israel departed unto their tents. 
But as for the children of Israel which dwelt in the cit
598,es away, he went up into a mountain apart to pray: and when the evening was come, he was there alone. 
But the ship was now in the midst of the sea, tossed with waves: for the wind was contrary. 
And in the fourth watch of the night Jesus went unto them, walking on the sea. 
And when the disciples saw him walking on the sea, they were troubled, saying, It is a spirit; and they cried out for fear. 
But straightway Jesus spake unto them, saying, Be of good cheer; it is I; be not afraid. 
And Peter answered him and said, Lord, if it be thou, bid me come unto thee on the water. 
And he said, Com
652,h places also of Aven, the sin of Israel, shall be destroyed: the thorn and the thistle shall come up on their altars; and they shall say to the mountains, Cover us; and to the hills, Fall on us. 
O Israel, thou hast sinned from the days of Gibeah: there they stood: the battle in Gibeah against the children of iniquity did not overtake them. 
It is in my desire that I should chastise them; and the people shall be gathered against them, when they shall bind themselves in their two furrows. 
And Ephraim is as an heifer that is taught, and loveth to tread out the corn; but I passed over upon her fair neck: I will make Ephraim to ride; Judah shall 
693,te horses, clothed in fine linen, white and clean. 
And out of his mouth goeth a sharp sword, that with it he should smite the nations: and he shall rule them with a rod of iron: and he treadeth the winepress of the fierceness and wrath of Almighty God. 
And he hath on his vesture and on his thigh a name written, KING OF KINGS, AND LORD OF LORDS. 
And I saw an angel standing in the sun; and he cried with a loud voice, saying to all the fowls that fly in the midst of heaven, Come and gather yourselves together unto the supper of the great God; 
That ye may eat the flesh of kings, and the flesh of captains, and the flesh of mighty men, and the flesh of horses, and of them that sit on th
628,b to be always great with me. 
Wherefore came I forth out of the womb to see labour and sorrow, that my days should be consumed with shame? 
The word which came unto Jeremiah from the LORD, when king Zedekiah sent unto him Pashur the son of Melchiah, and Zephaniah the son of Maaseiah the priest, saying, 
Enquire, I pray thee, of the LORD for us; for Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon maketh war against us; if so be that the LORD will deal with us according to all his wondrous works, that he may go up from us. 
Then said Jeremiah unto them, Thus shall ye say to Zedekiah: 
Thus saith the LORD God of Israel; Behold, I will turn
542, and brought him again to Jerusalem into his kingdom. Then Manasseh knew that the LORD he was God. 
Now after this he built a wall without the city of David, on the west side of Gihon, in the valley, even to the entering in at the fish gate, and compassed about Ophel, and raised it up a very great height, and put captains of war in all the fenced cities of Judah. 
And he took away the strange gods, and the idol out of the house of the LORD, and all the altars that he had built in the mount of the house of the LORD, and in Jerusalem, and
514,
Their horses, seven hundred thirty and six: their mules, two hundred forty and five: 
Their camels, four hundred thirty and five: six thousand seven hundred and twenty asses. 
And some of the chief of the fathers gave unto the work. The Tirshatha gave to the treasure a thousand drams of gold, fifty basons, five hundred and thirty priests' garments. 
And some of the chief of the fathers gave to the treasure of the work twenty thousand drams of gold, and two thousand and two hundred pound of silver. 
And that 
531,f one blood all nations of men for to dwell on all the face of the earth, and hath determined the times before appointed, and the bounds of their habitation; 
That they should seek the Lord, if haply they might feel after him, and find him, though he be not far from every one of us: 
For in him we live, and move, and have our being; as certain also of your own poets have said, For we are also his offspring. 
Forasmuch then as we are the offspring of God, we ought not to think that the Godhead is like unto gold, or silver, or 
612,ainan lived after he begat Mahalaleel eight hundred and forty years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Cainan were nine hundred and ten years: and he died. 
And Mahalaleel lived sixty and five years, and begat Jared: 
And Mahalaleel lived after he begat Jared eight hundred and thirty years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Mahalaleel were eight hundred ninety and five years: and he died. 
And Jared lived an hundred sixty and two years, and he begat Enoch: 
And Jared lived after he begat Enoch eight hundred years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Jared w
483,rejoiced for the consolation. 
And Judas and Silas, being prophets also themselves, exhorted the brethren with many words, and confirmed them. 
And after they had tarried there a space, they were let go in peace from the brethren unto the apostles. 
Notwithstanding it pleased Silas to abide there still. 
Paul also and Barnabas continued in Antioch, teaching and preaching the word of the Lord, with many others also. 
And some days after Paul said unto Barnabas, Let us go again an
501, and he went out and came in before the people. 
And David behaved himself wisely in all his ways; and the LORD was with him. 
Wherefore when Saul saw that he behaved himself very wisely, he was afraid of him. 
But all Israel and Judah loved David, because he went out and came in before them. 
And Saul said to David, Behold my elder daughter Merab, her will I give thee to wife: only be thou valiant for me, and fight the LORD's battles. For Saul said, Let not mine hand be upon him, but let the han
572,ecause it had no root, it withered away. 
And some fell among thorns, and the thorns grew up, and choked it, and it yielded no fruit. 
And other fell on good ground, and did yield fruit that sprang up and increased; and brought forth, some thirty, and some sixty, and some an hundred. 
And he said unto them, He that hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
And when he was alone, they that were about him with the twelve asked of him the parable. 
And he said unto them, Unto you it is given to know the mystery of the kingdom of God: but unto them that are without, all these t
531,brethren? 
But brother goeth to law with brother, and that before the unbelievers. 
Now therefore there is utterly a fault among you, because ye go to law one with another. Why do ye not rather take wrong? why do ye not rather suffer yourselves to be defrauded? 
Nay, ye do wrong, and defraud, and that your brethren. 
Know ye not that the unrighteous shall not inherit the kingdom of God? Be not deceived: neither fornicators, nor idolaters, nor adulterers, nor effeminate, nor abusers of themselves with mankind, 
Nor thieves, no
689,said, The thing is true, according to the law of the Medes and Persians, which altereth not. 
Then answered they and said before the king, That Daniel, which is of the children of the captivity of Judah, regardeth not thee, O king, nor the decree that thou hast signed, but maketh his petition three times a day. 
Then the king, when he heard these words, was sore displeased with himself, and set his heart on Daniel to deliver him: and he laboured till the going down of the sun to deliver him. 
Then these men assembled unto the king, and said unto the king, Know, O king, that the law of the Medes and Persians is, That no decree nor statute which the king establisheth may be changed.
580,e captains: he lifted up his spear against three hundred slain by him at one time. 
And after him was Eleazar the son of Dodo, the Ahohite, who was one of the three mighties. 
He was with David at Pasdammim, and there the Philistines were gathered together to battle, where was a parcel of ground full of barley; and the people fled from before the Philistines. 
And they set themselves in the midst of that parcel, and delivered it, and slew the Philistines; and the LORD saved them by a great deliverance. 
Now three of the thirty captains went down to the rock to David, into t
682,ot Pharaoh's. 
And Israel dwelt in the land of Egypt, in the country of Goshen; and they had possessions therein, and grew, and multiplied exceedingly. 
And Jacob lived in the land of Egypt seventeen years: so the whole age of Jacob was an hundred forty and seven years. 
And the time drew nigh that Israel must die: and he called his son Joseph, and said unto him, If now I have found grace in thy sight, put, I pray thee, thy hand under my thigh, and deal kindly and truly with me; bury me not, I pray thee, in Egypt: 
But I will lie with my fathers, and thou shalt carry me out of Egypt, and bury me in their buryingplace. And he said, I will do as thou hast said. 
And he said, 
626,said, The LORD commanded my lord to give the land for an inheritance by lot to the children of Israel: and my lord was commanded by the LORD to give the inheritance of Zelophehad our brother unto his daughters. 
And if they be married to any of the sons of the other tribes of the children of Israel, then shall their inheritance be taken from the inheritance of our fathers, and shall be put to the inheritance of the tribe whereunto they are received: so shall it be taken from the lot of our inheritance. 
And when the jubile of the children of Israel shall be, then shall their inheritance be put unto the inheritance of t
604,erness by the way of the Red sea, as the LORD spake unto me: and we compassed mount Seir many days. 
And the LORD spake unto me, saying, 
Ye have compassed this mountain long enough: turn you northward. 
And command thou the people, saying, Ye are to pass through the coast of your brethren the children of Esau, which dwell in Seir; and they shall be afraid of you: take ye good heed unto yourselves therefore: 
Meddle not with them; for I will not give you of their land, no, not so much as a foot breadth; because I have given mount Seir unto Esau for a possession. 
Ye shall buy meat of them for mone
643,I speak to your shame. Is it so, that there is not a wise man among you? no, not one that shall be able to judge between his brethren? 
But brother goeth to law with brother, and that before the unbelievers. 
Now therefore there is utterly a fault among you, because ye go to law one with another. Why do ye not rather take wrong? why do ye not rather suffer yourselves to be defrauded? 
Nay, ye do wrong, and defraud, and that your brethren. 
Know ye not that the unrighteous shall not inherit the kingdom of God? Be not deceived: neither fornicators, nor idolaters, nor adulterers, nor effeminate, nor abusers of themselves with mankind, 
No
657, the God of Nahor, the God of their father, judge betwixt us. And Jacob sware by the fear of his father Isaac. 
Then Jacob offered sacrifice upon the mount, and called his brethren to eat bread: and they did eat bread, and tarried all night in the mount. 
And early in the morning Laban rose up, and kissed his sons and his daughters, and blessed them: and Laban departed, and returned unto his place. 
And Jacob went on his way, and the angels of God met him. 
And when Jacob saw them, he said, This is God's host: and he called the name of that place Mahanaim. 
And Jacob sent messengers before him to Esau his brother unto the land of Seir, the country o
596,Thou art my Son; this day have I begotten thee. 
Ask of me, and I shall give thee the heathen for thine inheritance, and the uttermost parts of the earth for thy possession. 
Thou shalt break them with a rod of iron; thou shalt dash them in pieces like a potter's vessel. 
Be wise now therefore, O ye kings: be instructed, ye judges of the earth. 
Serve the LORD with fear, and rejoice with trembling. 
Kiss the Son, lest he be angry, and ye perish from the way, when his wrath is kindled but a little. Blessed are all they that put their trust in him. 
Lord, how are they increased that trouble 
669,f Zuar. 
And over the host of the tribe of the children of Zebulun was Eliab the son of Helon. 
And the tabernacle was taken down; and the sons of Gershon and the sons of Merari set forward, bearing the tabernacle. 
And the standard of the camp of Reuben set forward according to their armies: and over his host was Elizur the son of Shedeur. 
And over the host of the tribe of the children of Simeon was Shelumiel the son of Zurishaddai. 
And over the host of the tribe of the children of Gad was Eliasaph the son of Deuel. 
And the Kohathites set forward, bearing the sanctuary: and the other did set up the tabernacle against they came. 
And the standard of the camp
692,to him the Sadducees, which say there is no resurrection; and they asked him, saying, 
Master, Moses wrote unto us, If a man's brother die, and leave his wife behind him, and leave no children, that his brother should take his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
Now there were seven brethren: and the first took a wife, and dying left no seed. 
And the second took her, and died, neither left he any seed: and the third likewise. 
And the seven had her, and left no seed: last of all the woman died also. 
In the resurrection therefore, when they shall rise, whose wife shall she be of them? for the seven had her to wife. 
And Jesus answering said unto them, Do ye not therefore err,
543,nto thee, Thou shalt feed my people Israel, and thou shalt be ruler over my people Israel. 
Therefore came all the elders of Israel to the king to Hebron; and David made a covenant with them in Hebron before the LORD; and they anointed David king over Israel, according to the word of the LORD by Samuel. 
And David and all Israel went to Jerusalem, which is Jebus; where the Jebusites were, the inhabitants of the land. 
And the inhabitants of Jebus said to David, Thou shalt not come hither. Nevertheless David took the castle of Zion, which
580,y wife shall have a son. And Sarah heard it in the tent door, which was behind him. 
Now Abraham and Sarah were old and well stricken in age; and it ceased to be with Sarah after the manner of women. 
Therefore Sarah laughed within herself, saying, After I am waxed old shall I have pleasure, my lord being old also? 
And the LORD said unto Abraham, Wherefore did Sarah laugh, saying, Shall I of a surety bear a child, which am old? 
Is any thing too hard for the LORD? At the time appointed I will return unto thee, according to the time of life, and Sarah shall have a son. 
The
572,hou shalt feed my people Israel, and thou shalt be ruler over my people Israel. 
Therefore came all the elders of Israel to the king to Hebron; and David made a covenant with them in Hebron before the LORD; and they anointed David king over Israel, according to the word of the LORD by Samuel. 
And David and all Israel went to Jerusalem, which is Jebus; where the Jebusites were, the inhabitants of the land. 
And the inhabitants of Jebus said to David, Thou shalt not come hither. Nevertheless David took the castle of Zion, which is the city of David. 
And David said, 
557, and his countenance was as the sun shineth in his strength. 
And when I saw him, I fell at his feet as dead. And he laid his right hand upon me, saying unto me, Fear not; I am the first and the last: 
I am he that liveth, and was dead; and, behold, I am alive for evermore, Amen; and have the keys of hell and of death. 
Write the things which thou hast seen, and the things which are, and the things which shall be hereafter; 
The mystery of the seven stars which thou sawest in my right hand, and the seven golden candlesticks. The seven stars are the an
565,f all that forget God; and the hypocrite's hope shall perish: 
Whose hope shall be cut off, and whose trust shall be a spider's web. 
He shall lean upon his house, but it shall not stand: he shall hold it fast, but it shall not endure. 
He is green before the sun, and his branch shooteth forth in his garden. 
His roots are wrapped about the heap, and seeth the place of stones. 
If he destroy him from his place, then it shall deny him, saying, I have not seen thee. 
Behold, this is the joy of his way, and out of the earth shall others grow. 
Behold, God will n
535,' room: and Felix, willing to shew the Jews a pleasure, left Paul bound. 
Now when Festus was come into the province, after three days he ascended from Caesarea to Jerusalem. 
Then the high priest and the chief of the Jews informed him against Paul, and besought him, 
And desired favour against him, that he would send for him to Jerusalem, laying wait in the way to kill him. 
But Festus answered, that Paul should be kept at Caesarea, and that he himself would depart shortly thither. 
Let them therefore, said he, which among you a
504,pel of God. 
Ye are witnesses, and God also, how holily and justly and unblameably we behaved ourselves among you that believe: 
As ye know how we exhorted and comforted and charged every one of you, as a father doth his children, 
That ye would walk worthy of God, who hath called you unto his kingdom and glory. 
For this cause also thank we God without ceasing, because, when ye received the word of God which ye heard of us, ye received it not as the word of men, but as it is in truth, the word of G
596,thereof, but canst not tell whence it cometh, and whither it goeth: so is every one that is born of the Spirit. 
Nicodemus answered and said unto him, How can these things be? 
Jesus answered and said unto him, Art thou a master of Israel, and knowest not these things? 
Verily, verily, I say unto thee, We speak that we do know, and testify that we have seen; and ye receive not our witness. 
If I have told you earthly things, and ye believe not, how shall ye believe, if I tell you of heavenly things? 
And no man hath ascended up to heaven, but he that came down from heaven, even the Son of 
531, will bring an everlasting reproach upon you, and a perpetual shame, which shall not be forgotten. 
The LORD shewed me, and, behold, two baskets of figs were set before the temple of the LORD, after that Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon had carried away captive Jeconiah the son of Jehoiakim king of Judah, and the princes of Judah, with the carpenters and smiths, from Jerusalem, and had brought them to Babylon. 
One basket had very good figs, even like the figs that are first ripe: and the other basket had very naughty figs, whi
657,ed, and meditate on thee in the night watches. 
Because thou hast been my help, therefore in the shadow of thy wings will I rejoice. 
My soul followeth hard after thee: thy right hand upholdeth me. 
But those that seek my soul, to destroy it, shall go into the lower parts of the earth. 
They shall fall by the sword: they shall be a portion for foxes. 
But the king shall rejoice in God; every one that sweareth by him shall glory: but the mouth of them that speak lies shall be stopped. 
Hear my voice, O God, in my prayer: preserve my life from fear of the enemy. 
Hide me from the secret counsel of the wicked; from the insurrection of the workers of in
692, his heart was merry, he went to lie down at the end of the heap of corn: and she came softly, and uncovered his feet, and laid her down. 
And it came to pass at midnight, that the man was afraid, and turned himself: and, behold, a woman lay at his feet. 
And he said, Who art thou? And she answered, I am Ruth thine handmaid: spread therefore thy skirt over thine handmaid; for thou art a near kinsman. 
And he said, Blessed be thou of the LORD, my daughter: for thou hast shewed more kindness in the latter end than at the beginning, inasmuch as thou followedst not young men, whether poor or rich. 
And now, my daughter, fear not; I will do to thee all that thou requirest: for all the cit
496,LORD will deal with us according to all his wondrous works, that he may go up from us. 
Then said Jeremiah unto them, Thus shall ye say to Zedekiah: 
Thus saith the LORD God of Israel; Behold, I will turn back the weapons of war that are in your hands, wherewith ye fight against the king of Babylon, and against the Chaldeans, which besiege you without the walls, and I will assemble them into the midst of this city. 
And I myself will fight against you with an outstretched hand and with a str
522,ifest the savour of his knowledge by us in every place. 
For we are unto God a sweet savour of Christ, in them that are saved, and in them that perish: 
To the one we are the savour of death unto death; and to the other the savour of life unto life. And who is sufficient for these things? 
For we are not as many, which corrupt the word of God: but as of sincerity, but as of God, in the sight of God speak we in Christ. 
Do we begin again to commend ourselves? or need we, as some others, epistles of commendation to you
498,ed Pharaoh what he is about to do. 
The seven good kine are seven years; and the seven good ears are seven years: the dream is one. 
And the seven thin and ill favoured kine that came up after them are seven years; and the seven empty ears blasted with the east wind shall be seven years of famine. 
This is the thing which I have spoken unto Pharaoh: What God is about to do he sheweth unto Pharaoh. 
Behold, there come seven years of great plenty throughout all the land of Egypt: 
And there shal
634,ot be to them a reprover: for they are a rebellious house. 
But when I speak with thee, I will open thy mouth, and thou shalt say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; He that heareth, let him hear; and he that forbeareth, let him forbear: for they are a rebellious house. 
Thou also, son of man, take thee a tile, and lay it before thee, and pourtray upon it the city, even Jerusalem: 
And lay siege against it, and build a fort against it, and cast a mount against it; set the camp also against it, and set battering rams against it round about. 
Moreover take thou unto thee an iron pan, and set it for a wall of iron between thee an
695,ne of these little ones which believe in me, it were better for him that a millstone were hanged about his neck, and that he were drowned in the depth of the sea. 
Woe unto the world because of offences! for it must needs be that offences come; but woe to that man by whom the offence cometh! 
Wherefore if thy hand or thy foot offend thee, cut them off, and cast them from thee: it is better for thee to enter into life halt or maimed, rather than having two hands or two feet to be cast into everlasting fire. 
And if thine eye offend thee, pluck it out, and cast it from thee: it is better for thee to enter into life with one eye, rather than having two eyes to be cast into hell fire. 
Take
687,f Eber, the brother of Japheth the elder, even to him were children born. 
The children of Shem; Elam, and Asshur, and Arphaxad, and Lud, and Aram. 
And the children of Aram; Uz, and Hul, and Gether, and Mash. 
And Arphaxad begat Salah; and Salah begat Eber. 
And unto Eber were born two sons: the name of one was Peleg; for in his days was the earth divided; and his brother's name was Joktan. 
And Joktan begat Almodad, and Sheleph, and Hazarmaveth, and Jerah, 
And Hadoram, and Uzal, and Diklah, 
And Obal, and Abimael, and Sheba, 
And Ophir, and Havilah, and Jobab: all these were the sons of Joktan. 
And their dwelling was from Mesha, as thou goest unto Sephar a mount of the east.
635,must be first partaker of the fruits. 
Consider what I say; and the Lord give thee understanding in all things. 
Remember that Jesus Christ of the seed of David was raised from the dead according to my gospel: 
Wherein I suffer trouble, as an evil doer, even unto bonds; but the word of God is not bound. 
Therefore I endure all things for the elect's sakes, that they may also obtain the salvation which is in Christ Jesus with eternal glory. 
It is a faithful saying: For if we be dead with him, we shall also live with him: 
If we suffer, we shall also reign with him: if we deny him, he also will deny us: 
If we believe not, yet h
533,habniah, Sherebiah, Hodijah, Shebaniah, and Pethahiah, said, Stand up and bless the LORD your God for ever and ever: and blessed be thy glorious name, which is exalted above all blessing and praise. 
Thou, even thou, art LORD alone; thou hast made heaven, the heaven of heavens, with all their host, the earth, and all things that are therein, the seas, and all that is therein, and thou preservest them all; and the host of heaven worshippeth thee. 
Thou art the LORD the God, who didst choose Abram, and broughtest him forth out of
595,LORD for ever: 
Because they met you not with bread and with water in the way, when ye came forth out of Egypt; and because they hired against thee Balaam the son of Beor of Pethor of Mesopotamia, to curse thee. 
Nevertheless the LORD thy God would not hearken unto Balaam; but the LORD thy God turned the curse into a blessing unto thee, because the LORD thy God loved thee. 
Thou shalt not seek their peace nor their prosperity all thy days for ever. 
Thou shalt not abhor an Edomite; for he is thy brother: thou shalt not abhor an Egyptian; because thou wast a stranger in his land. 
The chil
713, ye them, saying, Take you hence out of the midst of Jordan, out of the place where the priests' feet stood firm, twelve stones, and ye shall carry them over with you, and leave them in the lodging place, where ye shall lodge this night. 
Then Joshua called the twelve men, whom he had prepared of the children of Israel, out of every tribe a man: 
And Joshua said unto them, Pass over before the ark of the LORD your God into the midst of Jordan, and take you up every man of you a stone upon his shoulder, according unto the number of the tribes of the children of Israel: 
That this may be a sign among you, that when your children ask their fathers in time to come, saying, What mean ye by these stones? 
Then
544,ought left in the sight of my lord, but our bodies, and our lands: 
Wherefore shall we die before thine eyes, both we and our land? buy us and our land for bread, and we and our land will be servants unto Pharaoh: and give us seed, that we may live, and not die, that the land be not desolate. 
And Joseph bought all the land of Egypt for Pharaoh; for the Egyptians sold every man his field, because the famine prevailed over them: so the land became Pharaoh's. 
And as for the people, he removed them to cities from one end of the borders of E
551,ter of Anah. 
And these are the children of Dishon; Hemdan, and Eshban, and Ithran, and Cheran. 
The children of Ezer are these; Bilhan, and Zaavan, and Akan. 
The children of Dishan are these; Uz, and Aran. 
These are the dukes that came of the Horites; duke Lotan, duke Shobal, duke Zibeon, duke Anah, 
Duke Dishon, duke Ezer, duke Dishan: these are the dukes that came of Hori, among their dukes in the land of Seir. 
And these are the kings that reigned in the land of Edom, before there reigned any king over the children of Israel. 
And Bela the
708,hands. 
But neither so did their witness agree together. 
And the high priest stood up in the midst, and asked Jesus, saying, Answerest thou nothing? what is it which these witness against thee? 
But he held his peace, and answered nothing. Again the high priest asked him, and said unto him, Art thou the Christ, the Son of the Blessed? 
And Jesus said, I am: and ye shall see the Son of man sitting on the right hand of power, and coming in the clouds of heaven. 
Then the high priest rent his clothes, and saith, What need we any further witnesses? 
Ye have heard the blasphemy: what think ye? And they all condemned him to be guilty of death. 
And some began to spit on him, and to cover his face, and to
682,geth forth an instrument for his work; and I have created the waster to destroy. 
No weapon that is formed against thee shall prosper; and every tongue that shall rise against thee in judgment thou shalt condemn. This is the heritage of the servants of the LORD, and their righteousness is of me, saith the LORD. 
Ho, every one that thirsteth, come ye to the waters, and he that hath no money; come ye, buy, and eat; yea, come, buy wine and milk without money and without price. 
Wherefore do ye spend money for that which is not bread? and your labour for that which satisfieth not? hearken diligently unto me, and eat ye that which is good, and let your soul delight itself in fat
522,
Then the tribe of Zebulun: and Eliab the son of Helon shall be captain of the children of Zebulun. 
And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and seven thousand and four hundred. 
All that were numbered in the camp of Judah were an hundred thousand and fourscore thousand and six thousand and four hundred, throughout their armies. These shall first set forth. 
On the south side shall be the standard of the camp of Reuben according to their armies: and the captain of the children of Reuben shall b
616,ooths for his cattle: therefore the name of the place is called Succoth. 
And Jacob came to Shalem, a city of Shechem, which is in the land of Canaan, when he came from Padanaram; and pitched his tent before the city. 
And he bought a parcel of a field, where he had spread his tent, at the hand of the children of Hamor, Shechem's father, for an hundred pieces of money. 
And he erected there an altar, and called it EleloheIsrael. 
And Dinah the daughter of Leah, which she bare unto Jacob, went out to see the daughters of the land. 
And when Shechem the son of Hamor the Hivite, prince of the country, saw her, h
674,esert place apart: and when the people had heard thereof, they followed him on foot out of the cities. 
And Jesus went forth, and saw a great multitude, and was moved with compassion toward them, and he healed their sick. 
And when it was evening, his disciples came to him, saying, This is a desert place, and the time is now past; send the multitude away, that they may go into the villages, and buy themselves victuals. 
But Jesus said unto them, They need not depart; give ye them to eat. 
And they say unto him, We have here but five loaves, and two fishes. 
He said, Bring them hither to me. 
And he commanded the multitude to sit down on the grass, and took the five 
542,s into the hand of the Amorites, to destroy us. 
Whither shall we go up? our brethren have discouraged our heart, saying, The people is greater and taller than we; the cities are great and walled up to heaven; and moreover we have seen the sons of the Anakims there. 
Then I said unto you, Dread not, neither be afraid of them. 
The LORD your God which goeth before you, he shall fight for you, according to all that he did for you in Egypt before your eyes; 
And in the wilderness, where thou hast seen how that the LORD thy God bare thee, a
633,therefore ease thou somewhat the grievous servitude of thy father, and his heavy yoke that he put upon us, and we will serve thee. 
And he said unto them, Come again unto me after three days. And the people departed. 
And king Rehoboam took counsel with the old men that had stood before Solomon his father while he yet lived, saying, What counsel give ye me to return answer to this people? 
And they spake unto him, saying, If thou be kind to this people, and please them, and speak good words to them, they will be thy servants for ever. 
But he forsook the counsel which the old men gave him, and took counsel with the young men 
554, unto him in the plains of Mamre: and he sat in the tent door in the heat of the day; 
And he lift up his eyes and looked, and, lo, three men stood by him: and when he saw them, he ran to meet them from the tent door, and bowed himself toward the ground, 
And said, My LORD, if now I have found favour in thy sight, pass not away, I pray thee, from thy servant: 
Let a little water, I pray you, be fetched, and wash your feet, and rest yourselves under the tree: 
And I will fetch a morsel of bread, and comfort ye your hearts; after that ye shall pass o
657,rongeth his own soul: all they that hate me love death. 
Wisdom hath builded her house, she hath hewn out her seven pillars: 
She hath killed her beasts; she hath mingled her wine; she hath also furnished her table. 
She hath sent forth her maidens: she crieth upon the highest places of the city, 
Whoso is simple, let him turn in hither: as for him that wanteth understanding, she saith to him, 
Come, eat of my bread, and drink of the wine which I have mingled. 
Forsake the foolish, and live; and go in the way of understanding. 
He that reproveth a scorner getteth to himself shame: and he that rebuketh a wicked man getteth himself a blot. 
Reprove no
538,hen he began to reign over Israel, and reigned two years. But the house of Judah followed David. 
And the time that David was king in Hebron over the house of Judah was seven years and six months. 
And Abner the son of Ner, and the servants of Ishbosheth the son of Saul, went out from Mahanaim to Gibeon. 
And Joab the son of Zeruiah, and the servants of David, went out, and met together by the pool of Gibeon: and they sat down, the one on the one side of the pool, and the other on the other side of the pool. 
And Abner said to Joab,
692,d Pharaoh's heart, that he hearkened not unto them; as the LORD had said. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Pharaoh's heart is hardened, he refuseth to let the people go. 
Get thee unto Pharaoh in the morning; lo, he goeth out unto the water; and thou shalt stand by the river's brink against he come; and the rod which was turned to a serpent shalt thou take in thine hand. 
And thou shalt say unto him, The LORD God of the Hebrews hath sent me unto thee, saying, Let my people go, that they may serve me in the wilderness: and, behold, hitherto thou wouldest not hear. 
Thus saith the LORD, In this thou shalt know that I am the LORD: behold, I will smite with the rod that is in mine hand upo
676,his people. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, He that offereth the sacrifice of his peace offerings unto the LORD shall bring his oblation unto the LORD of the sacrifice of his peace offerings. 
His own hands shall bring the offerings of the LORD made by fire, the fat with the breast, it shall he bring, that the breast may be waved for a wave offering before the LORD. 
And the priest shall burn the fat upon the altar: but the breast shall be Aaron's and his sons'. 
And the right shoulder shall ye give unto the priest for an heave offering of the sacrifices of your peace offerings. 
He among the sons of Aaron, that offe
489,d have gone the way which the LORD sent me, and have brought Agag the king of Amalek, and have utterly destroyed the Amalekites. 
But the people took of the spoil, sheep and oxen, the chief of the things which should have been utterly destroyed, to sacrifice unto the LORD thy God in Gilgal. 
And Samuel said, Hath the LORD as great delight in burnt offerings and sacrifices, as in obeying the voice of the LORD? Behold, to obey is better than sacrifice, and to hearken than the fat of ram
609,t I shall inherit it? 
And he said unto him, Take me an heifer of three years old, and a she goat of three years old, and a ram of three years old, and a turtledove, and a young pigeon. 
And he took unto him all these, and divided them in the midst, and laid each piece one against another: but the birds divided he not. 
And when the fowls came down upon the carcases, Abram drove them away. 
And when the sun was going down, a deep sleep fell upon Abram; and, lo, an horror of great darkness fell upon him. 
And he said unto Abram, Know of a surety that thy seed shall be a stranger in a land that is not th
669,y skin, whereon is the seed of copulation, shall be washed with water, and be unclean until the even. 
The woman also with whom man shall lie with seed of copulation, they shall both bathe themselves in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And if a woman have an issue, and her issue in her flesh be blood, she shall be put apart seven days: and whosoever toucheth her shall be unclean until the even. 
And every thing that she lieth upon in her separation shall be unclean: every thing also that she sitteth upon shall be unclean. 
And whosoever toucheth her bed shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And whosoever touch
606,he hair of the feet: and it shall also consume the beard. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that a man shall nourish a young cow, and two sheep; 
And it shall come to pass, for the abundance of milk that they shall give he shall eat butter: for butter and honey shall every one eat that is left in the land. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that every place shall be, where there were a thousand vines at a thousand silverlings, it shall even be for briers and thorns. 
With arrows and with bows shall men come thither; because all the land shall become briers and thorns. 
And on all hills th
675,stead of a mouth, and thou shalt be to him instead of God. 
And thou shalt take this rod in thine hand, wherewith thou shalt do signs. 
And Moses went and returned to Jethro his father in law, and said unto him, Let me go, I pray thee, and return unto my brethren which are in Egypt, and see whether they be yet alive. And Jethro said to Moses, Go in peace. 
And the LORD said unto Moses in Midian, Go, return into Egypt: for all the men are dead which sought thy life. 
And Moses took his wife and his sons, and set them upon an ass, and he returned to the land of Egypt: and Moses took the rod of God in his hand. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, When thou goest to return in
580, 
There is a sore evil which I have seen under the sun, namely, riches kept for the owners thereof to their hurt. 
But those riches perish by evil travail: and he begetteth a son, and there is nothing in his hand. 
As he came forth of his mother's womb, naked shall he return to go as he came, and shall take nothing of his labour, which he may carry away in his hand. 
And this also is a sore evil, that in all points as he came, so shall he go: and what profit hath he that hath laboured for the wind? 
All his days also he eateth in darkness, and he hath much sorrow and wrath 
484,rk of God, whose name is called by the name of the LORD of hosts that dwelleth between the cherubims. 
And they set the ark of God upon a new cart, and brought it out of the house of Abinadab that was in Gibeah: and Uzzah and Ahio, the sons of Abinadab, drave the new cart. 
And they brought it out of the house of Abinadab which was at Gibeah, accompanying the ark of God: and Ahio went before the ark. 
And David and all the house of Israel played before the LORD on all manner of i
519,dead, to raise up the name of the dead upon his inheritance. 
And the kinsman said, I cannot redeem it for myself, lest I mar mine own inheritance: redeem thou my right to thyself; for I cannot redeem it. 
Now this was the manner in former time in Israel concerning redeeming and concerning changing, for to confirm all things; a man plucked off his shoe, and gave it to his neighbour: and this was a testimony in Israel. 
Therefore the kinsman said unto Boaz, Buy it for thee. So he drew off his shoe. 
And Boaz said u
525,he covenant of circumcision: and so Abraham begat Isaac, and circumcised him the eighth day; and Isaac begat Jacob; and Jacob begat the twelve patriarchs. 
And the patriarchs, moved with envy, sold Joseph into Egypt: but God was with him, 
And delivered him out of all his afflictions, and gave him favour and wisdom in the sight of Pharaoh king of Egypt; and he made him governor over Egypt and all his house. 
Now there came a dearth over all the land of Egypt and Chanaan, and great affliction: and our fathers found no su
522,nd it came to pass on the morrow, that the people went out into the field; and they told Abimelech. 
And he took the people, and divided them into three companies, and laid wait in the field, and looked, and, behold, the people were come forth out of the city; and he rose up against them, and smote them. 
And Abimelech, and the company that was with him, rushed forward, and stood in the entering of the gate of the city: and the two other companies ran upon all the people that were in the fields, and slew them. 
And A
541,onfident, knowing that, whilst we are at home in the body, we are absent from the Lord: 
(For we walk by faith, not by sight:) 
We are confident, I say, and willing rather to be absent from the body, and to be present with the Lord. 
Wherefore we labour, that, whether present or absent, we may be accepted of him. 
For we must all appear before the judgment seat of Christ; that every one may receive the things done in his body, according to that he hath done, whether it be good or bad. 
Knowing therefore the terror of the Lord, we persu
662,ed up thy sons, O Zion, against thy sons, O Greece, and made thee as the sword of a mighty man. 
And the LORD shall be seen over them, and his arrow shall go forth as the lightning: and the LORD God shall blow the trumpet, and shall go with whirlwinds of the south. 
The LORD of hosts shall defend them; and they shall devour, and subdue with sling stones; and they shall drink, and make a noise as through wine; and they shall be filled like bowls, and as the corners of the altar. 
And the LORD their God shall save them in that day as the flock of his people: for they shall be as the stones of a crown, lifted up as an ensign upon his land. 
For how great is
509,rkers, beware of the concision. 
For we are the circumcision, which worship God in the spirit, and rejoice in Christ Jesus, and have no confidence in the flesh. 
Though I might also have confidence in the flesh. If any other man thinketh that he hath whereof he might trust in the flesh, I more: 
Circumcised the eighth day, of the stock of Israel, of the tribe of Benjamin, an Hebrew of the Hebrews; as touching the law, a Pharisee; 
Concerning zeal, persecuting the church; touching the righteousness which 
553,erefore get you up; for about this time ye shall find him. 
And they went up into the city: and when they were come into the city, behold, Samuel came out against them, for to go up to the high place. 
Now the LORD had told Samuel in his ear a day before Saul came, saying, 
To morrow about this time I will send thee a man out of the land of Benjamin, and thou shalt anoint him to be captain over my people Israel, that he may save my people out of the hand of the Philistines: for I have looked upon my people, because their cry is come unto me. 
And 
591,f the congregation, lest ye die: for the anointing oil of the LORD is upon you. And they did according to the word of Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Aaron, saying, 
Do not drink wine nor strong drink, thou, nor thy sons with thee, when ye go into the tabernacle of the congregation, lest ye die: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations: 
And that ye may put difference between holy and unholy, and between unclean and clean; 
And that ye may teach the children of Israel all the statutes which the LORD hath spoken unto them by the hand of Moses. 
And Moses spake unto Aa
566, understand it: and speak not to us in the Jews' language, in the ears of the people that are on the wall. 
But Rabshakeh said, Hath my master sent me to thy master and to thee to speak these words? hath he not sent me to the men that sit upon the wall, that they may eat their own dung, and drink their own piss with you? 
Then Rabshakeh stood, and cried with a loud voice in the Jews' language, and said, Hear ye the words of the great king, the king of Assyria. 
Thus saith the king, Let not Hezekiah deceive you: for he shall not be able to deliver you. 
Neither
681,ars. 
And it was covered with cedar above upon the beams, that lay on forty five pillars, fifteen in a row. 
And there were windows in three rows, and light was against light in three ranks. 
And all the doors and posts were square, with the windows: and light was against light in three ranks. 
And he made a porch of pillars; the length thereof was fifty cubits, and the breadth thereof thirty cubits: and the porch was before them: and the other pillars and the thick beam were before them. 
Then he made a porch for the throne where he might judge, even the porch of judgment: and it was covered with cedar from one side of the floor to the other. 
And his house where he dwelt
658,e Jacob, but Israel shall be thy name: and he called his name Israel. 
And God said unto him, I am God Almighty: be fruitful and multiply; a nation and a company of nations shall be of thee, and kings shall come out of thy loins; 
And the land which I gave Abraham and Isaac, to thee I will give it, and to thy seed after thee will I give the land. 
And God went up from him in the place where he talked with him. 
And Jacob set up a pillar in the place where he talked with him, even a pillar of stone: and he poured a drink offering thereon, and he poured oil thereon. 
And Jacob called the name of the place where God spake with him, Bethel. 
And they jou
527,kling, that speaketh better things that that of Abel. 
See that ye refuse not him that speaketh. For if they escaped not who refused him that spake on earth, much more shall not we escape, if we turn away from him that speaketh from heaven: 
Whose voice then shook the earth: but now he hath promised, saying, Yet once more I shake not the earth only, but also heaven. 
And this word, Yet once more, signifieth the removing of those things that are shaken, as of things that are made, that those things which cannot be shaken m
678,, 
Son of man, set thy face toward the south, and drop thy word toward the south, and prophesy against the forest of the south field; 
And say to the forest of the south, Hear the word of the LORD; Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will kindle a fire in thee, and it shall devour every green tree in thee, and every dry tree: the flaming flame shall not be quenched, and all faces from the south to the north shall be burned therein. 
And all flesh shall see that I the LORD have kindled it: it shall not be quenched. 
Then said I, Ah Lord GOD! they say of me, Doth he not speak parables? 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face toward Jerusal
615,th dashed in pieces the enemy. 
And in the greatness of thine excellency thou hast overthrown them that rose up against thee: thou sentest forth thy wrath, which consumed them as stubble. 
And with the blast of thy nostrils the waters were gathered together, the floods stood upright as an heap, and the depths were congealed in the heart of the sea. 
The enemy said, I will pursue, I will overtake, I will divide the spoil; my lust shall be satisfied upon them; I will draw my sword, my hand shall destroy them. 
Thou didst blow with thy wind, the sea covered them: they sank as lead in the mighty waters. 
Who is 
703,, and death, 
So is the man that deceiveth his neighbour, and saith, Am not I in sport? 
Where no wood is, there the fire goeth out: so where there is no talebearer, the strife ceaseth. 
As coals are to burning coals, and wood to fire; so is a contentious man to kindle strife. 
The words of a talebearer are as wounds, and they go down into the innermost parts of the belly. 
Burning lips and a wicked heart are like a potsherd covered with silver dross. 
He that hateth dissembleth with his lips, and layeth up deceit within him; 
When he speaketh fair, believe him not: for there are seven abominations in his heart. 
Whose hatred is covered by deceit, his wickedness shall be shewed before the whole
517,u art the Christ, the Son of the living God. 
And Jesus answered and said unto him, Blessed art thou, Simon Barjona: for flesh and blood hath not revealed it unto thee, but my Father which is in heaven. 
And I say also unto thee, That thou art Peter, and upon this rock I will build my church; and the gates of hell shall not prevail against it. 
And I will give unto thee the keys of the kingdom of heaven: and whatsoever thou shalt bind on earth shall be bound in heaven: and whatsoever thou shalt loose on earth sh
562,ld and upward shalt thou number them. 
And Moses numbered them according to the word of the LORD, as he was commanded. 
And these were the sons of Levi by their names; Gershon, and Kohath, and Merari. 
And these are the names of the sons of Gershon by their families; Libni, and Shimei. 
And the sons of Kohath by their families; Amram, and Izehar, Hebron, and Uzziel. 
And the sons of Merari by their families; Mahli, and Mushi. These are the families of the Levites according to the house of their fathers. 
Of Gershon was the family of the Libnites, and the f
715,is laid waste, and brought to silence; 
He is gone up to Bajith, and to Dibon, the high places, to weep: Moab shall howl over Nebo, and over Medeba: on all their heads shall be baldness, and every beard cut off. 
In their streets they shall gird themselves with sackcloth: on the tops of their houses, and in their streets, every one shall howl, weeping abundantly. 
And Heshbon shall cry, and Elealeh: their voice shall be heard even unto Jahaz: therefore the armed soldiers of Moab shall cry out; his life shall be grievous unto him. 
My heart shall cry out for Moab; his fugitives shall flee unto Zoar, an heifer of three years old: for by the mounting up of Luhith with weeping shall they go it up; for in the w
504,and they came to Bethlehem in the beginning of barley harvest. 
And Naomi had a kinsman of her husband's, a mighty man of wealth, of the family of Elimelech; and his name was Boaz. 
And Ruth the Moabitess said unto Naomi, Let me now go to the field, and glean ears of corn after him in whose sight I shall find grace. And she said unto her, Go, my daughter. 
And she went, and came, and gleaned in the field after the reapers: and her hap was to light on a part of the field belonging unto Boaz, who was 
706,s in his eye sight. 
With the merciful thou wilt shew thyself merciful, and with the upright man thou wilt shew thyself upright. 
With the pure thou wilt shew thyself pure; and with the froward thou wilt shew thyself unsavoury. 
And the afflicted people thou wilt save: but thine eyes are upon the haughty, that thou mayest bring them down. 
For thou art my lamp, O LORD: and the LORD will lighten my darkness. 
For by thee I have run through a troop: by my God have I leaped over a wall. 
As for God, his way is perfect; the word of the LORD is tried: he is a buckler to all them that trust in him. 
For who is God, save the LORD? and who is a rock, save our God? 
God is my strength and power: and he mak
630,I will tell thee. 
And Jonathan spake good of David unto Saul his father, and said unto him, Let not the king sin against his servant, against David; because he hath not sinned against thee, and because his works have been to thee-ward very good: 
For he did put his life in his hand, and slew the Philistine, and the LORD wrought a great salvation for all Israel: thou sawest it, and didst rejoice: wherefore then wilt thou sin against innocent blood, to slay David without a cause? 
And Saul hearkened unto the voice of Jonathan: and Saul sware, As the LORD liveth, he shall not be slain. 
And Jonathan called David, and Jonatha
558,, strong, and without number, whose teeth are the teeth of a lion, and he hath the cheek teeth of a great lion. 
He hath laid my vine waste, and barked my fig tree: he hath made it clean bare, and cast it away; the branches thereof are made white. 
Lament like a virgin girded with sackcloth for the husband of her youth. 
The meat offering and the drink offering is cut off from the house of the LORD; the priests, the LORD's ministers, mourn. 
The field is wasted, the land mourneth; for the corn is wasted: the new wine is dried up, the oil languisheth. 

607,t. 
Yet I had planted thee a noble vine, wholly a right seed: how then art thou turned into the degenerate plant of a strange vine unto me? 
For though thou wash thee with nitre, and take thee much soap, yet thine iniquity is marked before me, saith the Lord GOD. 
How canst thou say, I am not polluted, I have not gone after Baalim? see thy way in the valley, know what thou hast done: thou art a swift dromedary traversing her ways; 
A wild ass used to the wilderness, that snuffeth up the wind at her pleasure; in her occasion who can turn her away? all they that seek her will not weary themselves; in h
717, up to heaven. 
And when the men of Israel turned again, the men of Benjamin were amazed: for they saw that evil was come upon them. 
Therefore they turned their backs before the men of Israel unto the way of the wilderness; but the battle overtook them; and them which came out of the cities they destroyed in the midst of them. 
Thus they inclosed the Benjamites round about, and chased them, and trode them down with ease over against Gibeah toward the sunrising. 
And there fell of Benjamin eighteen thousand men; all these were men of valour. 
And they turned and fled toward the wilderness unto the rock of Rimmon: and they gleaned of them in the highways five thousand men; and pursued hard after them unto Gid
646,er the sun, and it seemed great unto me: 
There was a little city, and few men within it; and there came a great king against it, and besieged it, and built great bulwarks against it: 
Now there was found in it a poor wise man, and he by his wisdom delivered the city; yet no man remembered that same poor man. 
Then said I, Wisdom is better than strength: nevertheless the poor man's wisdom is despised, and his words are not heard. 
The words of wise men are heard in quiet more than the cry of him that ruleth among fools. 
Wisdom is better than weapons of war: but one sinner destroyeth much good. 
Dead flies cause the ointment of the apothe
525,f the LORD concerning things which ought not to be done, and shall do against any of them: 
If the priest that is anointed do sin according to the sin of the people; then let him bring for his sin, which he hath sinned, a young bullock without blemish unto the LORD for a sin offering. 
And he shall bring the bullock unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation before the LORD; and shall lay his hand upon the bullock's head, and kill the bullock before the LORD. 
And the priest that is anointed shall take of the b
572,thophel the Gilonite, 
Hezrai the Carmelite, Paarai the Arbite, 
Igal the son of Nathan of Zobah, Bani the Gadite, 
Zelek the Ammonite, Nahari the Beerothite, armourbearer to Joab the son of Zeruiah, 
Ira an Ithrite, Gareb an Ithrite, 
Uriah the Hittite: thirty and seven in all. 
And again the anger of the LORD was kindled against Israel, and he moved David against them to say, Go, number Israel and Judah. 
For the king said to Joab the captain of the host, which was with him, Go now through all the tribes of Israel, from Dan even to Beersheba, and number ye the peo
632, in; and the suburbs of them shall be for their cattle, and for their goods, and for all their beasts. 
And the suburbs of the cities, which ye shall give unto the Levites, shall reach from the wall of the city and outward a thousand cubits round about. 
And ye shall measure from without the city on the east side two thousand cubits, and on the south side two thousand cubits, and on the west side two thousand cubits, and on the north side two thousand cubits; and the city shall be in the midst: this shall be to them the suburbs of the cities. 
And among the cities which ye shall give unto the Levites there shall be six citie
559,nto the book of the law. 
And Ezra the scribe stood upon a pulpit of wood, which they had made for the purpose; and beside him stood Mattithiah, and Shema, and Anaiah, and Urijah, and Hilkiah, and Maaseiah, on his right hand; and on his left hand, Pedaiah, and Mishael, and Malchiah, and Hashum, and Hashbadana, Zechariah, and Meshullam. 
And Ezra opened the book in the sight of all the people; (for he was above all the people;) and when he opened it, all the people stood up: 
And Ezra blessed the LORD, the great God. And all the people answered, Amen, Am
572,ely bringeth up his servant from a child shall have him become his son at the length. 
An angry man stirreth up strife, and a furious man aboundeth in transgression. 
A man's pride shall bring him low: but honour shall uphold the humble in spirit. 
Whoso is partner with a thief hateth his own soul: he heareth cursing, and bewrayeth it not. 
The fear of man bringeth a snare: but whoso putteth his trust in the LORD shall be safe. 
Many seek the ruler's favour; but every man's judgment cometh from the LORD. 
An unjust man is an abomination to the just: and he that is u
651,k from following me, and hath not performed my commandments. And it grieved Samuel; and he cried unto the LORD all night. 
And when Samuel rose early to meet Saul in the morning, it was told Samuel, saying, Saul came to Carmel, and, behold, he set him up a place, and is gone about, and passed on, and gone down to Gilgal. 
And Samuel came to Saul: and Saul said unto him, Blessed be thou of the LORD: I have performed the commandment of the LORD. 
And Samuel said, What meaneth then this bleating of the sheep in mine ears, and the lowing of the oxen which I hear? 
And Saul said, They have brought them from the Amalekites: for the people spared the
676,priests, and they builded the sheep gate; they sanctified it, and set up the doors of it; even unto the tower of Meah they sanctified it, unto the tower of Hananeel. 
And next unto him builded the men of Jericho. And next to them builded Zaccur the son of Imri. 
But the fish gate did the sons of Hassenaah build, who also laid the beams thereof, and set up the doors thereof, the locks thereof, and the bars thereof. 
And next unto them repaired Meremoth the son of Urijah, the son of Koz. And next unto them repaired Meshullam the son of Berechiah, the son of Meshezabeel. And next unto them repaired Zadok the son of Baana. 
And next unto them the Tekoites repaired; but th
564,ties that are inhabited shall be laid waste, and the land shall be desolate; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, what is that proverb that ye have in the land of Israel, saying, The days are prolonged, and every vision faileth? 
Tell them therefore, Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will make this proverb to cease, and they shall no more use it as a proverb in Israel; but say unto them, The days are at hand, and the effect of every vision. 
For there shall be no more any vain vision nor flattering divin
602,nth day: if the plague be spread in the garment, either in the warp, or in the woof, or in a skin, or in any work that is made of skin; the plague is a fretting leprosy; it is unclean. 
He shall therefore burn that garment, whether warp or woof, in woollen or in linen, or any thing of skin, wherein the plague is: for it is a fretting leprosy; it shall be burnt in the fire. 
And if the priest shall look, and, behold, the plague be not spread in the garment, either in the warp, or in the woof, or in any thing of skin; 
Then the priest shall command that they wash the thing wherein the plague is, a
583,a man die, having no children, his brother shall marry his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
Now there were with us seven brethren: and the first, when he had married a wife, deceased, and, having no issue, left his wife unto his brother: 
Likewise the second also, and the third, unto the seventh. 
And last of all the woman died also. 
Therefore in the resurrection whose wife shall she be of the seven? for they all had her. 
Jesus answered and said unto them, Ye do err, not knowing the scriptures, nor the power of God. 
For in the resurrection they neither marry, nor 
539,prophet. Come, and let us smite him with the tongue, and let us not give heed to any of his words. 
Give heed to me, O LORD, and hearken to the voice of them that contend with me. 
Shall evil be recompensed for good? for they have digged a pit for my soul. Remember that I stood before thee to speak good for them, and to turn away thy wrath from them. 
Therefore deliver up their children to the famine, and pour out their blood by the force of the sword; and let their wives be bereaved of their children, and be widows; and let their me
586,to Abram, after that Lot was separated from him, Lift up now thine eyes, and look from the place where thou art northward, and southward, and eastward, and westward: 
For all the land which thou seest, to thee will I give it, and to thy seed for ever. 
And I will make thy seed as the dust of the earth: so that if a man can number the dust of the earth, then shall thy seed also be numbered. 
Arise, walk through the land in the length of it and in the breadth of it; for I will give it unto thee. 
Then Abram removed his tent, and came and dwelt in the plain of Mamre, which is in Heb
589,our sins, that he might deliver us from this present evil world, according to the will of God and our Father: 
To whom be glory for ever and ever. Amen. 
I marvel that ye are so soon removed from him that called you into the grace of Christ unto another gospel: 
Which is not another; but there be some that trouble you, and would pervert the gospel of Christ. 
But though we, or an angel from heaven, preach any other gospel unto you than that which we have preached unto you, let him be accursed. 
As we said before, so say I now again, if any man preach any other gospel unto you than t
550,nd knowledge is pleasant unto thy soul; 
Discretion shall preserve thee, understanding shall keep thee: 
To deliver thee from the way of the evil man, from the man that speaketh froward things; 
Who leave the paths of uprightness, to walk in the ways of darkness; 
Who rejoice to do evil, and delight in the frowardness of the wicked; 
Whose ways are crooked, and they froward in their paths: 
To deliver thee from the strange woman, even from the stranger which flattereth with her words; 
Which forsaketh the guide of her youth, and forgetteth the 
543,llion unto his sin, he clappeth his hands among us, and multiplieth his words against God. 
Elihu spake moreover, and said, 
Thinkest thou this to be right, that thou saidst, My righteousness is more than God's? 
For thou saidst, What advantage will it be unto thee? and, What profit shall I have, if I be cleansed from my sin? 
I will answer thee, and thy companions with thee. 
Look unto the heavens, and see; and behold the clouds which are higher than thou. 
If thou sinnest, what doest thou against him? or if thy transgressions be multip
527,desolation, as ye see. 
Now be ye not stiffnecked, as your fathers were, but yield yourselves unto the LORD, and enter into his sanctuary, which he hath sanctified for ever: and serve the LORD your God, that the fierceness of his wrath may turn away from you. 
For if ye turn again unto the LORD, your brethren and your children shall find compassion before them that lead them captive, so that they shall come again into this land: for the LORD your God is gracious and merciful, and will not turn away his face from you, if y
691, inhabitants of Dedan; for I will bring the calamity of Esau upon him, the time that I will visit him. 
If grapegatherers come to thee, would they not leave some gleaning grapes? if thieves by night, they will destroy till they have enough. 
But I have made Esau bare, I have uncovered his secret places, and he shall not be able to hide himself: his seed is spoiled, and his brethren, and his neighbours, and he is not. 
Leave thy fatherless children, I will preserve them alive; and let thy widows trust in me. 
For thus saith the LORD; Behold, they whose judgment was not to drink of the cup have assuredly drunken; and art thou he that shall altogether go unpunished? thou shalt not go u
553,ame diligence to the full assurance of hope unto the end: 
That ye be not slothful, but followers of them who through faith and patience inherit the promises. 
For when God made promise to Abraham, because he could swear by no greater, he sware by himself, 
Saying, Surely blessing I will bless thee, and multiplying I will multiply thee. 
And so, after he had patiently endured, he obtained the promise. 
For men verily swear by the greater: and an oath for confirmation is to them an end of all strife. 
Wherein God, willing more abundantly to shew un
541,l be lifted up; and he shall cast down many ten thousands: but he shall not be strengthened by it. 
For the king of the north shall return, and shall set forth a multitude greater than the former, and shall certainly come after certain years with a great army and with much riches. 
And in those times there shall many stand up against the king of the south: also the robbers of thy people shall exalt themselves to establish the vision; but they shall fall. 
So the king of the north shall come, and cast up a mount, and take the most fence
521,re dispersed through the countries: according to their way and according to their doings I judged them. 
And when they entered unto the heathen, whither they went, they profaned my holy name, when they said to them, These are the people of the LORD, and are gone forth out of his land. 
But I had pity for mine holy name, which the house of Israel had profaned among the heathen, whither they went. 
Therefore say unto the house of Israel, thus saith the Lord GOD; I do not this for your sakes, O house of Israel, but for
567,bron, and Uzziel, four. 
The sons of Amram; Aaron and Moses: and Aaron was separated, that he should sanctify the most holy things, he and his sons for ever, to burn incense before the LORD, to minister unto him, and to bless in his name for ever. 
Now concerning Moses the man of God, his sons were named of the tribe of Levi. 
The sons of Moses were, Gershom, and Eliezer. 
Of the sons of Gershom, Shebuel was the chief. 
And the sons of Eliezer were, Rehabiah the chief. And Eliezer had none other sons; but the sons of Rehabiah were very many. 
Of the sons of Izh
521,and of our enemies. 
So the people sent to Shiloh, that they might bring from thence the ark of the covenant of the LORD of hosts, which dwelleth between the cherubims: and the two sons of Eli, Hophni and Phinehas, were there with the ark of the covenant of God. 
And when the ark of the covenant of the LORD came into the camp, all Israel shouted with a great shout, so that the earth rang again. 
And when the Philistines heard the noise of the shout, they said, What meaneth the noise of this great shout in the camp o
690,oad, square in the four squares thereof. 
And the settle shall be fourteen cubits long and fourteen broad in the four squares thereof; and the border about it shall be half a cubit; and the bottom thereof shall be a cubit about; and his stairs shall look toward the east. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, thus saith the Lord GOD; These are the ordinances of the altar in the day when they shall make it, to offer burnt offerings thereon, and to sprinkle blood thereon. 
And thou shalt give to the priests the Levites that be of the seed of Zadok, which approach unto me, to minister unto me, saith the Lord GOD, a young bullock for a sin offering. 
And thou shalt take of the blood thereof
570,, saying, Let neither man nor woman make any more work for the offering of the sanctuary. So the people were restrained from bringing. 
For the stuff they had was sufficient for all the work to make it, and too much. 
And every wise hearted man among them that wrought the work of the tabernacle made ten curtains of fine twined linen, and blue, and purple, and scarlet: with cherubims of cunning work made he them. 
The length of one curtain was twenty and eight cubits, and the breadth of one curtain four cubits: the curtains were all of one size. 
And he coupled the
571, and I planted trees in them of all kind of fruits: 
I made me pools of water, to water therewith the wood that bringeth forth trees: 
I got me servants and maidens, and had servants born in my house; also I had great possessions of great and small cattle above all that were in Jerusalem before me: 
I gathered me also silver and gold, and the peculiar treasure of kings and of the provinces: I gat me men singers and women singers, and the delights of the sons of men, as musical instruments, and that of all sorts. 
So I was great, and increased more than all that wer
536,, neither yet bread to the wise, nor yet riches to men of understanding, nor yet favour to men of skill; but time and chance happeneth to them all. 
For man also knoweth not his time: as the fishes that are taken in an evil net, and as the birds that are caught in the snare; so are the sons of men snared in an evil time, when it falleth suddenly upon them. 
This wisdom have I seen also under the sun, and it seemed great unto me: 
There was a little city, and few men within it; and there came a great king against it, and besieged i
559,ah, and in the streets of Jerusalem, saying, Hear ye the words of this covenant, and do them. 
For I earnestly protested unto your fathers in the day that I brought them up out of the land of Egypt, even unto this day, rising early and protesting, saying, Obey my voice. 
Yet they obeyed not, nor inclined their ear, but walked every one in the imagination of their evil heart: therefore I will bring upon them all the words of this covenant, which I commanded them to do: but they did them not. 
And the LORD said unto me, A conspiracy is found among the men
511,f that city shall bring down the heifer unto a rough valley, which is neither eared nor sown, and shall strike off the heifer's neck there in the valley: 
And the priests the sons of Levi shall come near; for them the LORD thy God hath chosen to minister unto him, and to bless in the name of the LORD; and by their word shall every controversy and every stroke be tried: 
And all the elders of that city, that are next unto the slain man, shall wash their hands over the heifer that is beheaded in the valley: 
492,m money. 
And he promised, and sought opportunity to betray him unto them in the absence of the multitude. 
Then came the day of unleavened bread, when the passover must be killed. 
And he sent Peter and John, saying, Go and prepare us the passover, that we may eat. 
And they said unto him, Where wilt thou that we prepare? 
And he said unto them, Behold, when ye are entered into the city, there shall a man meet you, bearing a pitcher of water; follow him into the house where he entereth 
517,LORD, worshipping the LORD. 
And the Levites, of the children of the Kohathites, and of the children of the Korhites, stood up to praise the LORD God of Israel with a loud voice on high. 
And they rose early in the morning, and went forth into the wilderness of Tekoa: and as they went forth, Jehoshaphat stood and said, Hear me, O Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem; Believe in the LORD your God, so shall ye be established; believe his prophets, so shall ye prosper. 
And when he had consulted with the people, 
561,touched the hem of his garment: 
For she said within herself, If I may but touch his garment, I shall be whole. 
But Jesus turned him about, and when he saw her, he said, Daughter, be of good comfort; thy faith hath made thee whole. And the woman was made whole from that hour. 
And when Jesus came into the ruler's house, and saw the minstrels and the people making a noise, 
He said unto them, Give place: for the maid is not dead, but sleepeth. And they laughed him to scorn. 
But when the people were put forth, he went in, and took her by the hand, and the
536,f, and not die. 
I am the living bread which came down from heaven: if any man eat of this bread, he shall live for ever: and the bread that I will give is my flesh, which I will give for the life of the world. 
The Jews therefore strove among themselves, saying, How can this man give us his flesh to eat? 
Then Jesus said unto them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Except ye eat the flesh of the Son of man, and drink his blood, ye have no life in you. 
Whoso eateth my flesh, and drinketh my blood, hath eternal life; and I will rais
576,tuously, but thou excellest them all. 
Favour is deceitful, and beauty is vain: but a woman that feareth the LORD, she shall be praised. 
Give her of the fruit of her hands; and let her own works praise her in the gates. 
The words of the Preacher, the son of David, king in Jerusalem. 
Vanity of vanities, saith the Preacher, vanity of vanities; all is vanity. 
What profit hath a man of all his labour which he taketh under the sun? 
One generation passeth away, and another generation cometh: but the earth abideth for ever. 
The sun also ariseth, and the sun goeth down, a
526,idered, and saw fourfooted beasts of the earth, and wild beasts, and creeping things, and fowls of the air. 
And I heard a voice saying unto me, Arise, Peter; slay and eat. 
But I said, Not so, Lord: for nothing common or unclean hath at any time entered into my mouth. 
But the voice answered me again from heaven, What God hath cleansed, that call not thou common. 
And this was done three times: and all were drawn up again into heaven. 
And, behold, immediately there were three men already come unto the house where I was
506,t all the other people go every man unto his place. 
So the people took victuals in their hand, and their trumpets: and he sent all the rest of Israel every man unto his tent, and retained those three hundred men: and the host of Midian was beneath him in the valley. 
And it came to pass the same night, that the LORD said unto him, Arise, get thee down unto the host; for I have delivered it into thine hand. 
But if thou fear to go down, go thou with Phurah thy servant down to the host: 
And thou shalt
549,ht to stone thee; and goest thou thither again? 
Jesus answered, Are there not twelve hours in the day? If any man walk in the day, he stumbleth not, because he seeth the light of this world. 
But if a man walk in the night, he stumbleth, because there is no light in him. 
These things said he: and after that he saith unto them, Our friend Lazarus sleepeth; but I go, that I may awake him out of sleep. 
Then said his disciples, Lord, if he sleep, he shall do well. 
Howbeit Jesus spake of his death: but they thought that he had spoken of taking 
636,spent their time in nothing else, but either to tell, or to hear some new thing.) 
Then Paul stood in the midst of Mars' hill, and said, Ye men of Athens, I perceive that in all things ye are too superstitious. 
For as I passed by, and beheld your devotions, I found an altar with this inscription, TO THE UNKNOWN GOD. Whom therefore ye ignorantly worship, him declare I unto you. 
God that made the world and all things therein, seeing that he is Lord of heaven and earth, dwelleth not in temples made with hands; 
Neither is worshipped with men's hands, as though he needed any thing, seeing he giveth to all life, and breath, and all
493,here with the kings of Persia. 
Now I am come to make thee understand what shall befall thy people in the latter days: for yet the vision is for many days. 
And when he had spoken such words unto me, I set my face toward the ground, and I became dumb. 
And, behold, one like the similitude of the sons of men touched my lips: then I opened my mouth, and spake, and said unto him that stood before me, O my lord, by the vision my sorrows are turned upon me, and I have retained no strength. 
Fo
573,on every head; and I will make it as the mourning of an only son, and the end thereof as a bitter day. 
Behold, the days come, saith the Lord GOD, that I will send a famine in the land, not a famine of bread, nor a thirst for water, but of hearing the words of the LORD: 
And they shall wander from sea to sea, and from the north even to the east, they shall run to and fro to seek the word of the LORD, and shall not find it. 
In that day shall the fair virgins and young men faint for thirst. 
They that swear by the sin of Samaria, and say, Thy god, O Dan, liveth; and, 
683,with an high hand. 
But the Egyptians pursued after them, all the horses and chariots of Pharaoh, and his horsemen, and his army, and overtook them encamping by the sea, beside Pihahiroth, before Baalzephon. 
And when Pharaoh drew nigh, the children of Israel lifted up their eyes, and, behold, the Egyptians marched after them; and they were sore afraid: and the children of Israel cried out unto the LORD. 
And they said unto Moses, Because there were no graves in Egypt, hast thou taken us away to die in the wilderness? wherefore hast thou dealt thus with us, to carry us forth out of Egypt? 
Is not this the word that we did tell thee in Egypt, saying, Let us alone, that we may
649,essels that were in the tabernacle, these did the priests and the Levites bring up. 
Also king Solomon, and all the congregation of Israel that were assembled unto him before the ark, sacrificed sheep and oxen, which could not be told nor numbered for multitude. 
And the priests brought in the ark of the covenant of the LORD unto his place, to the oracle of the house, into the most holy place, even under the wings of the cherubims: 
For the cherubims spread forth their wings over the place of the ark, and the cherubims covered the ark and the staves thereof above. 
And they drew out the staves of the ark, that the ends of the staves were see
573,; and ye shall do no servile work therein. 
These are the feasts of the LORD, which ye shall proclaim to be holy convocations, to offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD, a burnt offering, and a meat offering, a sacrifice, and drink offerings, every thing upon his day: 
Beside the sabbaths of the LORD, and beside your gifts, and beside all your vows, and beside all your freewill offerings, which ye give unto the LORD. 
Also in the fifteenth day of the seventh month, when ye have gathered in the fruit of the land, ye shall keep a feast unto the LORD seven days: o
646,th into the world. 
He was in the world, and the world was made by him, and the world knew him not. 
He came unto his own, and his own received him not. 
But as many as received him, to them gave he power to become the sons of God, even to them that believe on his name: 
Which were born, not of blood, nor of the will of the flesh, nor of the will of man, but of God. 
And the Word was made flesh, and dwelt among us, (and we beheld his glory, the glory as of the only begotten of the Father,) full of grace and truth. 
John bare witness of him, and cried, saying, This was he of whom I spake, He that cometh after me is preferred before me: for
547,. 
The sword without, and terror within, shall destroy both the young man and the virgin, the suckling also with the man of gray hairs. 
I said, I would scatter them into corners, I would make the remembrance of them to cease from among men: 
Were it not that I feared the wrath of the enemy, lest their adversaries should behave themselves strangely, and lest they should say, Our hand is high, and the LORD hath not done all this. 
For they are a nation void of counsel, neither is there any understanding in them. 
O that they were wise, that t
690,thee. For Jacob knew not that Rachel had stolen them. 
And Laban went into Jacob's tent, and into Leah's tent, and into the two maidservants' tents; but he found them not. Then went he out of Leah's tent, and entered into Rachel's tent. 
Now Rachel had taken the images, and put them in the camel's furniture, and sat upon them. And Laban searched all the tent, but found them not. 
And she said to her father, Let it not displease my lord that I cannot rise up before thee; for the custom of women is upon me. And he searched but found not the images. 
And Jacob was wroth, and chode with Laban: and Jacob answered and said to Laban, What is my trespass? what is my sin, that thou hast so 
606,nd blasphemed the God of heaven because of their pains and their sores, and repented not of their deeds. 
And the sixth angel poured out his vial upon the great river Euphrates; and the water thereof was dried up, that the way of the kings of the east might be prepared. 
And I saw three unclean spirits like frogs come out of the mouth of the dragon, and out of the mouth of the beast, and out of the mouth of the false prophet. 
For they are the spirits of devils, working miracles, which go forth unto the kings of the earth and of the whole world, to gather them to the battle of that great day of God 
542,ed linen of an hundred cubits long for one side: 
And the twenty pillars thereof and their twenty sockets shall be of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets shall be of silver. 
And likewise for the north side in length there shall be hangings of an hundred cubits long, and his twenty pillars and their twenty sockets of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets of silver. 
And for the breadth of the court on the west side shall be hangings of fifty cubits: their pillars ten, and their sockets ten. 
And the breadth of 
695,aesarea called Cornelius, a centurion of the band called the Italian band, 
A devout man, and one that feared God with all his house, which gave much alms to the people, and prayed to God alway. 
He saw in a vision evidently about the ninth hour of the day an angel of God coming in to him, and saying unto him, Cornelius. 
And when he looked on him, he was afraid, and said, What is it, Lord? And he said unto him, Thy prayers and thine alms are come up for a memorial before God. 
And now send men to Joppa, and call for one Simon, whose surname is Peter: 
He lodgeth with one Simon a tanner, whose house is by the sea side: he shall tell thee what thou oughtest to do. 
And when the angel whi
536, north is for the priests, the keepers of the charge of the altar: these are the sons of Zadok among the sons of Levi, which come near to the LORD to minister unto him. 
So he measured the court, an hundred cubits long, and an hundred cubits broad, foursquare; and the altar that was before the house. 
And he brought me to the porch of the house, and measured each post of the porch, five cubits on this side, and five cubits on that side: and the breadth of the gate was three cubits on this side, and three cubits on that side. 
The 
555,hat wouldest thou? 
Who answered, Give me a blessing; for thou hast given me a south land; give me also springs of water. And he gave her the upper springs, and the nether springs. 
This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Judah according to their families. 
And the uttermost cities of the tribe of the children of Judah toward the coast of Edom southward were Kabzeel, and Eder, and Jagur, 
And Kinah, and Dimonah, and Adadah, 
And Kedesh, and Hazor, and Ithnan, 
Ziph, and Telem, and Bealoth, 
And Hazor, Hadattah, and Kerioth, and Hezro
572, unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face against Zidon, and prophesy against it, 
And say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Zidon; and I will be glorified in the midst of thee: and they shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall have executed judgments in her, and shall be sanctified in her. 
For I will send into her pestilence, and blood into her streets; and the wounded shall be judged in the midst of her by the sword upon her on every side; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
And there shall be no more a pricking brier unto the house
661,We find no evil in this man: but if a spirit or an angel hath spoken to him, let us not fight against God. 
And when there arose a great dissension, the chief captain, fearing lest Paul should have been pulled in pieces of them, commanded the soldiers to go down, and to take him by force from among them, and to bring him into the castle. 
And the night following the Lord stood by him, and said, Be of good cheer, Paul: for as thou hast testified of me in Jerusalem, so must thou bear witness also at Rome. 
And when it was day, certain of the Jews banded together, and bound themselves under a curse, saying that they would neither eat nor drink till they ha
592,ers God had wrought among the Gentiles by them. 
And after they had held their peace, James answered, saying, Men and brethren, hearken unto me: 
Simeon hath declared how God at the first did visit the Gentiles, to take out of them a people for his name. 
And to this agree the words of the prophets; as it is written, 
After this I will return, and will build again the tabernacle of David, which is fallen down; and I will build again the ruins thereof, and I will set it up: 
That the residue of men might seek after the Lord, and all the Gentiles, upon whom my name is called, saith the L
485,Solomon; and, behold, a greater than Solomon is here. 
The men of Nineve shall rise up in the judgment with this generation, and shall condemn it: for they repented at the preaching of Jonas; and, behold, a greater than Jonas is here. 
No man, when he hath lighted a candle, putteth it in a secret place, neither under a bushel, but on a candlestick, that they which come in may see the light. 
The light of the body is the eye: therefore when thine eye is single, thy whole body also 
649, my words, O ye wise men; and give ear unto me, ye that have knowledge. 
For the ear trieth words, as the mouth tasteth meat. 
Let us choose to us judgment: let us know among ourselves what is good. 
For Job hath said, I am righteous: and God hath taken away my judgment. 
Should I lie against my right? my wound is incurable without transgression. 
What man is like Job, who drinketh up scorning like water? 
Which goeth in company with the workers of iniquity, and walketh with wicked men. 
For he hath said, It profiteth a man nothing that he should delight himself with God. 
Therefore hearken unto me ye men of understanding: far be it from God
629,cause of his people, Behold, I have taken out of thine hand the cup of trembling, even the dregs of the cup of my fury; thou shalt no more drink it again: 
But I will put it into the hand of them that afflict thee; which have said to thy soul, Bow down, that we may go over: and thou hast laid thy body as the ground, and as the street, to them that went over. 
Awake, awake; put on thy strength, O Zion; put on thy beautiful garments, O Jerusalem, the holy city: for henceforth there shall no more come into thee the uncircumcised and the unclean. 
Shake thyself from the dust; arise, and sit down, O Jerusalem: loose thyself fr
692,as baptizing in Aenon near to Salim, because there was much water there: and they came, and were baptized. 
For John was not yet cast into prison. 
Then there arose a question between some of John's disciples and the Jews about purifying. 
And they came unto John, and said unto him, Rabbi, he that was with thee beyond Jordan, to whom thou barest witness, behold, the same baptizeth, and all men come to him. 
John answered and said, A man can receive nothing, except it be given him from heaven. 
Ye yourselves bear me witness, that I said, I am not the Christ, but that I am sent before him. 
He that hath the bride is the bridegroom: but the friend of the bridegroom, which standeth and h
698,far off upon the sea: 
Which by his strength setteth fast the mountains; being girded with power: 
Which stilleth the noise of the seas, the noise of their waves, and the tumult of the people. 
They also that dwell in the uttermost parts are afraid at thy tokens: thou makest the outgoings of the morning and evening to rejoice. 
Thou visitest the earth, and waterest it: thou greatly enrichest it with the river of God, which is full of water: thou preparest them corn, when thou hast so provided for it. 
Thou waterest the ridges thereof abundantly: thou settlest the furrows thereof: thou makest it soft with showers: thou blessest the springing thereof. 
Thou crownest the year with thy goodnes
591,ah, and smote their tents, and the habitations that were found there, and destroyed them utterly unto this day, and dwelt in their rooms: because there was pasture there for their flocks. 
And some of them, even of the sons of Simeon, five hundred men, went to mount Seir, having for their captains Pelatiah, and Neariah, and Rephaiah, and Uzziel, the sons of Ishi. 
And they smote the rest of the Amalekites that were escaped, and dwelt there unto this day. 
Now the sons of Reuben the firstborn of Israel, (for he was the firstborn; but forasmuch as he defiled his father's bed, his birthr
555,shment to every one that passeth by it; so that he shall say, Why hath the LORD done thus unto this land, and unto this house? 
And it shall be answered, Because they forsook the LORD God of their fathers, which brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, and laid hold on other gods, and worshipped them, and served them: therefore hath he brought all this evil upon them. 
And it came to pass at the end of twenty years, wherein Solomon had built the house of the LORD, and his own house, 
That the cities which Huram had restored to Solomon, Solomon b
502,g to the hope of eternal life. 
This is a faithful saying, and these things I will that thou affirm constantly, that they which have believed in God might be careful to maintain good works. These things are good and profitable unto men. 
But avoid foolish questions, and genealogies, and contentions, and strivings about the law; for they are unprofitable and vain. 
A man that is an heretick after the first and second admonition reject; 
Knowing that he that is such is subverted, and sinneth, being 
483,ich they builded. 
And the children of Machir the son of Manasseh went to Gilead, and took it, and dispossessed the Amorite which was in it. 
And Moses gave Gilead unto Machir the son of Manasseh; and he dwelt therein. 
And Jair the son of Manasseh went and took the small towns thereof, and called them Havothjair. 
And Nobah went and took Kenath, and the villages thereof, and called it Nobah, after his own name. 
These are the journeys of the children of Israel, which went forth
495,tion of the world are clearly seen, being understood by the things that are made, even his eternal power and Godhead; so that they are without excuse: 
Because that, when they knew God, they glorified him not as God, neither were thankful; but became vain in their imaginations, and their foolish heart was darkened. 
Professing themselves to be wise, they became fools, 
And changed the glory of the uncorruptible God into an image made like to corruptible man, and to birds, and fourfooted bea
594,in the mean while, that the heaven was black with clouds and wind, and there was a great rain. And Ahab rode, and went to Jezreel. 
And the hand of the LORD was on Elijah; and he girded up his loins, and ran before Ahab to the entrance of Jezreel. 
And Ahab told Jezebel all that Elijah had done, and withal how he had slain all the prophets with the sword. 
Then Jezebel sent a messenger unto Elijah, saying, So let the gods do to me, and more also, if I make not thy life as the life of one of them by to morrow about this time. 
And when he saw that, he arose, and went for his life, and cam
590,he LORD, whether it be of men or beasts, shall be thine: nevertheless the firstborn of man shalt thou surely redeem, and the firstling of unclean beasts shalt thou redeem. 
And those that are to be redeemed from a month old shalt thou redeem, according to thine estimation, for the money of five shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary, which is twenty gerahs. 
But the firstling of a cow, or the firstling of a sheep, or the firstling of a goat, thou shalt not redeem; they are holy: thou shalt sprinkle their blood upon the altar, and shalt burn their fat for an offering made by fire,
619,: for they knew all that his father was a Greek. 
And as they went through the cities, they delivered them the decrees for to keep, that were ordained of the apostles and elders which were at Jerusalem. 
And so were the churches established in the faith, and increased in number daily. 
Now when they had gone throughout Phrygia and the region of Galatia, and were forbidden of the Holy Ghost to preach the word in Asia, 
After they were come to Mysia, they assayed to go into Bithynia: but the Spirit suffered them not. 
And they passing by Mysia came down to Troas. 
And a vision appeared to Paul in the night; There 
671,unto the prayer of thy servant, and to his supplication, O LORD my God, to hearken unto the cry and to the prayer, which thy servant prayeth before thee to day: 
That thine eyes may be open toward this house night and day, even toward the place of which thou hast said, My name shall be there: that thou mayest hearken unto the prayer which thy servant shall make toward this place. 
And hearken thou to the supplication of thy servant, and of thy people Israel, when they shall pray toward this place: and hear thou in heaven thy dwelling place: and when thou hearest, forgive. 
If any man trespass against his neighbour, and an oath be laid upon him to cause him to swe
562,gainst me, him will I blot out of my book. 
Therefore now go, lead the people unto the place of which I have spoken unto thee: behold, mine Angel shall go before thee: nevertheless in the day when I visit I will visit their sin upon them. 
And the LORD plagued the people, because they made the calf, which Aaron made. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Depart, and go up hence, thou and the people which thou hast brought up out of the land of Egypt, unto the land which I sware unto Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, saying, Unto thy seed will I give it: 
And I wil
512,hewed thee in the mount. 
And thou shalt make a vail of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen of cunning work: with cherubims shall it be made: 
And thou shalt hang it upon four pillars of shittim wood overlaid with gold: their hooks shall be of gold, upon the four sockets of silver. 
And thou shalt hang up the vail under the taches, that thou mayest bring in thither within the vail the ark of the testimony: and the vail shall divide unto you between the holy place and the most holy. 
And tho
507, did unto the land of his possession, which the LORD gave unto them. 
Now rise up, said I, and get you over the brook Zered. And we went over the brook Zered. 
And the space in which we came from Kadeshbarnea, until we were come over the brook Zered, was thirty and eight years; until all the generation of the men of war were wasted out from among the host, as the LORD sware unto them. 
For indeed the hand of the LORD was against them, to destroy them from among the host, until they were consumed. 
So i
520,and gold, I cannot go beyond the word of the LORD my God, to do less or more. 
Now therefore, I pray you, tarry ye also here this night, that I may know what the LORD will say unto me more. 
And God came unto Balaam at night, and said unto him, If the men come to call thee, rise up, and go with them; but yet the word which I shall say unto thee, that shalt thou do. 
And Balaam rose up in the morning, and saddled his ass, and went with the princes of Moab. 
And God's anger was kindled because he went: and the angel 
651,urnt offering that the prince shall offer unto the LORD in the sabbath day shall be six lambs without blemish, and a ram without blemish. 
And the meat offering shall be an ephah for a ram, and the meat offering for the lambs as he shall be able to give, and an hin of oil to an ephah. 
And in the day of the new moon it shall be a young bullock without blemish, and six lambs, and a ram: they shall be without blemish. 
And he shall prepare a meat offering, an ephah for a bullock, and an ephah for a ram, and for the lambs according as his hand shall attain unto, and an hin of oil to an ephah. 
And when the prince shall enter, he shall go in by th
644, we all perish. 
Whosoever cometh any thing near unto the tabernacle of the LORD shall die: shall we be consumed with dying? 
And the LORD said unto Aaron, Thou and thy sons and thy father's house with thee shall bear the iniquity of the sanctuary: and thou and thy sons with thee shall bear the iniquity of your priesthood. 
And thy brethren also of the tribe of Levi, the tribe of thy father, bring thou with thee, that they may be joined unto thee, and minister unto thee: but thou and thy sons with thee shall minister before the tabernacle of witness. 
And they shall keep thy charge, and the charge of all the tabernacle: only they shall 
628,f I passed over this Jordan; and now I am become two bands. 
Deliver me, I pray thee, from the hand of my brother, from the hand of Esau: for I fear him, lest he will come and smite me, and the mother with the children. 
And thou saidst, I will surely do thee good, and make thy seed as the sand of the sea, which cannot be numbered for multitude. 
And he lodged there that same night; and took of that which came to his hand a present for Esau his brother; 
Two hundred she goats, and twenty he goats, two hundred ewes, and twenty rams, 
Thirty milch camels with their colts, forty kine, and ten bulls, twenty she asses, and te
546,D saw it, he abhorred them, because of the provoking of his sons, and of his daughters. 
And he said, I will hide my face from them, I will see what their end shall be: for they are a very froward generation, children in whom is no faith. 
They have moved me to jealousy with that which is not God; they have provoked me to anger with their vanities: and I will move them to jealousy with those which are not a people; I will provoke them to anger with a foolish nation. 
For a fire is kindled in mine anger, and shall burn unto the lowest hell, 
580,I will not believe. 
And after eight days again his disciples were within, and Thomas with them: then came Jesus, the doors being shut, and stood in the midst, and said, Peace be unto you. 
Then saith he to Thomas, Reach hither thy finger, and behold my hands; and reach hither thy hand, and thrust it into my side: and be not faithless, but believing. 
And Thomas answered and said unto him, My LORD and my God. 
Jesus saith unto him, Thomas, because thou hast seen me, thou hast believed: blessed are they that have not seen, and yet have believed. 
And many other signs truly d
650,hath said in his heart, Thou wilt not require it. 
Thou hast seen it; for thou beholdest mischief and spite, to requite it with thy hand: the poor committeth himself unto thee; thou art the helper of the fatherless. 
Break thou the arm of the wicked and the evil man: seek out his wickedness till thou find none. 
The LORD is King for ever and ever: the heathen are perished out of his land. 
LORD, thou hast heard the desire of the humble: thou wilt prepare their heart, thou wilt cause thine ear to hear: 
To judge the fatherless and the oppressed, that the man of the earth may no more oppress. 
In the LORD put I my trust: how say ye to my soul, 
637, and purely purge away thy dross, and take away all thy tin: 
And I will restore thy judges as at the first, and thy counsellors as at the beginning: afterward thou shalt be called, The city of righteousness, the faithful city. 
Zion shall be redeemed with judgment, and her converts with righteousness. 
And the destruction of the transgressors and of the sinners shall be together, and they that forsake the LORD shall be consumed. 
For they shall be ashamed of the oaks which ye have desired, and ye shall be confounded for the gardens that ye have chosen. 
For ye shall be as an oak whose leaf fadeth, and as a garden that hath no wa
561,ah build, who also laid the beams thereof, and set up the doors thereof, the locks thereof, and the bars thereof. 
And next unto them repaired Meremoth the son of Urijah, the son of Koz. And next unto them repaired Meshullam the son of Berechiah, the son of Meshezabeel. And next unto them repaired Zadok the son of Baana. 
And next unto them the Tekoites repaired; but their nobles put not their necks to the work of their LORD. 
Moreover the old gate repaired Jehoiada the son of Paseah, and Meshullam the son of Besodeiah; they laid the beams thereof, and se
594,n the brethren came and testified of the truth that is in thee, even as thou walkest in the truth. 
I have no greater joy than to hear that my children walk in truth. 
Beloved, thou doest faithfully whatsoever thou doest to the brethren, and to strangers; 
Which have borne witness of thy charity before the church: whom if thou bring forward on their journey after a godly sort, thou shalt do well: 
Because that for his name's sake they went forth, taking nothing of the Gentiles. 
We therefore ought to receive such, that we might be fellowhelpers to the truth. 
I wrote unto the church: but
685,of Judah. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were threescore and fourteen thousand and six hundred. 
And those that do pitch next unto him shall be the tribe of Issachar: and Nethaneel the son of Zuar shall be captain of the children of Issachar. 
And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and four thousand and four hundred. 
Then the tribe of Zebulun: and Eliab the son of Helon shall be captain of the children of Zebulun. 
And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and seven thousand and four hundred. 
All that were numbered in the camp of Judah were an hundred thousand and fourscore thousand and six thousand and four 
505,be borne with them. 
The staves shall be in the rings of the ark: they shall not be taken from it. 
And thou shalt put into the ark the testimony which I shall give thee. 
And thou shalt make a mercy seat of pure gold: two cubits and a half shall be the length thereof, and a cubit and a half the breadth thereof. 
And thou shalt make two cherubims of gold, of beaten work shalt thou make them, in the two ends of the mercy seat. 
And make one cherub on the one end, and the other cherub on the other end:
571, 
And all the angels stood round about the throne, and about the elders and the four beasts, and fell before the throne on their faces, and worshipped God, 
Saying, Amen: Blessing, and glory, and wisdom, and thanksgiving, and honour, and power, and might, be unto our God for ever and ever. Amen. 
And one of the elders answered, saying unto me, What are these which are arrayed in white robes? and whence came they? 
And I said unto him, Sir, thou knowest. And he said to me, These are they which came out of great tribulation, and have washed their robes, and made them
569,rophesy a thousand two hundred and threescore days, clothed in sackcloth. 
These are the two olive trees, and the two candlesticks standing before the God of the earth. 
And if any man will hurt them, fire proceedeth out of their mouth, and devoureth their enemies: and if any man will hurt them, he must in this manner be killed. 
These have power to shut heaven, that it rain not in the days of their prophecy: and have power over waters to turn them to blood, and to smite the earth with all plagues, as often as they will. 
And when they shall have finished their t
532,he house of God be builded in his place. 
Then came the same Sheshbazzar, and laid the foundation of the house of God which is in Jerusalem: and since that time even until now hath it been in building, and yet it is not finished. 
Now therefore, if it seem good to the king, let there be search made in the king's treasure house, which is there at Babylon, whether it be so, that a decree was made of Cyrus the king to build this house of God at Jerusalem, and let the king send his pleasure to us concerning this matter. 
Then Dari
548,s mount Sinai in Arabia, and answereth to Jerusalem which now is, and is in bondage with her children. 
But Jerusalem which is above is free, which is the mother of us all. 
For it is written, Rejoice, thou barren that bearest not; break forth and cry, thou that travailest not: for the desolate hath many more children than she which hath an husband. 
Now we, brethren, as Isaac was, are the children of promise. 
But as then he that was born after the flesh persecuted him that was born after the Spirit, even so it is now. 
Nevertheless what sai
518,will I give their wives unto others, and their fields to them that shall inherit them: for every one from the least even unto the greatest is given to covetousness, from the prophet even unto the priest every one dealeth falsely. 
For they have healed the hurt of the daughter of my people slightly, saying, Peace, peace; when there is no peace. 
Were they ashamed when they had committed abomination? nay, they were not at all ashamed, neither could they blush: therefore shall they fall among them that fall: in the 
696,to the Gentiles, ministering the gospel of God, that the offering up of the Gentiles might be acceptable, being sanctified by the Holy Ghost. 
I have therefore whereof I may glory through Jesus Christ in those things which pertain to God. 
For I will not dare to speak of any of those things which Christ hath not wrought by me, to make the Gentiles obedient, by word and deed, 
Through mighty signs and wonders, by the power of the Spirit of God; so that from Jerusalem, and round about unto Illyricum, I have fully preached the gospel of Christ. 
Yea, so have I strived to preach the gospel, not where Christ was named, lest I should build upon another man's foundation: 
But as it is written, 
628,nto the clouds. 
Be thou exalted, O God, above the heavens: and thy glory above all the earth; 
That thy beloved may be delivered: save with thy right hand, and answer me. 
God hath spoken in his holiness; I will rejoice, I will divide Shechem, and mete out the valley of Succoth. 
Gilead is mine; Manasseh is mine; Ephraim also is the strength of mine head; Judah is my lawgiver; 
Moab is my washpot; over Edom will I cast out my shoe; over Philistia will I triumph. 
Who will bring me into the strong city? who will lead me into Edom? 
Wilt not thou, O God, who hast cast us off? and wilt not thou, O God, go forth with our ho
701,e children in the valleys under the clifts of the rocks? 
Among the smooth stones of the stream is thy portion; they, they are thy lot: even to them hast thou poured a drink offering, thou hast offered a meat offering. Should I receive comfort in these? 
Upon a lofty and high mountain hast thou set thy bed: even thither wentest thou up to offer sacrifice. 
Behind the doors also and the posts hast thou set up thy remembrance: for thou hast discovered thyself to another than me, and art gone up; thou hast enlarged thy bed, and made thee a covenant with them; thou lovedst their bed where thou sawest it. 
And thou wentest to the king with ointment, and didst increase thy perfumes, and didst send 
684,ave sent thee away in peace: thou art now the blessed of the LORD. 
And he made them a feast, and they did eat and drink. 
And they rose up betimes in the morning, and sware one to another: and Isaac sent them away, and they departed from him in peace. 
And it came to pass the same day, that Isaac's servants came, and told him concerning the well which they had digged, and said unto him, We have found water. 
And he called it Shebah: therefore the name of the city is Beersheba unto this day. 
And Esau was forty years old when he took to wife Judith the daughter of Beeri the Hittite, and Bashemath the daughter of Elon the Hittite: 
Which were a grief of mind unto Isaac and to 
654,. 
So the children of Joseph, Manasseh and Ephraim, took their inheritance. 
And the border of the children of Ephraim according to their families was thus: even the border of their inheritance on the east side was Atarothaddar, unto Bethhoron the upper; 
And the border went out toward the sea to Michmethah on the north side; and the border went about eastward unto Taanathshiloh, and passed by it on the east to Janohah; 
And it went down from Janohah to Ataroth, and to Naarath, and came to Jericho, and went out at Jordan. 
The border went out from Tappuah westward unto the river Kanah; and the goings out thereof were at the sea. This is the inher
537,ed of healing. 
And when the day began to wear away, then came the twelve, and said unto him, Send the multitude away, that they may go into the towns and country round about, and lodge, and get victuals: for we are here in a desert place. 
But he said unto them, Give ye them to eat. And they said, We have no more but five loaves and two fishes; except we should go and buy meat for all this people. 
For they were about five thousand men. And he said to his disciples, Make them sit down by fifties in a company. 
And they did so, and
543,ow me, and ye know whence I am: and I am not come of myself, but he that sent me is true, whom ye know not. 
But I know him: for I am from him, and he hath sent me. 
Then they sought to take him: but no man laid hands on him, because his hour was not yet come. 
And many of the people believed on him, and said, When Christ cometh, will he do more miracles than these which this man hath done? 
The Pharisees heard that the people murmured such things concerning him; and the Pharisees and the chief priests sent officers to take him. 
Then sa
585,n to sit on his throne, as it is this day. 
And now, O LORD my God, thou hast made thy servant king instead of David my father: and I am but a little child: I know not how to go out or come in. 
And thy servant is in the midst of thy people which thou hast chosen, a great people, that cannot be numbered nor counted for multitude. 
Give therefore thy servant an understanding heart to judge thy people, that I may discern between good and bad: for who is able to judge this thy so great a people? 
And the speech pleased the LORD, that Solomon had asked this thing. 
And God said unto
682,t Rimmonparez. 
And they departed from Rimmonparez, and pitched in Libnah. 
And they removed from Libnah, and pitched at Rissah. 
And they journeyed from Rissah, and pitched in Kehelathah. 
And they went from Kehelathah, and pitched in mount Shapher. 
And they removed from mount Shapher, and encamped in Haradah. 
And they removed from Haradah, and pitched in Makheloth. 
And they removed from Makheloth, and encamped at Tahath. 
And they departed from Tahath, and pitched at Tarah. 
And they removed from Tarah, and pitched in Mithcah. 
And they went from Mithcah, and pitched in Hashmonah. 
And they departed from Hashmonah, and encamped at Moseroth. 
And they departed from Mose
669,m in the city of David: and Ahaz his son reigned in his stead. 
Ahaz was twenty years old when he began to reign, and he reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem: but he did not that which was right in the sight of the LORD, like David his father: 
For he walked in the ways of the kings of Israel, and made also molten images for Baalim. 
Moreover he burnt incense in the valley of the son of Hinnom, and burnt his children in the fire, after the abominations of the heathen whom the LORD had cast out before the children of Israel. 
He sacrificed also and burnt incense in the high places, and on the hills, and under every green tree. 
Wherefore the LORD his God delivered
689, strange gods which are among you, and incline your heart unto the LORD God of Israel. 
And the people said unto Joshua, The LORD our God will we serve, and his voice will we obey. 
So Joshua made a covenant with the people that day, and set them a statute and an ordinance in Shechem. 
And Joshua wrote these words in the book of the law of God, and took a great stone, and set it up there under an oak, that was by the sanctuary of the LORD. 
And Joshua said unto all the people, Behold, this stone shall be a witness unto us; for it hath heard all the words of the LORD which he spake unto us: it shall be therefore a witness unto you, lest ye deny your God. 
So Joshua let the people d
672,f their god. 
Yet destroyed I the Amorite before them, whose height was like the height of the cedars, and he was strong as the oaks; yet I destroyed his fruit from above, and his roots from beneath. 
Also I brought you up from the land of Egypt, and led you forty years through the wilderness, to possess the land of the Amorite. 
And I raised up of your sons for prophets, and of your young men for Nazarites. Is it not even thus, O ye children of Israel? saith the LORD. 
But ye gave the Nazarites wine to drink; and commanded the prophets, saying, Prophesy not. 
Behold, I am pressed under you, as a cart is pressed that is full of sheaves. 
Therefore the flight shall
627,On the fourth day Elizur the son of Shedeur, prince of the children of Reuben, did offer: 
His offering was one silver charger of the weight of an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 
One golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense: 
One young bullock, one ram, one lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 
One kid of the goats for a sin offering: 
And for a sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of the first year: this was the offering of Elizur 
512,presidents and princes sought to find occasion against Daniel concerning the kingdom; but they could find none occasion nor fault; forasmuch as he was faithful, neither was there any error or fault found in him. 
Then said these men, We shall not find any occasion against this Daniel, except we find it against him concerning the law of his God. 
Then these presidents and princes assembled together to the king, and said thus unto him, King Darius, live for ever. 
All the presidents of the kingdom, the govern
688, the Levites, and said to them, Go out unto the cities of Judah, and gather of all Israel money to repair the house of your God from year to year, and see that ye hasten the matter. Howbeit the Levites hastened it not. 
And the king called for Jehoiada the chief, and said unto him, Why hast thou not required of the Levites to bring in out of Judah and out of Jerusalem the collection, according to the commandment of Moses the servant of the LORD, and of the congregation of Israel, for the tabernacle of witness? 
For the sons of Athaliah, that wicked woman, had broken up the house of God; and also all the dedicated things of the house of the LORD did they bestow upon Baalim. 
And a
694,ar the king of Babylon had carried away unto Babylon, and came again unto Jerusalem and Judah, every one unto his city; 
Which came with Zerubbabel: Jeshua, Nehemiah, Seraiah, Reelaiah, Mordecai, Bilshan, Mizpar, Bigvai, Rehum, Baanah. The number of the men of the people of Israel: 
The children of Parosh, two thousand an hundred seventy and two. 
The children of Shephatiah, three hundred seventy and two. 
The children of Arah, seven hundred seventy and five. 
The children of Pahathmoab, of the children of Jeshua and Joab, two thousand eight hundred and twelve. 
The children of Elam, a thousand two hundred fifty and four. 
The children of Zattu, nine hundred forty and five. 
The childr
496,niquities are increased over our head, and our trespass is grown up unto the heavens. 
Since the days of our fathers have we been in a great trespass unto this day; and for our iniquities have we, our kings, and our priests, been delivered into the hand of the kings of the lands, to the sword, to captivity, and to a spoil, and to confusion of face, as it is this day. 
And now for a little space grace hath been shewed from the LORD our God, to leave us a remnant to escape, and to give us a na
531,altar to the LORD in the midst of the land of Egypt, and a pillar at the border thereof to the LORD. 
And it shall be for a sign and for a witness unto the LORD of hosts in the land of Egypt: for they shall cry unto the LORD because of the oppressors, and he shall send them a saviour, and a great one, and he shall deliver them. 
And the LORD shall be known to Egypt, and the Egyptians shall know the LORD in that day, and shall do sacrifice and oblation; yea, they shall vow a vow unto the LORD, and perform it. 
And the LORD sha
687,hat thou hast sent him away, and he is quite gone? 
Thou knowest Abner the son of Ner, that he came to deceive thee, and to know thy going out and thy coming in, and to know all that thou doest. 
And when Joab was come out from David, he sent messengers after Abner, which brought him again from the well of Sirah: but David knew it not. 
And when Abner was returned to Hebron, Joab took him aside in the gate to speak with him quietly, and smote him there under the fifth rib, that he died, for the blood of Asahel his brother. 
And afterward when David heard it, he said, I and my kingdom are guiltless before the LORD for ever from the blood of Abner the son of Ner: 
Let it rest on t
542,surrection, and asked him, 
Saying, Master, Moses said, If a man die, having no children, his brother shall marry his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
Now there were with us seven brethren: and the first, when he had married a wife, deceased, and, having no issue, left his wife unto his brother: 
Likewise the second also, and the third, unto the seventh. 
And last of all the woman died also. 
Therefore in the resurrection whose wife shall she be of the seven? for they all had her. 
Jesus answered and said unto them, Ye do err,
500,and; 
And to carry the silver and gold, which the king and his counsellors have freely offered unto the God of Israel, whose habitation is in Jerusalem, 
And all the silver and gold that thou canst find in all the province of Babylon, with the freewill offering of the people, and of the priests, offering willingly for the house of their God which is in Jerusalem: 
That thou mayest buy speedily with this money bullocks, rams, lambs, with their meat offerings and their drink offerings, and offer t
567,d as for thine asses that were lost three days ago, set not thy mind on them; for they are found. And on whom is all the desire of Israel? Is it not on thee, and on all thy father's house? 
And Saul answered and said, Am not I a Benjamite, of the smallest of the tribes of Israel? and my family the least of all the families of the tribe of Benjamin? wherefore then speakest thou so to me? 
And Samuel took Saul and his servant, and brought them into the parlour, and made them sit in the chiefest place among them that were bidden, which were about thirty persons. 

610,ehind it. 
So Joshua arose, and all the people of war, to go up against Ai: and Joshua chose out thirty thousand mighty men of valour, and sent them away by night. 
And he commanded them, saying, Behold, ye shall lie in wait against the city, even behind the city: go not very far from the city, but be ye all ready: 
And I, and all the people that are with me, will approach unto the city: and it shall come to pass, when they come out against us, as at the first, that we will flee before them, 
(For they will come out after us) till we have drawn them from the city; for they will say, They flee before us,
612,on the sabbath days, or to do evil? to save life, or to kill? But they held their peace. 
And when he had looked round about on them with anger, being grieved for the hardness of their hearts, he saith unto the man, Stretch forth thine hand. And he stretched it out: and his hand was restored whole as the other. 
And the Pharisees went forth, and straightway took counsel with the Herodians against him, how they might destroy him. 
But Jesus withdrew himself with his disciples to the sea: and a great multitude from Galilee followed him, and from Judaea, 
And from Jerusalem, and from Idumaea, and from beyond
486,towns thereof; Shechem also and the towns thereof, unto Gaza and the towns thereof: 
And by the borders of the children of Manasseh, Bethshean and her towns, Taanach and her towns, Megiddo and her towns, Dor and her towns. In these dwelt the children of Joseph the son of Israel. 
The sons of Asher; Imnah, and Isuah, and Ishuai, and Beriah, and Serah their sister. 
And the sons of Beriah; Heber, and Malchiel, who is the father of Birzavith. 
And Heber begat Japhlet, and Shomer, and 
543,rsake his people for his great name's sake: because it hath pleased the LORD to make you his people. 
Moreover as for me, God forbid that I should sin against the LORD in ceasing to pray for you: but I will teach you the good and the right way: 
Only fear the LORD, and serve him in truth with all your heart: for consider how great things he hath done for you. 
But if ye shall still do wickedly, ye shall be consumed, both ye and your king. 
Saul reigned one year; and when he had reigned two years over Israel, 
Saul chose him three thousan
584,ssess the land. 
When ye go, ye shall come unto a people secure, and to a large land: for God hath given it into your hands; a place where there is no want of any thing that is in the earth. 
And there went from thence of the family of the Danites, out of Zorah and out of Eshtaol, six hundred men appointed with weapons of war. 
And they went up, and pitched in Kirjathjearim, in Judah: wherefore they called that place Mahanehdan unto this day: behold, it is behind Kirjathjearim. 
And they passed thence unto mount Ephraim, and came unto the house of Micah. 
Then answered the five
611,ll make of thee a greater nation and mightier than they. 
And Moses said unto the LORD, Then the Egyptians shall hear it, (for thou broughtest up this people in thy might from among them;) 
And they will tell it to the inhabitants of this land: for they have heard that thou LORD art among this people, that thou LORD art seen face to face, and that thy cloud standeth over them, and that thou goest before them, by day time in a pillar of a cloud, and in a pillar of fire by night. 
Now if thou shalt kill all this people as one man, then the nations which have heard the fame of thee will speak, saying, 
Beca
611,m by the shepherds. 
But Mary kept all these things, and pondered them in her heart. 
And the shepherds returned, glorifying and praising God for all the things that they had heard and seen, as it was told unto them. 
And when eight days were accomplished for the circumcising of the child, his name was called JESUS, which was so named of the angel before he was conceived in the womb. 
And when the days of her purification according to the law of Moses were accomplished, they brought him to Jerusalem, to present him to the Lord; 
(As it is written in the law of the LORD, Every male that openeth the womb s
690,s. 
And when the day was now far spent, his disciples came unto him, and said, This is a desert place, and now the time is far passed: 
Send them away, that they may go into the country round about, and into the villages, and buy themselves bread: for they have nothing to eat. 
He answered and said unto them, Give ye them to eat. And they say unto him, Shall we go and buy two hundred pennyworth of bread, and give them to eat? 
He saith unto them, How many loaves have ye? go and see. And when they knew, they say, Five, and two fishes. 
And he commanded them to make all sit down by companies upon the green grass. 
And they sat down in ranks, by hundreds, and by fifties. 
And when he 
585,to commit wickedness: for the throne is established by righteousness. 
Righteous lips are the delight of kings; and they love him that speaketh right. 
The wrath of a king is as messengers of death: but a wise man will pacify it. 
In the light of the king's countenance is life; and his favour is as a cloud of the latter rain. 
How much better is it to get wisdom than gold! and to get understanding rather to be chosen than silver! 
The highway of the upright is to depart from evil: he that keepeth his way preserveth his soul. 
Pride goeth before destruction, and an haughty spirit
634,ore eat thereof, until it be fulfilled in the kingdom of God. 
And he took the cup, and gave thanks, and said, Take this, and divide it among yourselves: 
For I say unto you, I will not drink of the fruit of the vine, until the kingdom of God shall come. 
And he took bread, and gave thanks, and brake it, and gave unto them, saying, This is my body which is given for you: this do in remembrance of me. 
Likewise also the cup after supper, saying, This cup is the new testament in my blood, which is shed for you. 
But, behold, the hand of him that betrayeth me is with me on the table. 
And truly the Son of man goeth, as it was det
529,he washed the inwards and the legs in water; and Moses burnt the whole ram upon the altar: it was a burnt sacrifice for a sweet savour, and an offering made by fire unto the LORD; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he brought the other ram, the ram of consecration: and Aaron and his sons laid their hands upon the head of the ram. 
And he slew it; and Moses took of the blood of it, and put it upon the tip of Aaron's right ear, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot. 
And he brought Aaro
695,ok the royal city. 
And Joab sent messengers to David, and said, I have fought against Rabbah, and have taken the city of waters. 
Now therefore gather the rest of the people together, and encamp against the city, and take it: lest I take the city, and it be called after my name. 
And David gathered all the people together, and went to Rabbah, and fought against it, and took it. 
And he took their king's crown from off his head, the weight whereof was a talent of gold with the precious stones: and it was set on David's head. And he brought forth the spoil of the city in great abundance. 
And he brought forth the people that were therein, and put them under saws, and under harrows of iro
572,the mouth in the slaughter, to lift up the voice with shouting, to appoint battering rams against the gates, to cast a mount, and to build a fort. 
And it shall be unto them as a false divination in their sight, to them that have sworn oaths: but he will call to remembrance the iniquity, that they may be taken. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because ye have made your iniquity to be remembered, in that your transgressions are discovered, so that in all your doings your sins do appear; because, I say, that ye are come to remembrance, ye shall be taken with the ha
621,
And I will lay it waste: it shall not be pruned, nor digged; but there shall come up briers and thorns: I will also command the clouds that they rain no rain upon it. 
For the vineyard of the LORD of hosts is the house of Israel, and the men of Judah his pleasant plant: and he looked for judgment, but behold oppression; for righteousness, but behold a cry. 
Woe unto them that join house to house, that lay field to field, till there be no place, that they may be placed alone in the midst of the earth! 
In mine ears said the LORD of hosts, Of a truth many houses shall be desolate, even great and fair, without inhab
621,knowledge for thyself, that thou mayest judge my people, over whom I have made thee king: 
Wisdom and knowledge is granted unto thee; and I will give thee riches, and wealth, and honour, such as none of the kings have had that have been before thee, neither shall there any after thee have the like. 
Then Solomon came from his journey to the high place that was at Gibeon to Jerusalem, from before the tabernacle of the congregation, and reigned over Israel. 
And Solomon gathered chariots and horsemen: and he had a thousand and four hundred chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen, which he placed in the chariot cities
660, did eat the portion of the king's meat. 
Thus Melzar took away the portion of their meat, and the wine that they should drink; and gave them pulse. 
As for these four children, God gave them knowledge and skill in all learning and wisdom: and Daniel had understanding in all visions and dreams. 
Now at the end of the days that the king had said he should bring them in, then the prince of the eunuchs brought them in before Nebuchadnezzar. 
And the king communed with them; and among them all was found none like Daniel, Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah: therefore stood they before the king. 
And in all matters of wisdom and understanding, that the king enqu
533,rning spread upon the mountains: a great people and a strong; there hath not been ever the like, neither shall be any more after it, even to the years of many generations. 
A fire devoureth before them; and behind them a flame burneth: the land is as the garden of Eden before them, and behind them a desolate wilderness; yea, and nothing shall escape them. 
The appearance of them is as the appearance of horses; and as horsemen, so shall they run. 
Like the noise of chariots on the tops of mountains shall they leap, like the nois
587,hen said Jeremiah unto him, The LORD hath not called thy name Pashur, but Magormissabib. 
For thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will make thee a terror to thyself, and to all thy friends: and they shall fall by the sword of their enemies, and thine eyes shall behold it: and I will give all Judah into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall carry them captive into Babylon, and shall slay them with the sword. 
Moreover I will deliver all the strength of this city, and all the labours thereof, and all the precious things thereof, and all the treasures of the kings of Judah will I 
488,sau said in his heart, The days of mourning for my father are at hand; then will I slay my brother Jacob. 
And these words of Esau her elder son were told to Rebekah: and she sent and called Jacob her younger son, and said unto him, Behold, thy brother Esau, as touching thee, doth comfort himself, purposing to kill thee. 
Now therefore, my son, obey my voice; arise, flee thou to Laban my brother to Haran; 
And tarry with him a few days, until thy brother's fury turn away; 
Until thy 
499,e, and peace be to thine helpers; for thy God helpeth thee. Then David received them, and made them captains of the band. 
And there fell some of Manasseh to David, when he came with the Philistines against Saul to battle: but they helped them not: for the lords of the Philistines upon advisement sent him away, saying, He will fall to his master Saul to the jeopardy of our heads. 
As he went to Ziklag, there fell to him of Manasseh, Adnah, and Jozabad, and Jediael, and Michael, and Jozabad, and
650,ess the girdle of his reins. 
The wolf also shall dwell with the lamb, and the leopard shall lie down with the kid; and the calf and the young lion and the fatling together; and a little child shall lead them. 
And the cow and the bear shall feed; their young ones shall lie down together: and the lion shall eat straw like the ox. 
And the sucking child shall play on the hole of the asp, and the weaned child shall put his hand on the cockatrice' den. 
They shall not hurt nor destroy in all my holy mountain: for the earth shall be full of the knowledge of the LORD, as the waters cover the sea. 
And in that day there shall be a root of Jesse, wh
587,r the LORD hath afflicted her for the multitude of her transgressions: her children are gone into captivity before the enemy. 
And from the daughter of Zion all her beauty is departed: her princes are become like harts that find no pasture, and they are gone without strength before the pursuer. 
Jerusalem remembered in the days of her affliction and of her miseries all her pleasant things that she had in the days of old, when her people fell into the hand of the enemy, and none did help her: the adversaries saw her, and did mock at her sabbaths. 
Jerusalem hath grievously sinned; 
552, GOD; Thus saith the Lord GOD to the mountains, and to the hills, to the rivers, and to the valleys, to the desolate wastes, and to the cities that are forsaken, which became a prey and derision to the residue of the heathen that are round about; 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Surely in the fire of my jealousy have I spoken against the residue of the heathen, and against all Idumea, which have appointed my land into their possession with the joy of all their heart, with despiteful minds, to cast it out for a prey. 
Prophesy therefore concern
512,h hath been winnowed with the shovel and with the fan. 
And there shall be upon every high mountain, and upon every high hill, rivers and streams of waters in the day of the great slaughter, when the towers fall. 
Moreover the light of the moon shall be as the light of the sun, and the light of the sun shall be sevenfold, as the light of seven days, in the day that the LORD bindeth up the breach of his people, and healeth the stroke of their wound. 
Behold, the name of the LORD cometh from far, burning with
612,ill visit him. 
If grapegatherers come to thee, would they not leave some gleaning grapes? if thieves by night, they will destroy till they have enough. 
But I have made Esau bare, I have uncovered his secret places, and he shall not be able to hide himself: his seed is spoiled, and his brethren, and his neighbours, and he is not. 
Leave thy fatherless children, I will preserve them alive; and let thy widows trust in me. 
For thus saith the LORD; Behold, they whose judgment was not to drink of the cup have assuredly drunken; and art thou he that shall altogether go unpunished? thou shalt not go unpunished
522,kingdom, and sit on thrones judging the twelve tribes of Israel. 
And the Lord said, Simon, Simon, behold, Satan hath desired to have you, that he may sift you as wheat: 
But I have prayed for thee, that thy faith fail not: and when thou art converted, strengthen thy brethren. 
And he said unto him, Lord, I am ready to go with thee, both into prison, and to death. 
And he said, I tell thee, Peter, the cock shall not crow this day, before that thou shalt thrice deny that thou knowest me. 
And he said unto them, When I
616,hy testimonies, and not to covetousness. 
Turn away mine eyes from beholding vanity; and quicken thou me in thy way. 
Stablish thy word unto thy servant, who is devoted to thy fear. 
Turn away my reproach which I fear: for thy judgments are good. 
Behold, I have longed after thy precepts: quicken me in thy righteousness. 
Let thy mercies come also unto me, O LORD, even thy salvation, according to thy word. 
So shall I have wherewith to answer him that reproacheth me: for I trust in thy word. 
And take not the word of truth utterly out of my mouth; for I have hoped in thy judgments. 
So shall I keep thy law co
550,ffering; and my servant Job shall pray for you: for him will I accept: lest I deal with you after your folly, in that ye have not spoken of me the thing which is right, like my servant Job. 
So Eliphaz the Temanite and Bildad the Shuhite and Zophar the Naamathite went, and did according as the LORD commanded them: the LORD also accepted Job. 
And the LORD turned the captivity of Job, when he prayed for his friends: also the LORD gave Job twice as much as he had before. 
Then came there unto him all his brethren, and all his sisters, and all the
647,o us; for it hath heard all the words of the LORD which he spake unto us: it shall be therefore a witness unto you, lest ye deny your God. 
So Joshua let the people depart, every man unto his inheritance. 
And it came to pass after these things, that Joshua the son of Nun, the servant of the LORD, died, being an hundred and ten years old. 
And they buried him in the border of his inheritance in Timnathserah, which is in mount Ephraim, on the north side of the hill of Gaash. 
And Israel served the LORD all the days of Joshua, and all the days of the elders that overlived Joshua, and which had known all the works of the LORD, that he had don
564,nd did eat no meat the second day of the month: for he was grieved for David, because his father had done him shame. 
And it came to pass in the morning, that Jonathan went out into the field at the time appointed with David, and a little lad with him. 
And he said unto his lad, Run, find out now the arrows which I shoot. And as the lad ran, he shot an arrow beyond him. 
And when the lad was come to the place of the arrow which Jonathan had shot, Jonathan cried after the lad, and said, Is not the arrow beyond thee? 
And Jonathan cried after the lad, Make spe
551,ndment unto them; 
After he had slain Sihon the king of the Amorites, which dwelt in Heshbon, and Og the king of Bashan, which dwelt at Astaroth in Edrei: 
On this side Jordan, in the land of Moab, began Moses to declare this law, saying, 
The LORD our God spake unto us in Horeb, saying, Ye have dwelt long enough in this mount: 
Turn you, and take your journey, and go to the mount of the Amorites, and unto all the places nigh thereunto, in the plain, in the hills, and in the vale, and in the south, and by the sea side, to the land of the Canaani
563,the Jews: 
The same came to Jesus by night, and said unto him, Rabbi, we know that thou art a teacher come from God: for no man can do these miracles that thou doest, except God be with him. 
Jesus answered and said unto him, Verily, verily, I say unto thee, Except a man be born again, he cannot see the kingdom of God. 
Nicodemus saith unto him, How can a man be born when he is old? can he enter the second time into his mother's womb, and be born? 
Jesus answered, Verily, verily, I say unto thee, Except a man be born of water and of the Spirit, he cannot en
559, of death, till they see the kingdom of God. 
And it came to pass about an eight days after these sayings, he took Peter and John and James, and went up into a mountain to pray. 
And as he prayed, the fashion of his countenance was altered, and his raiment was white and glistering. 
And, behold, there talked with him two men, which were Moses and Elias: 
Who appeared in glory, and spake of his decease which he should accomplish at Jerusalem. 
But Peter and they that were with him were heavy with sleep: and when they were awake, they saw his glory, and t
649,s of Israel: terrors by reason of the sword shall be upon my people: smite therefore upon thy thigh. 
Because it is a trial, and what if the sword contemn even the rod? it shall be no more, saith the Lord GOD. 
Thou therefore, son of man, prophesy, and smite thine hands together. and let the sword be doubled the third time, the sword of the slain: it is the sword of the great men that are slain, which entereth into their privy chambers. 
I have set the point of the sword against all their gates, that their heart may faint, and their ruins be multiplied: ah! it is made bright, it is wrapped up for the slaughter. 
Go thee one way or other, eit
584,pon them. And Laban searched all the tent, but found them not. 
And she said to her father, Let it not displease my lord that I cannot rise up before thee; for the custom of women is upon me. And he searched but found not the images. 
And Jacob was wroth, and chode with Laban: and Jacob answered and said to Laban, What is my trespass? what is my sin, that thou hast so hotly pursued after me? 
Whereas thou hast searched all my stuff, what hast thou found of all thy household stuff? set it here before my brethren and thy brethren, that they may judge betwixt us both. 
This twenty
664,he hill Mizar. 
Deep calleth unto deep at the noise of thy waterspouts: all thy waves and thy billows are gone over me. 
Yet the LORD will command his lovingkindness in the day time, and in the night his song shall be with me, and my prayer unto the God of my life. 
I will say unto God my rock, Why hast thou forgotten me? why go I mourning because of the oppression of the enemy? 
As with a sword in my bones, mine enemies reproach me; while they say daily unto me, Where is thy God? 
Why art thou cast down, O my soul? and why art thou disquieted within me? hope thou in God: for I shall yet praise him, who is the health of my countenance, and my God. 
Judge m
578, the poor, and the borrower is servant to the lender. 
He that soweth iniquity shall reap vanity: and the rod of his anger shall fail. 
He that hath a bountiful eye shall be blessed; for he giveth of his bread to the poor. 
Cast out the scorner, and contention shall go out; yea, strife and reproach shall cease. 
He that loveth pureness of heart, for the grace of his lips the king shall be his friend. 
The eyes of the LORD preserve knowledge, and he overthroweth the words of the transgressor. 
The slothful man saith, There is a lion without, I shall be slain in the streets
688, who hath trodden under foot the Son of God, and hath counted the blood of the covenant, wherewith he was sanctified, an unholy thing, and hath done despite unto the Spirit of grace? 
For we know him that hath said, Vengeance belongeth unto me, I will recompense, saith the Lord. And again, The Lord shall judge his people. 
It is a fearful thing to fall into the hands of the living God. 
But call to remembrance the former days, in which, after ye were illuminated, ye endured a great fight of afflictions; 
Partly, whilst ye were made a gazingstock both by reproaches and afflictions; and partly, whilst ye became companions of them that were so used. 
For ye had compassion of me in m
719,hey sing: for they shall see eye to eye, when the LORD shall bring again Zion. 
Break forth into joy, sing together, ye waste places of Jerusalem: for the LORD hath comforted his people, he hath redeemed Jerusalem. 
The LORD hath made bare his holy arm in the eyes of all the nations; and all the ends of the earth shall see the salvation of our God. 
Depart ye, depart ye, go ye out from thence, touch no unclean thing; go ye out of the midst of her; be ye clean, that bear the vessels of the LORD. 
For ye shall not go out with haste, nor go by flight: for the LORD will go before you; and the God of Israel will be your rereward. 
Behold, my servant shall deal prudently, he shall be exalted and extolled, and be ver
700, 
What man is he that feareth the LORD? him shall he teach in the way that he shall choose. 
His soul shall dwell at ease; and his seed shall inherit the earth. 
The secret of the LORD is with them that fear him; and he will shew them his covenant. 
Mine eyes are ever toward the LORD; for he shall pluck my feet out of the net. 
Turn thee unto me, and have mercy upon me; for I am desolate and afflicted. 
The troubles of my heart are enlarged: O bring thou me out of my distresses. 
Look upon mine affliction and my pain; and forgive all my sins. 
Consider mine enemies; for they are many; and they hate me with cruel hatred. 
O keep my soul, and deliver me: let me not be ashamed; for I put my tru
650,s in the land of Egypt; and the houses of the gods of the Egyptians shall he burn with fire. 
The word that came to Jeremiah concerning all the Jews which dwell in the land of Egypt, which dwell at Migdol, and at Tahpanhes, and at Noph, and in the country of Pathros, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Ye have seen all the evil that I have brought upon Jerusalem, and upon all the cities of Judah; and, behold, this day they are a desolation, and no man dwelleth therein, 
Because of their wickedness which they have committed to provoke me to anger, in that they went to burn incense, and to serve other gods, whom they knew 
665,ing's mule: 
And Zadok the priest and Nathan the prophet have anointed him king in Gihon: and they are come up from thence rejoicing, so that the city rang again. This is the noise that ye have heard. 
And also Solomon sitteth on the throne of the kingdom. 
And moreover the king's servants came to bless our lord king David, saying, God make the name of Solomon better than thy name, and make his throne greater than thy throne. And the king bowed himself upon the bed. 
And also thus said the king, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel, which hath given one to sit on my throne this day, mine eyes even seeing it. 
And all the guests that were with Adonijah were afr
631,ngregation: and thou shalt cleanse them, and offer them for an offering. 
For they are wholly given unto me from among the children of Israel; instead of such as open every womb, even instead of the firstborn of all the children of Israel, have I taken them unto me. 
For all the firstborn of the children of Israel are mine, both man and beast: on the day that I smote every firstborn in the land of Egypt I sanctified them for myself. 
And I have taken the Levites for all the firstborn of the children of Israel. 
And I have given the Levites as a gift to Aaron and to his sons from among the children of Israel, to do the servi
517,, whether they will hear, or whether they will forbear, (for they are a rebellious house,) yet shall know that there hath been a prophet among them. 
And thou, son of man, be not afraid of them, neither be afraid of their words, though briers and thorns be with thee, and thou dost dwell among scorpions: be not afraid of their words, nor be dismayed at their looks, though they be a rebellious house. 
And thou shalt speak my words unto them, whether they will hear, or whether they will forbear: for they are most r
690,ldren of Israel also wept again, and said, Who shall give us flesh to eat? 
We remember the fish, which we did eat in Egypt freely; the cucumbers, and the melons, and the leeks, and the onions, and the garlick: 
But now our soul is dried away: there is nothing at all, beside this manna, before our eyes. 
And the manna was as coriander seed, and the colour thereof as the colour of bdellium. 
And the people went about, and gathered it, and ground it in mills, or beat it in a mortar, and baked it in pans, and made cakes of it: and the taste of it was as the taste of fresh oil. 
And when the dew fell upon the camp in the night, the manna fell upon it. 
Then Moses heard the people weep 
497,o punishment happen to thee for this thing. 
Then said the woman, Whom shall I bring up unto thee? And he said, Bring me up Samuel. 
And when the woman saw Samuel, she cried with a loud voice: and the woman spake to Saul, saying, Why hast thou deceived me? for thou art Saul. 
And the king said unto her, Be not afraid: for what sawest thou? And the woman said unto Saul, I saw gods ascending out of the earth. 
And he said unto her, What form is he of? And she said, An old man cometh up; and he 
609,m in this land; 
They shall die of grievous deaths; they shall not be lamented; neither shall they be buried; but they shall be as dung upon the face of the earth: and they shall be consumed by the sword, and by famine; and their carcases shall be meat for the fowls of heaven, and for the beasts of the earth. 
For thus saith the LORD, Enter not into the house of mourning, neither go to lament nor bemoan them: for I have taken away my peace from this people, saith the LORD, even lovingkindness and mercies. 
Both the great and the small shall die in this land: they shall not be buried, neither shall men 
630,eld, that ye stir not up, nor awake my love, till he please. 
Who is this that cometh out of the wilderness like pillars of smoke, perfumed with myrrh and frankincense, with all powders of the merchant? 
Behold his bed, which is Solomon's; threescore valiant men are about it, of the valiant of Israel. 
They all hold swords, being expert in war: every man hath his sword upon his thigh because of fear in the night. 
King Solomon made himself a chariot of the wood of Lebanon. 
He made the pillars thereof of silver, the bottom thereof of gold, the covering of it of purple, the midst thereof being paved with love, for the daugh
642,they found Saul and his three sons fallen in mount Gilboa. 
And they cut off his head, and stripped off his armour, and sent into the land of the Philistines round about, to publish it in the house of their idols, and among the people. 
And they put his armour in the house of Ashtaroth: and they fastened his body to the wall of Bethshan. 
And when the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead heard of that which the Philistines had done to Saul; 
All the valiant men arose, and went all night, and took the body of Saul and the bodies of his sons from the wall of Bethshan, and came to Jabesh, and burnt them there. 
And they took their bones, and buri
519, fruit of righteousness is sown in peace of them that make peace. 
From whence come wars and fightings among you? come they not hence, even of your lusts that war in your members? 
Ye lust, and have not: ye kill, and desire to have, and cannot obtain: ye fight and war, yet ye have not, because ye ask not. 
Ye ask, and receive not, because ye ask amiss, that ye may consume it upon your lusts. 
Ye adulterers and adulteresses, know ye not that the friendship of the world is enmity with God? whosoever therefore will b
619,nd the diviners, saying, What shall we do to the ark of the LORD? tell us wherewith we shall send it to his place. 
And they said, If ye send away the ark of the God of Israel, send it not empty; but in any wise return him a trespass offering: then ye shall be healed, and it shall be known to you why his hand is not removed from you. 
Then said they, What shall be the trespass offering which we shall return to him? They answered, Five golden emerods, and five golden mice, according to the number of the lords of the Philistines: for one plague was on you all, and on your lords. 
Wherefore ye shall make images of 
539,l Jerusalem was in an uproar. 
Who immediately took soldiers and centurions, and ran down unto them: and when they saw the chief captain and the soldiers, they left beating of Paul. 
Then the chief captain came near, and took him, and commanded him to be bound with two chains; and demanded who he was, and what he had done. 
And some cried one thing, some another, among the multitude: and when he could not know the certainty for the tumult, he commanded him to be carried into the castle. 
And when he came upon the stairs, so it was, t
625,n said Boaz, What day thou buyest the field of the hand of Naomi, thou must buy it also of Ruth the Moabitess, the wife of the dead, to raise up the name of the dead upon his inheritance. 
And the kinsman said, I cannot redeem it for myself, lest I mar mine own inheritance: redeem thou my right to thyself; for I cannot redeem it. 
Now this was the manner in former time in Israel concerning redeeming and concerning changing, for to confirm all things; a man plucked off his shoe, and gave it to his neighbour: and this was a testimony in Israel. 
Therefore the kinsman said unto Boaz, Buy it for thee. So he drew off his s
518,nd bear their shame with them that go down to the pit. 
Pharaoh shall see them, and shall be comforted over all his multitude, even Pharaoh and all his army slain by the sword, saith the Lord GOD. 
For I have caused my terror in the land of the living: and he shall be laid in the midst of the uncircumcised with them that are slain with the sword, even Pharaoh and all his multitude, saith the Lord GOD. 
Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, speak to the children of thy people, and say unto 
490,s of Artaxerxes wrote Bishlam, Mithredath, Tabeel, and the rest of their companions, unto Artaxerxes king of Persia; and the writing of the letter was written in the Syrian tongue, and interpreted in the Syrian tongue. 
Rehum the chancellor and Shimshai the scribe wrote a letter against Jerusalem to Artaxerxes the king in this sort: 
Then wrote Rehum the chancellor, and Shimshai the scribe, and the rest of their companions; the Dinaites, the Apharsathchites, the Tarpelites, the Apharsi
627,le: this shall be the first row. 
And the second row shall be an emerald, a sapphire, and a diamond. 
And the third row a ligure, an agate, and an amethyst. 
And the fourth row a beryl, and an onyx, and a jasper: they shall be set in gold in their inclosings. 
And the stones shall be with the names of the children of Israel, twelve, according to their names, like the engravings of a signet; every one with his name shall they be according to the twelve tribes. 
And thou shalt make upon the breastplate chains at the ends of wreathen work of pure gold. 
And thou shalt make upon the breastplate two rings of gold, and shalt 
632,rpion? 
If ye then, being evil, know how to give good gifts unto your children: how much more shall your heavenly Father give the Holy Spirit to them that ask him? 
And he was casting out a devil, and it was dumb. And it came to pass, when the devil was gone out, the dumb spake; and the people wondered. 
But some of them said, He casteth out devils through Beelzebub the chief of the devils. 
And others, tempting him, sought of him a sign from heaven. 
But he, knowing their thoughts, said unto them, Every kingdom divided against itself is brought to desolation; and a house divided against a house falleth. 
If Satan also be di
598,without me ye can do nothing. 
If a man abide not in me, he is cast forth as a branch, and is withered; and men gather them, and cast them into the fire, and they are burned. 
If ye abide in me, and my words abide in you, ye shall ask what ye will, and it shall be done unto you. 
Herein is my Father glorified, that ye bear much fruit; so shall ye be my disciples. 
As the Father hath loved me, so have I loved you: continue ye in my love. 
If ye keep my commandments, ye shall abide in my love; even as I have kept my Father's commandments, and abide in his love. 
These things have I spoken unto
570,f their kings. 
He spake, and there came divers sorts of flies, and lice in all their coasts. 
He gave them hail for rain, and flaming fire in their land. 
He smote their vines also and their fig trees; and brake the trees of their coasts. 
He spake, and the locusts came, and caterpillers, and that without number, 
And did eat up all the herbs in their land, and devoured the fruit of their ground. 
He smote also all the firstborn in their land, the chief of all their strength. 
He brought them forth also with silver and gold: and there was not one feeble person am
492, them: 
And I will set my throne in Elam, and will destroy from thence the king and the princes, saith the LORD. 
But it shall come to pass in the latter days, that I will bring again the captivity of Elam, saith the LORD. 
The word that the LORD spake against Babylon and against the land of the Chaldeans by Jeremiah the prophet. 
Declare ye among the nations, and publish, and set up a standard; publish, and conceal not: say, Babylon is taken, Bel is confounded, Merodach is broken in pie
501,e right hand nor to the left, until we have passed thy borders. 
And Edom said unto him, Thou shalt not pass by me, lest I come out against thee with the sword. 
And the children of Israel said unto him, We will go by the high way: and if I and my cattle drink of thy water, then I will pay for it: I will only, without doing anything else, go through on my feet. 
And he said, Thou shalt not go through. And Edom came out against him with much people, and with a strong hand. 
Thus Edom refused to gi
678,n the wilderness of Ziph. 
And Saul pitched in the hill of Hachilah, which is before Jeshimon, by the way. But David abode in the wilderness, and he saw that Saul came after him into the wilderness. 
David therefore sent out spies, and understood that Saul was come in very deed. 
And David arose, and came to the place where Saul had pitched: and David beheld the place where Saul lay, and Abner the son of Ner, the captain of his host: and Saul lay in the trench, and the people pitched round about him. 
Then answered David and said to Ahimelech the Hittite, and to Abishai the son of Zeruiah, brother to Joab, saying, Who will go down with me to Saul to the camp? And Abisha
594, you, That whosoever looketh on a woman to lust after her hath committed adultery with her already in his heart. 
And if thy right eye offend thee, pluck it out, and cast it from thee: for it is profitable for thee that one of thy members should perish, and not that thy whole body should be cast into hell. 
And if thy right hand offend thee, cut it off, and cast it from thee: for it is profitable for thee that one of thy members should perish, and not that thy whole body should be cast into hell. 
It hath been said, Whosoever shall put away his wife, let him give her a writing of divorce
696,em, and wrought: for by their occupation they were tentmakers. 
And he reasoned in the synagogue every sabbath, and persuaded the Jews and the Greeks. 
And when Silas and Timotheus were come from Macedonia, Paul was pressed in the spirit, and testified to the Jews that Jesus was Christ. 
And when they opposed themselves, and blasphemed, he shook his raiment, and said unto them, Your blood be upon your own heads; I am clean; from henceforth I will go unto the Gentiles. 
And he departed thence, and entered into a certain man's house, named Justus, one that worshipped God, whose house joined hard to the synagogue. 
And Crispus, the chief ruler of the synagogue, believed on the Lord with all
651,, and died in the one and fortieth year of his reign. 
And they buried him in his own sepulchres, which he had made for himself in the city of David, and laid him in the bed which was filled with sweet odours and divers kinds of spices prepared by the apothecaries' art: and they made a very great burning for him. 
And Jehoshaphat his son reigned in his stead, and strengthened himself against Israel. 
And he placed forces in all the fenced cities of Judah, and set garrisons in the land of Judah, and in the cities of Ephraim, which Asa his father had taken. 
And the LORD was with Jehoshaphat, because he walked in the first ways of his father Dav
540, the throne of his kingdom over Israel for ever. 
Now, my son, the LORD be with thee; and prosper thou, and build the house of the LORD thy God, as he hath said of thee. 
Only the LORD give thee wisdom and understanding, and give thee charge concerning Israel, that thou mayest keep the law of the LORD thy God. 
Then shalt thou prosper, if thou takest heed to fulfil the statutes and judgments which the LORD charged Moses with concerning Israel: be strong, and of good courage; dread not, nor be dismayed. 
Now, behold, in my trouble I ha
590,that time, saith the LORD, the children of Israel shall come, they and the children of Judah together, going and weeping: they shall go, and seek the LORD their God. 
They shall ask the way to Zion with their faces thitherward, saying, Come, and let us join ourselves to the LORD in a perpetual covenant that shall not be forgotten. 
My people hath been lost sheep: their shepherds have caused them to go astray, they have turned them away on the mountains: they have gone from mountain to hill, they have forgotten their restingplace. 
All that found them have devoured them: and their adv
658,ount the fruit thereof as uncircumcised: three years shall it be as uncircumcised unto you: it shall not be eaten of. 
But in the fourth year all the fruit thereof shall be holy to praise the LORD withal. 
And in the fifth year shall ye eat of the fruit thereof, that it may yield unto you the increase thereof: I am the LORD your God. 
Ye shall not eat any thing with the blood: neither shall ye use enchantment, nor observe times. 
Ye shall not round the corners of your heads, neither shalt thou mar the corners of thy beard. 
Ye shall not make any cuttings in your flesh for the dead, nor print any marks upon you: I am the LORD. 
Do not prostitute thy d
611,sar the things that are Caesar's, and to God the things that are God's. And they marvelled at him. 
Then come unto him the Sadducees, which say there is no resurrection; and they asked him, saying, 
Master, Moses wrote unto us, If a man's brother die, and leave his wife behind him, and leave no children, that his brother should take his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
Now there were seven brethren: and the first took a wife, and dying left no seed. 
And the second took her, and died, neither left he any seed: and the third likewise. 
And the seven had her, and left no seed: last of all the wom
511,all it be: and two cubits shall be the height thereof: the horns thereof shall be of the same. 
And thou shalt overlay it with pure gold, the top thereof, and the sides thereof round about, and the horns thereof; and thou shalt make unto it a crown of gold round about. 
And two golden rings shalt thou make to it under the crown of it, by the two corners thereof, upon the two sides of it shalt thou make it; and they shall be for places for the staves to bear it withal. 
And thou shalt make the staves of shi
586,, that I may appoint over her? for who is like me? and who will appoint me the time? and who is that shepherd that will stand before me? 
Therefore hear the counsel of the LORD, that he hath taken against Edom; and his purposes, that he hath purposed against the inhabitants of Teman: Surely the least of the flock shall draw them out: surely he shall make their habitations desolate with them. 
The earth is moved at the noise of their fall, at the cry the noise thereof was heard in the Red sea. 
Behold, he shall come up and fly as the eagle, and spread his wings over Bozrah: and at
675,hesy not in the name of the LORD, that thou die not by our hand: 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts, Behold, I will punish them: the young men shall die by the sword; their sons and their daughters shall die by famine: 
And there shall be no remnant of them: for I will bring evil upon the men of Anathoth, even the year of their visitation. 
Righteous art thou, O LORD, when I plead with thee: yet let me talk with thee of thy judgments: Wherefore doth the way of the wicked prosper? wherefore are all they happy that deal very treacherously? 
Thou hast planted them, yea, they have taken root: they grow, yea, they bring forth fruit: thou art near in their mouth, and 
493,into joy. 
A woman when she is in travail hath sorrow, because her hour is come: but as soon as she is delivered of the child, she remembereth no more the anguish, for joy that a man is born into the world. 
And ye now therefore have sorrow: but I will see you again, and your heart shall rejoice, and your joy no man taketh from you. 
And in that day ye shall ask me nothing. Verily, verily, I say unto you, Whatsoever ye shall ask the Father in my name, he will give it you. 
Hitherto have y
545,lessed are the pure in heart: for they shall see God. 
Blessed are the peacemakers: for they shall be called the children of God. 
Blessed are they which are persecuted for righteousness' sake: for theirs is the kingdom of heaven. 
Blessed are ye, when men shall revile you, and persecute you, and shall say all manner of evil against you falsely, for my sake. 
Rejoice, and be exceeding glad: for great is your reward in heaven: for so persecuted they the prophets which were before you. 
Ye are the salt of the earth: but if the salt have lost
565,am, and hast made my people Israel to sin, to provoke me to anger with their sins; 
Behold, I will take away the posterity of Baasha, and the posterity of his house; and will make thy house like the house of Jeroboam the son of Nebat. 
Him that dieth of Baasha in the city shall the dogs eat; and him that dieth of his in the fields shall the fowls of the air eat. 
Now the rest of the acts of Baasha, and what he did, and his might, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel? 
So Baasha slept with his fathers, and was buried in Tir
499,all know that I am the LORD, when I have opened your graves, O my people, and brought you up out of your graves, 
And shall put my spirit in you, and ye shall live, and I shall place you in your own land: then shall ye know that I the LORD have spoken it, and performed it, saith the LORD. 
The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 
Moreover, thou son of man, take thee one stick, and write upon it, For Judah, and for the children of Israel his companions: then take another stick, and writ
684,the month at even, ye shall eat unleavened bread, until the one and twentieth day of the month at even. 
Seven days shall there be no leaven found in your houses: for whosoever eateth that which is leavened, even that soul shall be cut off from the congregation of Israel, whether he be a stranger, or born in the land. 
Ye shall eat nothing leavened; in all your habitations shall ye eat unleavened bread. 
Then Moses called for all the elders of Israel, and said unto them, Draw out and take you a lamb according to your families, and kill the passover. 
And ye shall take a bunch of hyssop, and dip it in the blood that is in the bason, and strike the lintel and the two side posts
482,d in vain. 
For I delivered unto you first of all that which I also received, how that Christ died for our sins according to the scriptures; 
And that he was buried, and that he rose again the third day according to the scriptures: 
And that he was seen of Cephas, then of the twelve: 
After that, he was seen of above five hundred brethren at once; of whom the greater part remain unto this present, but some are fallen asleep. 
After that, he was seen of James; then of all the ap
678,turned from searching of the land after forty days. 
And they went and came to Moses, and to Aaron, and to all the congregation of the children of Israel, unto the wilderness of Paran, to Kadesh; and brought back word unto them, and unto all the congregation, and shewed them the fruit of the land. 
And they told him, and said, We came unto the land whither thou sentest us, and surely it floweth with milk and honey; and this is the fruit of it. 
Nevertheless the people be strong that dwell in the land, and the cities are walled, and very great: and moreover we saw the children of Anak there. 
The Amalekites dwell in the land of the south: and the Hittites, and the Jebusi
705,hey fled from before Israel, and were in the going down to Bethhoron, that the LORD cast down great stones from heaven upon them unto Azekah, and they died: they were more which died with hailstones than they whom the children of Israel slew with the sword. 
Then spake Joshua to the LORD in the day when the LORD delivered up the Amorites before the children of Israel, and he said in the sight of Israel, Sun, stand thou still upon Gibeon; and thou, Moon, in the valley of Ajalon. 
And the sun stood still, and the moon stayed, until the people had avenged themselves upon their enemies. Is not this written in the book of Jasher? So the sun stood still in the midst of heaven, and hasted not to go down
585,the children of Pharez the son of Judah. 
And of the Shilonites; Asaiah the firstborn, and his sons. 
And of the sons of Zerah; Jeuel, and their brethren, six hundred and ninety. 
And of the sons of Benjamin; Sallu the son of Meshullam, the son of Hodaviah, the son of Hasenuah, 
And Ibneiah the son of Jeroham, and Elah the son of Uzzi, the son of Michri, and Meshullam the son of Shephathiah, the son of Reuel, the son of Ibnijah; 
And their brethren, according to their generations, nine hundred and fifty and six. All these men were chief of the fathers in the house of their fathe
550, fell on good ground, and sprang up, and bare fruit an hundredfold. And when he had said these things, he cried, He that hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
And his disciples asked him, saying, What might this parable be? 
And he said, Unto you it is given to know the mysteries of the kingdom of God: but to others in parables; that seeing they might not see, and hearing they might not understand. 
Now the parable is this: The seed is the word of God. 
Those by the way side are they that hear; then cometh the devil, and taketh away the word out of
629,o the LORD, the work of the hands of the craftsman, and putteth it in a secret place. And all the people shall answer and say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that setteth light by his father or his mother. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that removeth his neighbour's landmark. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that maketh the blind to wander out of the way. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that perverteth the judgment of the stranger, fatherless, and widow. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with his father's wife; because he uncovereth his father's skirt. 
583,and thou art one of them that trouble me: for I have opened my mouth unto the LORD, and I cannot go back. 
And she said unto him, My father, if thou hast opened thy mouth unto the LORD, do to me according to that which hath proceeded out of thy mouth; forasmuch as the LORD hath taken vengeance for thee of thine enemies, even of the children of Ammon. 
And she said unto her father, Let this thing be done for me: let me alone two months, that I may go up and down upon the mountains, and bewail my virginity, I and my fellows. 
And he said, Go. And he sent her away for two months:
576,elves together will build unto the LORD God of Israel, as king Cyrus the king of Persia hath commanded us. 
Then the people of the land weakened the hands of the people of Judah, and troubled them in building, 
And hired counsellors against them, to frustrate their purpose, all the days of Cyrus king of Persia, even until the reign of Darius king of Persia. 
And in the reign of Ahasuerus, in the beginning of his reign, wrote they unto him an accusation against the inhabitants of Judah and Jerusalem. 
And in the days of Artaxerxes wrote Bishlam, Mithredath, Tabeel, and t
519,m his hands. 
And the angel said unto him, Gird thyself, and bind on thy sandals. And so he did. And he saith unto him, Cast thy garment about thee, and follow me. 
And he went out, and followed him; and wist not that it was true which was done by the angel; but thought he saw a vision. 
When they were past the first and the second ward, they came unto the iron gate that leadeth unto the city; which opened to them of his own accord: and they went out, and passed on through one street; and forthwith the angel depar
536,I meet the LORD yonder. 
And the LORD met Balaam, and put a word in his mouth, and said, Go again unto Balak, and say thus. 
And when he came to him, behold, he stood by his burnt offering, and the princes of Moab with him. And Balak said unto him, What hath the LORD spoken? 
And he took up his parable, and said, Rise up, Balak, and hear; hearken unto me, thou son of Zippor: 
God is not a man, that he should lie; neither the son of man, that he should repent: hath he said, and shall he not do it? or hath he spoken, and shall he no
557,t let about two or three thousand men go up and smite Ai; and make not all the people to labour thither; for they are but few. 
So there went up thither of the people about three thousand men: and they fled before the men of Ai. 
And the men of Ai smote of them about thirty and six men: for they chased them from before the gate even unto Shebarim, and smote them in the going down: wherefore the hearts of the people melted, and became as water. 
And Joshua rent his clothes, and fell to the earth upon his face before the ark of the LORD until the eventi
530,ore, when wicked men have slain a righteous person in his own house upon his bed? shall I not therefore now require his blood of your hand, and take you away from the earth? 
And David commanded his young men, and they slew them, and cut off their hands and their feet, and hanged them up over the pool in Hebron. But they took the head of Ishbosheth, and buried it in the sepulchre of Abner in Hebron. 
Then came all the tribes of Israel to David unto Hebron, and spake, saying, Behold, we are thy bone and thy flesh. 
Also in ti
509,, in blue, and in purple, in scarlet, and in fine linen, and of the weaver, even of them that do any work, and of those that devise cunning work. 
Then wrought Bezaleel and Aholiab, and every wise hearted man, in whom the LORD put wisdom and understanding to know how to work all manner of work for the service of the sanctuary, according to all that the LORD had commanded. 
And Moses called Bezaleel and Aholiab, and every wise hearted man, in whose heart the LORD had put wisdom, even every one whose heart
684,the blood, and sprinkle it seven times before the LORD, even before the vail. 
And he shall put some of the blood upon the horns of the altar which is before the LORD, that is in the tabernacle of the congregation, and shall pour out all the blood at the bottom of the altar of the burnt offering, which is at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And he shall take all his fat from him, and burn it upon the altar. 
And he shall do with the bullock as he did with the bullock for a sin offering, so shall he do with this: and the priest shall make an atonement for them, and it shall be forgiven them. 
And he shall carry forth the bullock without the camp, and burn him a
708,im, Fear not, Zacharias: for thy prayer is heard; and thy wife Elisabeth shall bear thee a son, and thou shalt call his name John. 
And thou shalt have joy and gladness; and many shall rejoice at his birth. 
For he shall be great in the sight of the Lord, and shall drink neither wine nor strong drink; and he shall be filled with the Holy Ghost, even from his mother's womb. 
And many of the children of Israel shall he turn to the Lord their God. 
And he shall go before him in the spirit and power of Elias, to turn the hearts of the fathers to the children, and the disobedient to the wisdom of the just; to make ready a people prepared for the Lord. 
And Zacharias said unto the angel, Whereby shall I k
618,, and against the man that is my fellow, saith the LORD of hosts: smite the shepherd, and the sheep shall be scattered: and I will turn mine hand upon the little ones. 
And it shall come to pass, that in all the land, saith the LORD, two parts therein shall be cut off and die; but the third shall be left therein. 
And I will bring the third part through the fire, and will refine them as silver is refined, and will try them as gold is tried: they shall call on my name, and I will hear them: I will say, It is my people: and they shall say, The LORD is my God. 
Behold, the day of the LORD cometh, and thy spoil sha
596,is in the country of Benjamin: for the right of inheritance is thine, and the redemption is thine; buy it for thyself. Then I knew that this was the word of the LORD. 
And I bought the field of Hanameel my uncle's son, that was in Anathoth, and weighed him the money, even seventeen shekels of silver. 
And I subscribed the evidence, and sealed it, and took witnesses, and weighed him the money in the balances. 
So I took the evidence of the purchase, both that which was sealed according to the law and custom, and that which was open: 
And I gave the evidence of the purchase unto Baruch the s
559,om before you, and gave you their land; 
And I said unto you, I am the LORD your God; fear not the gods of the Amorites, in whose land ye dwell: but ye have not obeyed my voice. 
And there came an angel of the LORD, and sat under an oak which was in Ophrah, that pertained unto Joash the Abiezrite: and his son Gideon threshed wheat by the winepress, to hide it from the Midianites. 
And the angel of the LORD appeared unto him, and said unto him, The LORD is with thee, thou mighty man of valour. 
And Gideon said unto him, Oh my Lord, if the LORD be with us
689, the work in all the work of the holy place, even the gold of the offering, was twenty and nine talents, and seven hundred and thirty shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary. 
And the silver of them that were numbered of the congregation was an hundred talents, and a thousand seven hundred and threescore and fifteen shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary: 
A bekah for every man, that is, half a shekel, after the shekel of the sanctuary, for every one that went to be numbered, from twenty years old and upward, for six hundred thousand and three thousand and five hundred and fifty men. 
And of the hundred talents of silver were cast the sockets of the sanctuary, and the socke
497,le, saying, 
Who is left among you that saw this house in her first glory? and how do ye see it now? is it not in your eyes in comparison of it as nothing? 
Yet now be strong, O Zerubbabel, saith the LORD; and be strong, O Joshua, son of Josedech, the high priest; and be strong, all ye people of the land, saith the LORD, and work: for I am with you, saith the LORD of hosts: 
According to the word that I covenanted with you when ye came out of Egypt, so my spirit remaineth among you: fear ye n
512, thereof with you. 
Know ye not that they which run in a race run all, but one receiveth the prize? So run, that ye may obtain. 
And every man that striveth for the mastery is temperate in all things. Now they do it to obtain a corruptible crown; but we an incorruptible. 
I therefore so run, not as uncertainly; so fight I, not as one that beateth the air: 
But I keep under my body, and bring it into subjection: lest that by any means, when I have preached to others, I myself should be a castaway. 
Moreover,
510, perform it, that I will keep thy righteous judgments. 
I am afflicted very much: quicken me, O LORD, according unto thy word. 
Accept, I beseech thee, the freewill offerings of my mouth, O LORD, and teach me thy judgments. 
My soul is continually in my hand: yet do I not forget thy law. 
The wicked have laid a snare for me: yet I erred not from thy precepts. 
Thy testimonies have I taken as an heritage for ever: for they are the rejoicing of my heart. 
I have inclined mine heart to perform thy statutes a
543,g shall the land mourn, and the herbs of every field wither, for the wickedness of them that dwell therein? the beasts are consumed, and the birds; because they said, He shall not see our last end. 
If thou hast run with the footmen, and they have wearied thee, then how canst thou contend with horses? and if in the land of peace, wherein thou trustedst, they wearied thee, then how wilt thou do in the swelling of Jordan? 
For even thy brethren, and the house of thy father, even they have dealt treacherously with thee; yea, they have calle
621, fathers hath promised thee, in the land that floweth with milk and honey. 
Hear, O Israel: The LORD our God is one LORD: 
And thou shalt love the LORD thy God with all thine heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy might. 
And these words, which I command thee this day, shall be in thine heart: 
And thou shalt teach them diligently unto thy children, and shalt talk of them when thou sittest in thine house, and when thou walkest by the way, and when thou liest down, and when thou risest up. 
And thou shalt bind them for a sign upon thine hand, and they shall be as frontlets between thine eyes. 
And thou shal
554,eel were eight hundred ninety and five years: and he died. 
And Jared lived an hundred sixty and two years, and he begat Enoch: 
And Jared lived after he begat Enoch eight hundred years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Jared were nine hundred sixty and two years: and he died. 
And Enoch lived sixty and five years, and begat Methuselah: 
And Enoch walked with God after he begat Methuselah three hundred years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Enoch were three hundred sixty and five years: 
And Enoch walked with Go
688,t all flesh from the south to the north: 
That all flesh may know that I the LORD have drawn forth my sword out of his sheath: it shall not return any more. 
Sigh therefore, thou son of man, with the breaking of thy loins; and with bitterness sigh before their eyes. 
And it shall be, when they say unto thee, Wherefore sighest thou? that thou shalt answer, For the tidings; because it cometh: and every heart shall melt, and all hands shall be feeble, and every spirit shall faint, and all knees shall be weak as water: behold, it cometh, and shall be brought to pass, saith the Lord GOD. 
Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, prophesy, and say, Thus saith the L
490, of his horses their dust shall cover thee: thy walls shall shake at the noise of the horsemen, and of the wheels, and of the chariots, when he shall enter into thy gates, as men enter into a city wherein is made a breach. 
With the hoofs of his horses shall he tread down all thy streets: he shall slay thy people by the sword, and thy strong garrisons shall go down to the ground. 
And they shall make a spoil of thy riches, and make a prey of thy merchandise: and they shall break down t
646,hings that are never satisfied, yea, four things say not, It is enough: 
The grave; and the barren womb; the earth that is not filled with water; and the fire that saith not, It is enough. 
The eye that mocketh at his father, and despiseth to obey his mother, the ravens of the valley shall pick it out, and the young eagles shall eat it. 
There be three things which are too wonderful for me, yea, four which I know not: 
The way of an eagle in the air; the way of a serpent upon a rock; the way of a ship in the midst of the sea; and the way of a man with a maid. 
Such is the way of an adulterous woman; she eateth, and wipeth her mouth, and s
619,aul lay, and Abner the son of Ner, the captain of his host: and Saul lay in the trench, and the people pitched round about him. 
Then answered David and said to Ahimelech the Hittite, and to Abishai the son of Zeruiah, brother to Joab, saying, Who will go down with me to Saul to the camp? And Abishai said, I will go down with thee. 
So David and Abishai came to the people by night: and, behold, Saul lay sleeping within the trench, and his spear stuck in the ground at his bolster: but Abner and the people lay round about him. 
Then said Abishai to David, God hath delivered thine enemy into thine hand this day: no
680,lievest. 
Then Agrippa said unto Paul, Almost thou persuadest me to be a Christian. 
And Paul said, I would to God, that not only thou, but also all that hear me this day, were both almost, and altogether such as I am, except these bonds. 
And when he had thus spoken, the king rose up, and the governor, and Bernice, and they that sat with them: 
And when they were gone aside, they talked between themselves, saying, This man doeth nothing worthy of death or of bonds. 
Then said Agrippa unto Festus, This man might have been set at liberty, if he had not appealed unto Caesar. 
And when it was determined that we should sail into Italy, they delivered Paul and certain other pr
649,ame to the banquet that Esther had prepared. 
And the king said unto Esther at the banquet of wine, What is thy petition? and it shall be granted thee: and what is thy request? even to the half of the kingdom it shall be performed. 
Then answered Esther, and said, My petition and my request is; 
If I have found favour in the sight of the king, and if it please the king to grant my petition, and to perform my request, let the king and Haman come to the banquet that I shall prepare for them, and I will do to morrow as the king hath said. 
Then went Haman forth that day joyful and with a glad heart: but when Haman saw Mordecai in the king's gat
708,hat go down into silence. 
But we will bless the LORD from this time forth and for evermore. Praise the LORD. 
I love the LORD, because he hath heard my voice and my supplications. 
Because he hath inclined his ear unto me, therefore will I call upon him as long as I live. 
The sorrows of death compassed me, and the pains of hell gat hold upon me: I found trouble and sorrow. 
Then called I upon the name of the LORD; O LORD, I beseech thee, deliver my soul. 
Gracious is the LORD, and righteous; yea, our God is merciful. 
The LORD preserveth the simple: I was brought low, and he helped me. 
Return unto thy rest, O my soul; for the LORD hath dealt bountifully with thee. 
For thou hast delivered my soul
658,he Amorites, which dwelt on the other side Jordan; and they fought with you: and I gave them into your hand, that ye might possess their land; and I destroyed them from before you. 
Then Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab, arose and warred against Israel, and sent and called Balaam the son of Beor to curse you: 
But I would not hearken unto Balaam; therefore he blessed you still: so I delivered you out of his hand. 
And you went over Jordan, and came unto Jericho: and the men of Jericho fought against you, the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the Canaanites, and the Hittites, and the Girgashites, the Hivites, and the Jebusites; and I delivered th
625,ech chased him, and he fled before him, and many were overthrown and wounded, even unto the entering of the gate. 
And Abimelech dwelt at Arumah: and Zebul thrust out Gaal and his brethren, that they should not dwell in Shechem. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that the people went out into the field; and they told Abimelech. 
And he took the people, and divided them into three companies, and laid wait in the field, and looked, and, behold, the people were come forth out of the city; and he rose up against them, and smote them. 
And Abimelech, and the company that was with him, rushed forward, and stood in the ente
603,atutes, neither executed my judgments, but have done after the manners of the heathen that are round about you. 
And it came to pass, when I prophesied, that Pelatiah the son of Benaiah died. Then fell I down upon my face, and cried with a loud voice, and said, Ah Lord GOD! wilt thou make a full end of the remnant of Israel? 
Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, thy brethren, even thy brethren, the men of thy kindred, and all the house of Israel wholly, are they unto whom the inhabitants of Jerusalem have said, Get you far from the LORD: unto us is this land given in poss
649,came with a straight course to Samothracia, and the next day to Neapolis; 
And from thence to Philippi, which is the chief city of that part of Macedonia, and a colony: and we were in that city abiding certain days. 
And on the sabbath we went out of the city by a river side, where prayer was wont to be made; and we sat down, and spake unto the women which resorted thither. 
And a certain woman named Lydia, a seller of purple, of the city of Thyatira, which worshipped God, heard us: whose heart the Lord opened, that she attended unto the things which were spoken of Paul. 
And when she was baptized, and her household, she besought us, saying,
665,f Benjamin, which was by the house of the LORD. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that Pashur brought forth Jeremiah out of the stocks. Then said Jeremiah unto him, The LORD hath not called thy name Pashur, but Magormissabib. 
For thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will make thee a terror to thyself, and to all thy friends: and they shall fall by the sword of their enemies, and thine eyes shall behold it: and I will give all Judah into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall carry them captive into Babylon, and shall slay them with the sword. 
Moreover I will deliver all the strength of this city, and all the labours thereof, and all the precious things
642, poureth out my gall upon the ground. 
He breaketh me with breach upon breach, he runneth upon me like a giant. 
I have sewed sackcloth upon my skin, and defiled my horn in the dust. 
My face is foul with weeping, and on my eyelids is the shadow of death; 
Not for any injustice in mine hands: also my prayer is pure. 
O earth, cover not thou my blood, and let my cry have no place. 
Also now, behold, my witness is in heaven, and my record is on high. 
My friends scorn me: but mine eye poureth out tears unto God. 
O that one might plead for a man with God, as a man pleadeth for his neighbour! 
When a few years are come, then I shall go t
679,right way to take my master's brother's daughter unto his son. 
And now if ye will deal kindly and truly with my master, tell me: and if not, tell me; that I may turn to the right hand, or to the left. 
Then Laban and Bethuel answered and said, The thing proceedeth from the LORD: we cannot speak unto thee bad or good. 
Behold, Rebekah is before thee, take her, and go, and let her be thy master's son's wife, as the LORD hath spoken. 
And it came to pass, that, when Abraham's servant heard their words, he worshipped the LORD, bowing himself to the earth. 
And the servant brought forth jewels of silver, and jewels of gold, and raiment, and gave them to Rebekah: he gave also
703,bove the horse gate repaired the priests, every one over against his house. 
After them repaired Zadok the son of Immer over against his house. After him repaired also Shemaiah the son of Shechaniah, the keeper of the east gate. 
After him repaired Hananiah the son of Shelemiah, and Hanun the sixth son of Zalaph, another piece. After him repaired Meshullam the son of Berechiah over against his chamber. 
After him repaired Malchiah the goldsmith's son unto the place of the Nethinims, and of the merchants, over against the gate Miphkad, and to the going up of the corner. 
And between the going up of the corner unto the sheep gate repaired the goldsmiths and the merchants. 
But it came to pass, th
483,, and that for all thy sins, even in all thy borders. 
And I will make thee to pass with thine enemies into a land which thou knowest not: for a fire is kindled in mine anger, which shall burn upon you. 
O LORD, thou knowest: remember me, and visit me, and revenge me of my persecutors; take me not away in thy longsuffering: know that for thy sake I have suffered rebuke. 
Thy words were found, and I did eat them; and thy word was unto me the joy and rejoicing of mine heart: for I
535,of Ephraim, shall be trodden under feet: 
And the glorious beauty, which is on the head of the fat valley, shall be a fading flower, and as the hasty fruit before the summer; which when he that looketh upon it seeth, while it is yet in his hand he eateth it up. 
In that day shall the LORD of hosts be for a crown of glory, and for a diadem of beauty, unto the residue of his people, 
And for a spirit of judgment to him that sitteth in judgment, and for strength to them that turn the battle to the gate. 
But they also have erred thr
674,RD, till he come and rain righteousness upon you. 
Ye have plowed wickedness, ye have reaped iniquity; ye have eaten the fruit of lies: because thou didst trust in thy way, in the multitude of thy mighty men. 
Therefore shall a tumult arise among thy people, and all thy fortresses shall be spoiled, as Shalman spoiled Betharbel in the day of battle: the mother was dashed in pieces upon her children. 
So shall Bethel do unto you because of your great wickedness: in a morning shall the king of Israel utterly be cut off. 
When Israel was a child, then I loved him, and called my son out of Egypt. 
As they called them, so they went from them: they sacrificed unto Baalim, 
645,sera, the children of Tamah, 
The children of Neziah, the children of Hatipha. 
The children of Solomon's servants: the children of Sotai, the children of Sophereth, the children of Perida, 
The children of Jaala, the children of Darkon, the children of Giddel, 
The children of Shephatiah, the children of Hattil, the children of Pochereth of Zebaim, the children of Amon. 
All the Nethinims, and the children of Solomon's servants, were three hundred ninety and two. 
And these were they which went up also from Telmelah, Telharesha, Cherub, Addon, and Immer: but they could not shew their father's house, nor their seed, whether they were of 
590,d warred against the Philistines, and brake down the wall of Gath, and the wall of Jabneh, and the wall of Ashdod, and built cities about Ashdod, and among the Philistines. 
And God helped him against the Philistines, and against the Arabians that dwelt in Gurbaal, and the Mehunims. 
And the Ammonites gave gifts to Uzziah: and his name spread abroad even to the entering in of Egypt; for he strengthened himself exceedingly. 
Moreover Uzziah built towers in Jerusalem at the corner gate, and at the valley gate, and at the turning of the wall, and fortified them. 
Also he built towers in
683,asses, neither will your Father forgive your trespasses. 
Moreover when ye fast, be not, as the hypocrites, of a sad countenance: for they disfigure their faces, that they may appear unto men to fast. Verily I say unto you, They have their reward. 
But thou, when thou fastest, anoint thine head, and wash thy face; 
That thou appear not unto men to fast, but unto thy Father which is in secret: and thy Father, which seeth in secret, shall reward thee openly. 
Lay not up for yourselves treasures upon earth, where moth and rust doth corrupt, and where thieves break through and steal: 
But lay up for yourselves treasures in heaven, where neither moth nor rust doth corrupt, and wh
688,s of gold, both for the doors of the inner house, the most holy place, and for the doors of the house, to wit, of the temple. 
So was ended all the work that king Solomon made for the house of the LORD. And Solomon brought in the things which David his father had dedicated; even the silver, and the gold, and the vessels, did he put among the treasures of the house of the LORD. 
Then Solomon assembled the elders of Israel, and all the heads of the tribes, the chief of the fathers of the children of Israel, unto king Solomon in Jerusalem, that they might bring up the ark of the covenant of the LORD out of the city of David, which is Zion. 
And all the men of Israel assembled themse
675,l there be an altar to the LORD in the midst of the land of Egypt, and a pillar at the border thereof to the LORD. 
And it shall be for a sign and for a witness unto the LORD of hosts in the land of Egypt: for they shall cry unto the LORD because of the oppressors, and he shall send them a saviour, and a great one, and he shall deliver them. 
And the LORD shall be known to Egypt, and the Egyptians shall know the LORD in that day, and shall do sacrifice and oblation; yea, they shall vow a vow unto the LORD, and perform it. 
And the LORD shall smite Egypt: he shall smite and heal it: and they shall return even to the LORD, and he shall be intreated of them, and shall h
480,worth of it in money. 
And Naboth said to Ahab, The LORD forbid it me, that I should give the inheritance of my fathers unto thee. 
And Ahab came into his house heavy and displeased because of the word which Naboth the Jezreelite had spoken to him: for he had said, I will not give thee the inheritance of my fathers. And he laid him down upon his bed, and turned away his face, and would eat no bread. 
But Jezebel his wife came to him, and said unto him, Why is thy spirit so sa
644,wn by the way, and hide thyself from them: thou shalt surely help him to lift them up again. 
The woman shall not wear that which pertaineth unto a man, neither shall a man put on a woman's garment: for all that do so are abomination unto the LORD thy God. 
If a bird's nest chance to be before thee in the way in any tree, or on the ground, whether they be young ones, or eggs, and the dam sitting upon the young, or upon the eggs, thou shalt not take the dam with the young: 
But thou shalt in any wise let the dam go, and take the young to thee; that it may be well with thee, and that thou mayest prolong thy days. 
When thou buildest a new
485,he hath garnished the heavens; his hand hath formed the crooked serpent. 
Lo, these are parts of his ways: but how little a portion is heard of him? but the thunder of his power who can understand? 
Moreover Job continued his parable, and said, 
As God liveth, who hath taken away my judgment; and the Almighty, who hath vexed my soul; 
All the while my breath is in me, and the spirit of God is in my nostrils; 
My lips shall not speak wickedness, nor my tongue utter deceit. 
God for
616,e righteousness which is in the law, blameless. 
But what things were gain to me, those I counted loss for Christ. 
Yea doubtless, and I count all things but loss for the excellency of the knowledge of Christ Jesus my Lord: for whom I have suffered the loss of all things, and do count them but dung, that I may win Christ, 
And be found in him, not having mine own righteousness, which is of the law, but that which is through the faith of Christ, the righteousness which is of God by faith: 
That I may know him, and the power of his resurrection, and the fellowship of his sufferings, being made conformable unto 
531,he door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And when Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son of Aaron the priest, saw it, he rose up from among the congregation, and took a javelin in his hand; 
And he went after the man of Israel into the tent, and thrust both of them through, the man of Israel, and the woman through her belly. So the plague was stayed from the children of Israel. 
And those that died in the plague were twenty and four thousand. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son
551,, I am tempted of God: for God cannot be tempted with evil, neither tempteth he any man: 
But every man is tempted, when he is drawn away of his own lust, and enticed. 
Then when lust hath conceived, it bringeth forth sin: and sin, when it is finished, bringeth forth death. 
Do not err, my beloved brethren. 
Every good gift and every perfect gift is from above, and cometh down from the Father of lights, with whom is no variableness, neither shadow of turning. 
Of his own will begat he us with the word of truth, that we should be a kind of firstf
585,aid unto Abraham, What sawest thou, that thou hast done this thing? 
And Abraham said, Because I thought, Surely the fear of God is not in this place; and they will slay me for my wife's sake. 
And yet indeed she is my sister; she is the daughter of my father, but not the daughter of my mother; and she became my wife. 
And it came to pass, when God caused me to wander from my father's house, that I said unto her, This is thy kindness which thou shalt shew unto me; at every place whither we shall come, say of me, He is my brother. 
And Abimelech took sheep, and oxen, and menserva
506,
Bow thy heavens, O LORD, and come down: touch the mountains, and they shall smoke. 
Cast forth lightning, and scatter them: shoot out thine arrows, and destroy them. 
Send thine hand from above; rid me, and deliver me out of great waters, from the hand of strange children; 
Whose mouth speaketh vanity, and their right hand is a right hand of falsehood. 
I will sing a new song unto thee, O God: upon a psaltery and an instrument of ten strings will I sing praises unto thee. 
It is he that giveth salvat
709, his clothes, and be unclean until the even: and it shall be unto the children of Israel, and unto the stranger that sojourneth among them, for a statute for ever. 
He that toucheth the dead body of any man shall be unclean seven days. 
He shall purify himself with it on the third day, and on the seventh day he shall be clean: but if he purify not himself the third day, then the seventh day he shall not be clean. 
Whosoever toucheth the dead body of any man that is dead, and purifieth not himself, defileth the tabernacle of the LORD; and that soul shall be cut off from Israel: because the water of separation was not sprinkled upon him, he shall be unclean; his uncleanness is yet upon him. 
This is th
587,not the unclean thing; and I will receive you. 
And will be a Father unto you, and ye shall be my sons and daughters, saith the Lord Almighty. 
Having therefore these promises, dearly beloved, let us cleanse ourselves from all filthiness of the flesh and spirit, perfecting holiness in the fear of God. 
Receive us; we have wronged no man, we have corrupted no man, we have defrauded no man. 
I speak not this to condemn you: for I have said before, that ye are in our hearts to die and live with you. 
Great is my boldness of speech toward you, great is my glorying of you: I am filled 
655, 
Who can say, I have made my heart clean, I am pure from my sin? 
Divers weights, and divers measures, both of them are alike abomination to the LORD. 
Even a child is known by his doings, whether his work be pure, and whether it be right. 
The hearing ear, and the seeing eye, the LORD hath made even both of them. 
Love not sleep, lest thou come to poverty; open thine eyes, and thou shalt be satisfied with bread. 
It is naught, it is naught, saith the buyer: but when he is gone his way, then he boasteth. 
There is gold, and a multitude of rubies: but the lips of knowledge are a precious jewel. 
Take his garment that is surety for a stranger: and 
498,r they shall go into captivity. 
All thy trees and fruit of thy land shall the locust consume. 
The stranger that is within thee shall get up above thee very high; and thou shalt come down very low. 
He shall lend to thee, and thou shalt not lend to him: he shall be the head, and thou shalt be the tail. 
Moreover all these curses shall come upon thee, and shall pursue thee, and overtake thee, till thou be destroyed; because thou hearkenedst not unto the voice of the LORD thy God, to keep his c
622, they made a covenant at Beersheba: then Abimelech rose up, and Phichol the chief captain of his host, and they returned into the land of the Philistines. 
And Abraham planted a grove in Beersheba, and called there on the name of the LORD, the everlasting God. 
And Abraham sojourned in the Philistines' land many days. 
And it came to pass after these things, that God did tempt Abraham, and said unto him, Abraham: and he said, Behold, here I am. 
And he said, Take now thy son, thine only son Isaac, whom thou lovest, and get thee into the land of Moriah; and offer him there for a burnt offering upon one of the mounta
675,s, and all the fat that is upon the inwards, 
And the two kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, which is by the flanks, and the caul above the liver, with the kidneys, it shall he take away. 
And the priest shall burn it upon the altar: it is the food of the offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And if his offering be a goat, then he shall offer it before the LORD. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of it, and kill it before the tabernacle of the congregation: and the sons of Aaron shall sprinkle the blood thereof upon the altar round about. 
And he shall offer thereof his offering, even an offering made by fire unto the LORD; the fat that covereth the inward
635,s shall be uncovered, yea, thy shame shall be seen: I will take vengeance, and I will not meet thee as a man. 
As for our redeemer, the LORD of hosts is his name, the Holy One of Israel. 
Sit thou silent, and get thee into darkness, O daughter of the Chaldeans: for thou shalt no more be called, The lady of kingdoms. 
I was wroth with my people, I have polluted mine inheritance, and given them into thine hand: thou didst shew them no mercy; upon the ancient hast thou very heavily laid thy yoke. 
And thou saidst, I shall be a lady for ever: so that thou didst not lay these things to thy heart, neither didst remember the latter en
493,built great bulwarks against it: 
Now there was found in it a poor wise man, and he by his wisdom delivered the city; yet no man remembered that same poor man. 
Then said I, Wisdom is better than strength: nevertheless the poor man's wisdom is despised, and his words are not heard. 
The words of wise men are heard in quiet more than the cry of him that ruleth among fools. 
Wisdom is better than weapons of war: but one sinner destroyeth much good. 
Dead flies cause the ointment of the apot
714,f Israel to dwell in booths, when I brought them out of the land of Egypt: I am the LORD your God. 
And Moses declared unto the children of Israel the feasts of the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Command the children of Israel, that they bring unto thee pure oil olive beaten for the light, to cause the lamps to burn continually. 
Without the vail of the testimony, in the tabernacle of the congregation, shall Aaron order it from the evening unto the morning before the LORD continually: it shall be a statute for ever in your generations. 
He shall order the lamps upon the pure candlestick before the LORD continually. 
And thou shalt take fine flour, and bake twelve cakes thereof: two tenth d
617, present. 
And the priest answered David, and said, There is no common bread under mine hand, but there is hallowed bread; if the young men have kept themselves at least from women. 
And David answered the priest, and said unto him, Of a truth women have been kept from us about these three days, since I came out, and the vessels of the young men are holy, and the bread is in a manner common, yea, though it were sanctified this day in the vessel. 
So the priest gave him hallowed bread: for there was no bread there but the shewbread, that was taken from before the LORD, to put hot bread in the day when it was ta
622,But I am poor and needy; yet the Lord thinketh upon me: thou art my help and my deliverer; make no tarrying, O my God. 
Blessed is he that considereth the poor: the LORD will deliver him in time of trouble. 
The LORD will preserve him, and keep him alive; and he shall be blessed upon the earth: and thou wilt not deliver him unto the will of his enemies. 
The LORD will strengthen him upon the bed of languishing: thou wilt make all his bed in his sickness. 
I said, LORD, be merciful unto me: heal my soul; for I have sinned against thee. 
Mine enemies speak evil of me, When shall he die, and his name perish? 
And if h
655,ed twelve thousand. 
Of the tribe of Simeon were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Levi were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Issachar were sealed twelve thousand. 
Of the tribe of Zabulon were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Joseph were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Benjamin were sealed twelve thousand. 
After this I beheld, and, lo, a great multitude, which no man could number, of all nations, and kindreds, and people, and tongues, stood before the throne, and before the Lamb, clothed with white robes, and palms in their hands; 
And cried with a loud voice, saying, Salvation to our God which sitteth upon the throne
683,: 
But my mercy shall not depart away from him, as I took it from Saul, whom I put away before thee. 
And thine house and thy kingdom shall be established for ever before thee: thy throne shall be established for ever. 
According to all these words, and according to all this vision, so did Nathan speak unto David. 
Then went king David in, and sat before the LORD, and he said, Who am I, O Lord GOD? and what is my house, that thou hast brought me hitherto? 
And this was yet a small thing in thy sight, O Lord GOD; but thou hast spoken also of thy servant's house for a great while to come. And is this the manner of man, O Lord GOD? 
And what can David say more unto thee? for th
540, sitting on the right hand of power, and coming in the clouds of heaven. 
Then the high priest rent his clothes, saying, He hath spoken blasphemy; what further need have we of witnesses? behold, now ye have heard his blasphemy. 
What think ye? They answered and said, He is guilty of death. 
Then did they spit in his face, and buffeted him; and others smote him with the palms of their hands, 
Saying, Prophesy unto us, thou Christ, Who is he that smote thee? 
Now Peter sat without in the palace: and a damsel came unto him, saying, Thou 
651, who hath not left destitute my master of his mercy and his truth: I being in the way, the LORD led me to the house of my master's brethren. 
And the damsel ran, and told them of her mother's house these things. 
And Rebekah had a brother, and his name was Laban: and Laban ran out unto the man, unto the well. 
And it came to pass, when he saw the earring and bracelets upon his sister's hands, and when he heard the words of Rebekah his sister, saying, Thus spake the man unto me; that he came unto the man; and, behold, he stood by the camels at the well. 
And he said, Come in, thou blessed of the LORD; wherefore standest thou without? for I have
642, thou camest not within the days appointed, and that the Philistines gathered themselves together at Michmash; 
Therefore said I, The Philistines will come down now upon me to Gilgal, and I have not made supplication unto the LORD: I forced myself therefore, and offered a burnt offering. 
And Samuel said to Saul, Thou hast done foolishly: thou hast not kept the commandment of the LORD thy God, which he commanded thee: for now would the LORD have established thy kingdom upon Israel for ever. 
But now thy kingdom shall not continue: the LORD hath sought him a man after his own heart, and the LORD hath commanded him to be captain over hi
520,e lay, and was fast asleep. 
So the shipmaster came to him, and said unto him, What meanest thou, O sleeper? arise, call upon thy God, if so be that God will think upon us, that we perish not. 
And they said every one to his fellow, Come, and let us cast lots, that we may know for whose cause this evil is upon us. So they cast lots, and the lot fell upon Jonah. 
Then said they unto him, Tell us, we pray thee, for whose cause this evil is upon us; What is thine occupation? and whence comest thou? what is thy country
694,e diseased with your horns, till ye have scattered them abroad; 
Therefore will I save my flock, and they shall no more be a prey; and I will judge between cattle and cattle. 
And I will set up one shepherd over them, and he shall feed them, even my servant David; he shall feed them, and he shall be their shepherd. 
And I the LORD will be their God, and my servant David a prince among them; I the LORD have spoken it. 
And I will make with them a covenant of peace, and will cause the evil beasts to cease out of the land: and they shall dwell safely in the wilderness, and sleep in the woods. 
And I will make them and the places round about my hill a blessing; and I will cause the shower 
653,d have not hearkened unto my voice; 
I also will not henceforth drive out any from before them of the nations which Joshua left when he died: 
That through them I may prove Israel, whether they will keep the way of the LORD to walk therein, as their fathers did keep it, or not. 
Therefore the LORD left those nations, without driving them out hastily; neither delivered he them into the hand of Joshua. 
Now these are the nations which the LORD left, to prove Israel by them, even as many of Israel as had not known all the wars of Canaan; 
Only that the generations of the children of Israel might know, to teach them war, at the least such as before 
612,hou be found a liar. 
Two things have I required of thee; deny me them not before I die: 
Remove far from me vanity and lies: give me neither poverty nor riches; feed me with food convenient for me: 
Lest I be full, and deny thee, and say, Who is the LORD? or lest I be poor, and steal, and take the name of my God in vain. 
Accuse not a servant unto his master, lest he curse thee, and thou be found guilty. 
There is a generation that curseth their father, and doth not bless their mother. 
There is a generation that are pure in their own eyes, and yet is not washed from their filthiness. 
There is a generat
565,ped in Gilgal, in the east border of Jericho. 
And those twelve stones, which they took out of Jordan, did Joshua pitch in Gilgal. 
And he spake unto the children of Israel, saying, When your children shall ask their fathers in time to come, saying, What mean these stones? 
Then ye shall let your children know, saying, Israel came over this Jordan on dry land. 
For the LORD your God dried up the waters of Jordan from before you, until ye were passed over, as the LORD your God did to the Red sea, which he dried up from before us, until we were gone over: 
That
535,e and a family in Israel? 
And the priest's heart was glad, and he took the ephod, and the teraphim, and the graven image, and went in the midst of the people. 
So they turned and departed, and put the little ones and the cattle and the carriage before them. 
And when they were a good way from the house of Micah, the men that were in the houses near to Micah's house were gathered together, and overtook the children of Dan. 
And they cried unto the children of Dan. And they turned their faces, and said unto Micah, What aileth thee
702,he counsel of Judah and Jerusalem in this place; and I will cause them to fall by the sword before their enemies, and by the hands of them that seek their lives: and their carcases will I give to be meat for the fowls of the heaven, and for the beasts of the earth. 
And I will make this city desolate, and an hissing; every one that passeth thereby shall be astonished and hiss because of all the plagues thereof. 
And I will cause them to eat the flesh of their sons and the flesh of their daughters, and they shall eat every one the flesh of his friend in the siege and straitness, wherewith their enemies, and they that seek their lives, shall straiten them. 
Then shalt thou break the bottle in th
621,the people bowed the head and worshipped. 
And the children of Israel went away, and did as the LORD had commanded Moses and Aaron, so did they. 
And it came to pass, that at midnight the LORD smote all the firstborn in the land of Egypt, from the firstborn of Pharaoh that sat on his throne unto the firstborn of the captive that was in the dungeon; and all the firstborn of cattle. 
And Pharaoh rose up in the night, he, and all his servants, and all the Egyptians; and there was a great cry in Egypt; for there was not a house where there was not one dead. 
And he called for Moses and Aaron by night, and said, Rise u
711,ich is taken up from you into heaven, shall so come in like manner as ye have seen him go into heaven. 
Then returned they unto Jerusalem from the mount called Olivet, which is from Jerusalem a sabbath day's journey. 
And when they were come in, they went up into an upper room, where abode both Peter, and James, and John, and Andrew, Philip, and Thomas, Bartholomew, and Matthew, James the son of Alphaeus, and Simon Zelotes, and Judas the brother of James. 
These all continued with one accord in prayer and supplication, with the women, and Mary the mother of Jesus, and with his brethren. 
And in those days Peter stood up in the midst of the disciples, and said, (the number of names together were about a
566,amin, a captain of the ward was there, whose name was Irijah, the son of Shelemiah, the son of Hananiah; and he took Jeremiah the prophet, saying, Thou fallest away to the Chaldeans. 
Then said Jeremiah, It is false; I fall not away to the Chaldeans. But he hearkened not to him: so Irijah took Jeremiah, and brought him to the princes. 
Wherefore the princes were wroth with Jeremiah, and smote him, and put him in prison in the house of Jonathan the scribe: for they had made that the prison. 
When Jeremiah was entered into the dungeon, and into the cabins, and J
549,I also will not henceforth drive out any from before them of the nations which Joshua left when he died: 
That through them I may prove Israel, whether they will keep the way of the LORD to walk therein, as their fathers did keep it, or not. 
Therefore the LORD left those nations, without driving them out hastily; neither delivered he them into the hand of Joshua. 
Now these are the nations which the LORD left, to prove Israel by them, even as many of Israel as had not known all the wars of Canaan; 
Only that the generations of the children of
550,ute, afflicted, tormented; 
(Of whom the world was not worthy:) they wandered in deserts, and in mountains, and in dens and caves of the earth. 
And these all, having obtained a good report through faith, received not the promise: 
God having provided some better thing for us, that they without us should not be made perfect. 
Wherefore seeing we also are compassed about with so great a cloud of witnesses, let us lay aside every weight, and the sin which doth so easily beset us, and let us run with patience the race that is set before us, 
Looki
618, much more things that pertain to this life? 
If then ye have judgments of things pertaining to this life, set them to judge who are least esteemed in the church. 
I speak to your shame. Is it so, that there is not a wise man among you? no, not one that shall be able to judge between his brethren? 
But brother goeth to law with brother, and that before the unbelievers. 
Now therefore there is utterly a fault among you, because ye go to law one with another. Why do ye not rather take wrong? why do ye not rather suffer yourselves to be defrauded? 
Nay, ye do wrong, and defraud, and that your brethren. 
Know ye no
693,shall fall unto you for an inheritance, even the land of Canaan with the coasts thereof:) 
Then your south quarter shall be from the wilderness of Zin along by the coast of Edom, and your south border shall be the outmost coast of the salt sea eastward: 
And your border shall turn from the south to the ascent of Akrabbim, and pass on to Zin: and the going forth thereof shall be from the south to Kadeshbarnea, and shall go on to Hazaraddar, and pass on to Azmon: 
And the border shall fetch a compass from Azmon unto the river of Egypt, and the goings out of it shall be at the sea. 
And as for the western border, ye shall even have the great sea for a border: this shall be your west bord
568,was in his mouth, and iniquity was not found in his lips: he walked with me in peace and equity, and did turn many away from iniquity. 
For the priest's lips should keep knowledge, and they should seek the law at his mouth: for he is the messenger of the LORD of hosts. 
But ye are departed out of the way; ye have caused many to stumble at the law; ye have corrupted the covenant of Levi, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Therefore have I also made you contemptible and base before all the people, according as ye have not kept my ways, but have been partial in the law. 
Ha
694,, do good to them that hate you, and pray for them which despitefully use you, and persecute you; 
That ye may be the children of your Father which is in heaven: for he maketh his sun to rise on the evil and on the good, and sendeth rain on the just and on the unjust. 
For if ye love them which love you, what reward have ye? do not even the publicans the same? 
And if ye salute your brethren only, what do ye more than others? do not even the publicans so? 
Be ye therefore perfect, even as your Father which is in heaven is perfect. 
Take heed that ye do not your alms before men, to be seen of them: otherwise ye have no reward of your Father which is in heaven. 
Therefore when thou doest
514, is all, and in all. 
Put on therefore, as the elect of God, holy and beloved, bowels of mercies, kindness, humbleness of mind, meekness, longsuffering; 
Forbearing one another, and forgiving one another, if any man have a quarrel against any: even as Christ forgave you, so also do ye. 
And above all these things put on charity, which is the bond of perfectness. 
And let the peace of God rule in your hearts, to the which also ye are called in one body; and be ye thankful. 
Let the word of Christ dwell in you 
584,strength shall be spent in vain: for your land shall not yield her increase, neither shall the trees of the land yield their fruits. 
And if ye walk contrary unto me, and will not hearken unto me; I will bring seven times more plagues upon you according to your sins. 
I will also send wild beasts among you, which shall rob you of your children, and destroy your cattle, and make you few in number; and your high ways shall be desolate. 
And if ye will not be reformed by me by these things, but will walk contrary unto me; 
Then will I also walk contrary unto you, and will punish y
644,o the beasts to be devoured, and they that be in the forts and in the caves shall die of the pestilence. 
For I will lay the land most desolate, and the pomp of her strength shall cease; and the mountains of Israel shall be desolate, that none shall pass through. 
Then shall they know that I am the LORD, when I have laid the land most desolate because of all their abominations which they have committed. 
Also, thou son of man, the children of thy people still are talking against thee by the walls and in the doors of the houses, and speak one to another, every one to his brother, saying, Come, I pray you, and hear what is the word that c
634,nd, behold, the whole herd of swine ran violently down a steep place into the sea, and perished in the waters. 
And they that kept them fled, and went their ways into the city, and told every thing, and what was befallen to the possessed of the devils. 
And, behold, the whole city came out to meet Jesus: and when they saw him, they besought him that he would depart out of their coasts. 
And he entered into a ship, and passed over, and came into his own city. 
And, behold, they brought to him a man sick of the palsy, lying on a bed: and Jesus seeing their faith said unto the sick of the palsy; Son, be of good cheer; thy sins be
675,the whirlwind of the LORD goeth forth with fury, a continuing whirlwind: it shall fall with pain upon the head of the wicked. 
The fierce anger of the LORD shall not return, until he hath done it, and until he have performed the intents of his heart: in the latter days ye shall consider it. 
At the same time, saith the LORD, will I be the God of all the families of Israel, and they shall be my people. 
Thus saith the LORD, The people which were left of the sword found grace in the wilderness; even Israel, when I went to cause him to rest. 
The LORD hath appeared of old unto me, saying, Yea, I have loved thee with an everlasting love: therefore with lovingkindness hav
715,the gold, and all the instruments, put he among the treasures of the house of God. 
Then Solomon assembled the elders of Israel, and all the heads of the tribes, the chief of the fathers of the children of Israel, unto Jerusalem, to bring up the ark of the covenant of the LORD out of the city of David, which is Zion. 
Wherefore all the men of Israel assembled themselves unto the king in the feast which was in the seventh month. 
And all the elders of Israel came; and the Levites took up the ark. 
And they brought up the ark, and the tabernacle of the congregation, and all the holy vessels that were in the tabernacle, these did the priests and the Levites bring up. 
Also king Solomon, and all the congregati
616,el: according to this time it shall be said of Jacob and of Israel, What hath God wrought! 
Behold, the people shall rise up as a great lion, and lift up himself as a young lion: he shall not lie down until he eat of the prey, and drink the blood of the slain. 
And Balak said unto Balaam, Neither curse them at all, nor bless them at all. 
But Balaam answered and said unto Balak, Told not I thee, saying, All that the LORD speaketh, that I must do? 
And Balak said unto Balaam, Come, I pray thee, I will bring thee unto another place; peradventure it will please God that thou mayest curse me them from thence. 
An
503,had familiar spirits, and the wizards, out of the land. 
And the Philistines gathered themselves together, and came and pitched in Shunem: and Saul gathered all Israel together, and they pitched in Gilboa. 
And when Saul saw the host of the Philistines, he was afraid, and his heart greatly trembled. 
And when Saul enquired of the LORD, the LORD answered him not, neither by dreams, nor by Urim, nor by prophets. 
Then said Saul unto his servants, Seek me a woman that hath a familiar spirit, that I ma
524,here was very great gladness. 
Also day by day, from the first day unto the last day, he read in the book of the law of God. And they kept the feast seven days; and on the eighth day was a solemn assembly, according unto the manner. 
Now in the twenty and fourth day of this month the children of Israel were assembled with fasting, and with sackclothes, and earth upon them. 
And the seed of Israel separated themselves from all strangers, and stood and confessed their sins, and the iniquities of their fathers. 
And they 
611,the land, when any seeth a man's bone, then shall he set up a sign by it, till the buriers have buried it in the valley of Hamongog. 
And also the name of the city shall be Hamonah. Thus shall they cleanse the land. 
And, thou son of man, thus saith the Lord GOD; Speak unto every feathered fowl, and to every beast of the field, Assemble yourselves, and come; gather yourselves on every side to my sacrifice that I do sacrifice for you, even a great sacrifice upon the mountains of Israel, that ye may eat flesh, and drink blood. 
Ye shall eat the flesh of the mighty, and drink the blood of the princes of the
595,ext sabbath day came almost the whole city together to hear the word of God. 
But when the Jews saw the multitudes, they were filled with envy, and spake against those things which were spoken by Paul, contradicting and blaspheming. 
Then Paul and Barnabas waxed bold, and said, It was necessary that the word of God should first have been spoken to you: but seeing ye put it from you, and judge yourselves unworthy of everlasting life, lo, we turn to the Gentiles. 
For so hath the Lord commanded us, saying, I have set thee to be a light of the Gentiles, that thou shouldest be for salvation u
610,aise thee with my whole heart: before the gods will I sing praise unto thee. 
I will worship toward thy holy temple, and praise thy name for thy lovingkindness and for thy truth: for thou hast magnified thy word above all thy name. 
In the day when I cried thou answeredst me, and strengthenedst me with strength in my soul. 
All the kings of the earth shall praise thee, O LORD, when they hear the words of thy mouth. 
Yea, they shall sing in the ways of the LORD: for great is the glory of the LORD. 
Though the LORD be high, yet hath he respect unto the lowly: but the proud he knoweth afar off. 
Though I w
555,t walk in the manners of the nation, which I cast out before you: for they committed all these things, and therefore I abhorred them. 
But I have said unto you, Ye shall inherit their land, and I will give it unto you to possess it, a land that floweth with milk and honey: I am the LORD your God, which have separated you from other people. 
Ye shall therefore put difference between clean beasts and unclean, and between unclean fowls and clean: and ye shall not make your souls abominable by beast, or by fowl, or by any manner of living thing that cre
659,he children of Ammon as Gomorrah, even the breeding of nettles, and saltpits, and a perpetual desolation: the residue of my people shall spoil them, and the remnant of my people shall possess them. 
This shall they have for their pride, because they have reproached and magnified themselves against the people of the LORD of hosts. 
The LORD will be terrible unto them: for he will famish all the gods of the earth; and men shall worship him, every one from his place, even all the isles of the heathen. 
Ye Ethiopians also, ye shall be slain by my sword. 
And he will stretch out his hand against the north, and destroy Assyria; and will make Nineveh a desol
716, if the salt have lost his savour, wherewith shall it be salted? it is thenceforth good for nothing, but to be cast out, and to be trodden under foot of men. 
Ye are the light of the world. A city that is set on an hill cannot be hid. 
Neither do men light a candle, and put it under a bushel, but on a candlestick; and it giveth light unto all that are in the house. 
Let your light so shine before men, that they may see your good works, and glorify your Father which is in heaven. 
Think not that I am come to destroy the law, or the prophets: I am not come to destroy, but to fulfil. 
For verily I say unto you, Till heaven and earth pass, one jot or one tittle shall in no wise pass from the law, till all be fu
644, thine heritage to reproach, that the heathen should rule over them: wherefore should they say among the people, Where is their God? 
Then will the LORD be jealous for his land, and pity his people. 
Yea, the LORD will answer and say unto his people, Behold, I will send you corn, and wine, and oil, and ye shall be satisfied therewith: and I will no more make you a reproach among the heathen: 
But I will remove far off from you the northern army, and will drive him into a land barren and desolate, with his face toward the east sea, and his hinder part toward the utmost sea, and his stink shall come up, and his ill savour shall come up, b
677, far off. 
And all his servants passed on beside him; and all the Cherethites, and all the Pelethites, and all the Gittites, six hundred men which came after him from Gath, passed on before the king. 
Then said the king to Ittai the Gittite, Wherefore goest thou also with us? return to thy place, and abide with the king: for thou art a stranger, and also an exile. 
Whereas thou camest but yesterday, should I this day make thee go up and down with us? seeing I go whither I may, return thou, and take back thy brethren: mercy and truth be with thee. 
And Ittai answered the king, and said, As the LORD liveth, and as my lord the king liveth, surely in what place my lord the
590,? If he said, Nay; 
Then said they unto him, Say now Shibboleth: and he said Sibboleth: for he could not frame to pronounce it right. Then they took him, and slew him at the passages of Jordan: and there fell at that time of the Ephraimites forty and two thousand. 
And Jephthah judged Israel six years. Then died Jephthah the Gileadite, and was buried in one of the cities of Gilead. 
And after him Ibzan of Bethlehem judged Israel. 
And he had thirty sons, and thirty daughters, whom he sent abroad, and took in thirty daughters from abroad for his sons. And he judged Israel seven years.
616,r in the month of Abib the LORD thy God brought thee forth out of Egypt by night. 
Thou shalt therefore sacrifice the passover unto the LORD thy God, of the flock and the herd, in the place which the LORD shall choose to place his name there. 
Thou shalt eat no leavened bread with it; seven days shalt thou eat unleavened bread therewith, even the bread of affliction; for thou camest forth out of the land of Egypt in haste: that thou mayest remember the day when thou camest forth out of the land of Egypt all the days of thy life. 
And there shall be no leavened bread seen with thee in all thy coast seven days;
594,ith the LORD of hosts, and cut off from Babylon the name, and remnant, and son, and nephew, saith the LORD. 
I will also make it a possession for the bittern, and pools of water: and I will sweep it with the besom of destruction, saith the LORD of hosts. 
The LORD of hosts hath sworn, saying, Surely as I have thought, so shall it come to pass; and as I have purposed, so shall it stand: 
That I will break the Assyrian in my land, and upon my mountains tread him under foot: then shall his yoke depart from off them, and his burden depart from off their shoulders. 
This is the purpose that i
570,hen he brought me forth into the utter court, the way toward the north: and he brought me into the chamber that was over against the separate place, and which was before the building toward the north. 
Before the length of an hundred cubits was the north door, and the breadth was fifty cubits. 
Over against the twenty cubits which were for the inner court, and over against the pavement which was for the utter court, was gallery against gallery in three stories. 
And before the chambers was a walk to ten cubits breadth inward, a way of one cubit; and their doors to
491,e court; and, behold, in every corner of the court there was a court. 
In the four corners of the court there were courts joined of forty cubits long and thirty broad: these four corners were of one measure. 
And there was a row of building round about in them, round about them four, and it was made with boiling places under the rows round about. 
Then said he unto me, These are the places of them that boil, where the ministers of the house shall boil the sacrifice of the people. 
After
708,and tarried all night in the mount. 
And early in the morning Laban rose up, and kissed his sons and his daughters, and blessed them: and Laban departed, and returned unto his place. 
And Jacob went on his way, and the angels of God met him. 
And when Jacob saw them, he said, This is God's host: and he called the name of that place Mahanaim. 
And Jacob sent messengers before him to Esau his brother unto the land of Seir, the country of Edom. 
And he commanded them, saying, Thus shall ye speak unto my lord Esau; Thy servant Jacob saith thus, I have sojourned with Laban, and stayed there until now: 
And I have oxen, and asses, flocks, and menservants, and womenservants: and I have sent to tell my lord
592,pt. 
Now all the people that came out were circumcised: but all the people that were born in the wilderness by the way as they came forth out of Egypt, them they had not circumcised. 
For the children of Israel walked forty years in the wilderness, till all the people that were men of war, which came out of Egypt, were consumed, because they obeyed not the voice of the LORD: unto whom the LORD sware that he would not shew them the land, which the LORD sware unto their fathers that he would give us, a land that floweth with milk and honey. 
And their children, whom he raised up in their
608, been now a much greater slaughter among the Philistines? 
And they smote the Philistines that day from Michmash to Aijalon: and the people were very faint. 
And the people flew upon the spoil, and took sheep, and oxen, and calves, and slew them on the ground: and the people did eat them with the blood. 
Then they told Saul, saying, Behold, the people sin against the LORD, in that they eat with the blood. And he said, Ye have transgressed: roll a great stone unto me this day. 
And Saul said, Disperse yourselves among the people, and say unto them, Bring me hither every man his ox, and every man his sh
610,hem! God distributeth sorrows in his anger. 
They are as stubble before the wind, and as chaff that the storm carrieth away. 
God layeth up his iniquity for his children: he rewardeth him, and he shall know it. 
His eyes shall see his destruction, and he shall drink of the wrath of the Almighty. 
For what pleasure hath he in his house after him, when the number of his months is cut off in the midst? 
Shall any teach God knowledge? seeing he judgeth those that are high. 
One dieth in his full strength, being wholly at ease and quiet. 
His breasts are full of milk, and his bones are moistened with marrow.
540,f circumcision, a seal of the righteousness of the faith which he had yet being uncircumcised: that he might be the father of all them that believe, though they be not circumcised; that righteousness might be imputed unto them also: 
And the father of circumcision to them who are not of the circumcision only, but who also walk in the steps of that faith of our father Abraham, which he had being yet uncircumcised. 
For the promise, that he should be the heir of the world, was not to Abraham, or to his seed, through the law, but through
480,esurrection: 
And others had trial of cruel mockings and scourgings, yea, moreover of bonds and imprisonment: 
They were stoned, they were sawn asunder, were tempted, were slain with the sword: they wandered about in sheepskins and goatskins; being destitute, afflicted, tormented; 
(Of whom the world was not worthy:) they wandered in deserts, and in mountains, and in dens and caves of the earth. 
And these all, having obtained a good report through faith, received not the pro
602,els of silver in mine hand, yet would I not put forth mine hand against the king's son: for in our hearing the king charged thee and Abishai and Ittai, saying, Beware that none touch the young man Absalom. 
Otherwise I should have wrought falsehood against mine own life: for there is no matter hid from the king, and thou thyself wouldest have set thyself against me. 
Then said Joab, I may not tarry thus with thee. And he took three darts in his hand, and thrust them through the heart of Absalom, while he was yet alive in the midst of the oak. 
And ten young men that bare Joab's armour compassed 
522,de of the camp in the beginning of the middle watch; and they had but newly set the watch: and they blew the trumpets, and brake the pitchers that were in their hands. 
And the three companies blew the trumpets, and brake the pitchers, and held the lamps in their left hands, and the trumpets in their right hands to blow withal: and they cried, The sword of the LORD, and of Gideon. 
And they stood every man in his place round about the camp; and all the host ran, and cried, and fled. 
And the three hundred blew the tr
556,I made you to go up out of Egypt, and have brought you unto the land which I sware unto your fathers; and I said, I will never break my covenant with you. 
And ye shall make no league with the inhabitants of this land; ye shall throw down their altars: but ye have not obeyed my voice: why have ye done this? 
Wherefore I also said, I will not drive them out from before you; but they shall be as thorns in your sides, and their gods shall be a snare unto you. 
And it came to pass, when the angel of the LORD spake these words unto all the children of Isr
612,ed round about by his counsels: that they may do whatsoever he commandeth them upon the face of the world in the earth. 
He causeth it to come, whether for correction, or for his land, or for mercy. 
Hearken unto this, O Job: stand still, and consider the wondrous works of God. 
Dost thou know when God disposed them, and caused the light of his cloud to shine? 
Dost thou know the balancings of the clouds, the wondrous works of him which is perfect in knowledge? 
How thy garments are warm, when he quieteth the earth by the south wind? 
Hast thou with him spread out the sky, which is strong, and as a molten
586,ssed are the eyes which see the things that ye see: 
For I tell you, that many prophets and kings have desired to see those things which ye see, and have not seen them; and to hear those things which ye hear, and have not heard them. 
And, behold, a certain lawyer stood up, and tempted him, saying, Master, what shall I do to inherit eternal life? 
He said unto him, What is written in the law? how readest thou? 
And he answering said, Thou shalt love the Lord thy God with all thy heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy strength, and with all thy mind; and thy neighbour as t
632, when they heard that Jesus was coming to Jerusalem, 
Took branches of palm trees, and went forth to meet him, and cried, Hosanna: Blessed is the King of Israel that cometh in the name of the Lord. 
And Jesus, when he had found a young ass, sat thereon; as it is written, 
Fear not, daughter of Sion: behold, thy King cometh, sitting on an ass's colt. 
These things understood not his disciples at the first: but when Jesus was glorified, then remembered they that these things were written of him, and that they had done these things unto him. 
The people therefore that was with him when he called Lazarus out of his grave, and ra
603,therefore from henceforth thou shalt have wars. 
Then Asa was wroth with the seer, and put him in a prison house; for he was in a rage with him because of this thing. And Asa oppressed some of the people the same time. 
And, behold, the acts of Asa, first and last, lo, they are written in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel. 
And Asa in the thirty and ninth year of his reign was diseased in his feet, until his disease was exceeding great: yet in his disease he sought not to the LORD, but to the physicians. 
And Asa slept with his fathers, and died in the one and fortieth year of his reign. 
557,I am full of heaviness: and I looked for some to take pity, but there was none; and for comforters, but I found none. 
They gave me also gall for my meat; and in my thirst they gave me vinegar to drink. 
Let their table become a snare before them: and that which should have been for their welfare, let it become a trap. 
Let their eyes be darkened, that they see not; and make their loins continually to shake. 
Pour out thine indignation upon them, and let thy wrathful anger take hold of them. 
Let their habitation be desolate; and let none dwell in the
599, bracelets upon their hands, and beautiful crowns upon their heads. 
Then said I unto her that was old in adulteries, Will they now commit whoredoms with her, and she with them? 
Yet they went in unto her, as they go in unto a woman that playeth the harlot: so went they in unto Aholah and unto Aholibah, the lewd women. 
And the righteous men, they shall judge them after the manner of adulteresses, and after the manner of women that shed blood; because they are adulteresses, and blood is in their hands. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; I will bring up a company upon them, and will give them to be
679,
For the hope which is laid up for you in heaven, whereof ye heard before in the word of the truth of the gospel; 
Which is come unto you, as it is in all the world; and bringeth forth fruit, as it doth also in you, since the day ye heard of it, and knew the grace of God in truth: 
As ye also learned of Epaphras our dear fellowservant, who is for you a faithful minister of Christ; 
Who also declared unto us your love in the Spirit. 
For this cause we also, since the day we heard it, do not cease to pray for you, and to desire that ye might be filled with the knowledge of his will in all wisdom and spiritual understanding; 
That ye might walk worthy of the Lord unto all p
715,en of all that have been before them: they also that come after shall not rejoice in him. Surely this also is vanity and vexation of spirit. 
Keep thy foot when thou goest to the house of God, and be more ready to hear, than to give the sacrifice of fools: for they consider not that they do evil. 
Be not rash with thy mouth, and let not thine heart be hasty to utter any thing before God: for God is in heaven, and thou upon earth: therefore let thy words be few. 
For a dream cometh through the multitude of business; and a fool's voice is known by multitude of words. 
When thou vowest a vow unto God, defer not to pay it; for he hath no pleasure in fools: pay that which thou hast vowed. 
Better is it that tho
490,e babe leaped in her womb; and Elisabeth was filled with the Holy Ghost: 
And she spake out with a loud voice, and said, Blessed art thou among women, and blessed is the fruit of thy womb. 
And whence is this to me, that the mother of my Lord should come to me? 
For, lo, as soon as the voice of thy salutation sounded in mine ears, the babe leaped in my womb for joy. 
And blessed is she that believed: for there shall be a performance of those things which were told her from the Lord. 
A
650,ame the Spirit of the LORD in the midst of the congregation; 
And he said, Hearken ye, all Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem, and thou king Jehoshaphat, Thus saith the LORD unto you, Be not afraid nor dismayed by reason of this great multitude; for the battle is not yours, but God's. 
To morrow go ye down against them: behold, they come up by the cliff of Ziz; and ye shall find them at the end of the brook, before the wilderness of Jeruel. 
Ye shall not need to fight in this battle: set yourselves, stand ye still, and see the salvation of the LORD with you, O Judah and Jerusalem: fear not, nor be dismayed; to morrow go out against them: 
718,the Chaldeans, that they might put us to death, and carry us away captives into Babylon. 
So Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, and all the people, obeyed not the voice of the LORD, to dwell in the land of Judah. 
But Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, took all the remnant of Judah, that were returned from all nations, whither they had been driven, to dwell in the land of Judah; 
Even men, and women, and children, and the king's daughters, and every person that Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had left with Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan, and Jeremiah the prophet, and Baruch the son of Neriah. 
So they came into the land of Egypt: for 
512,el. 
So all the men of Israel were gathered against the city, knit together as one man. 
And the tribes of Israel sent men through all the tribe of Benjamin, saying, What wickedness is this that is done among you? 
Now therefore deliver us the men, the children of Belial, which are in Gibeah, that we may put them to death, and put away evil from Israel. But the children of Benjamin would not hearken to the voice of their brethren the children of Israel. 
But the children of Benjamin gathered themselves toge
717,of Israel, saying, The fathers have eaten sour grapes, and the children's teeth are set on edge? 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, ye shall not have occasion any more to use this proverb in Israel. 
Behold, all souls are mine; as the soul of the father, so also the soul of the son is mine: the soul that sinneth, it shall die. 
But if a man be just, and do that which is lawful and right, 
And hath not eaten upon the mountains, neither hath lifted up his eyes to the idols of the house of Israel, neither hath defiled his neighbour's wife, neither hath come near to a menstruous woman, 
And hath not oppressed any, but hath restored to the debtor his pledge, hath spoiled none by violence, hath given his bread to the
528,iddo, and all Bethshean, which is by Zartanah beneath Jezreel, from Bethshean to Abelmeholah, even unto the place that is beyond Jokneam: 
The son of Geber, in Ramothgilead; to him pertained the towns of Jair the son of Manasseh, which are in Gilead; to him also pertained the region of Argob, which is in Bashan, threescore great cities with walls and brasen bars: 
Ahinadab the son of Iddo had Mahanaim: 
Ahimaaz was in Naphtali; he also took Basmath the daughter of Solomon to wife: 
Baanah the son of Hushai was in Asher and
608,salem. 
And it came to pass in an eveningtide, that David arose from off his bed, and walked upon the roof of the king's house: and from the roof he saw a woman washing herself; and the woman was very beautiful to look upon. 
And David sent and enquired after the woman. And one said, Is not this Bathsheba, the daughter of Eliam, the wife of Uriah the Hittite? 
And David sent messengers, and took her; and she came in unto him, and he lay with her; for she was purified from her uncleanness: and she returned unto her house. 
And the woman conceived, and sent and told David, and said, I am with child. 
An
597,ich were spoken by Paul, contradicting and blaspheming. 
Then Paul and Barnabas waxed bold, and said, It was necessary that the word of God should first have been spoken to you: but seeing ye put it from you, and judge yourselves unworthy of everlasting life, lo, we turn to the Gentiles. 
For so hath the Lord commanded us, saying, I have set thee to be a light of the Gentiles, that thou shouldest be for salvation unto the ends of the earth. 
And when the Gentiles heard this, they were glad, and glorified the word of the Lord: and as many as were ordained to eternal life believed. 
And the w
508, that work wickedness are set up; yea, they that tempt God are even delivered. 
Then they that feared the LORD spake often one to another: and the LORD hearkened, and heard it, and a book of remembrance was written before him for them that feared the LORD, and that thought upon his name. 
And they shall be mine, saith the LORD of hosts, in that day when I make up my jewels; and I will spare them, as a man spareth his own son that serveth him. 
Then shall ye return, and discern between the righteous and 
486,harisees were gathered together, Jesus asked them, 
Saying, What think ye of Christ? whose son is he? They say unto him, The son of David. 
He saith unto them, How then doth David in spirit call him Lord, saying, 
The LORD said unto my Lord, Sit thou on my right hand, till I make thine enemies thy footstool? 
If David then call him Lord, how is he his son? 
And no man was able to answer him a word, neither durst any man from that day forth ask him any more questions. 
Then spake Je
690,their God only. 
Now the rest of the acts of Manasseh, and his prayer unto his God, and the words of the seers that spake to him in the name of the LORD God of Israel, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel. 
His prayer also, and how God was intreated of him, and all his sins, and his trespass, and the places wherein he built high places, and set up groves and graven images, before he was humbled: behold, they are written among the sayings of the seers. 
So Manasseh slept with his fathers, and they buried him in his own house: and Amon his son reigned in his stead. 
Amon was two and twenty years old when he began to reign, and reigned two years in Jerusalem. 
B
672,round about, every man with his weapons in his hand; and whosoever else cometh into the house, he shall be put to death: but be ye with the king when he cometh in, and when he goeth out. 
So the Levites and all Judah did according to all things that Jehoiada the priest had commanded, and took every man his men that were to come in on the sabbath, with them that were to go out on the sabbath: for Jehoiada the priest dismissed not the courses. 
Moreover Jehoiada the priest delivered to the captains of hundreds spears, and bucklers, and shields, that had been king David's, which were in the house of God. 
And he set all the people, every man having his weapon in his 
695,he wise men of the nations, and in all their kingdoms, there is none like unto thee. 
But they are altogether brutish and foolish: the stock is a doctrine of vanities. 
Silver spread into plates is brought from Tarshish, and gold from Uphaz, the work of the workman, and of the hands of the founder: blue and purple is their clothing: they are all the work of cunning men. 
But the LORD is the true God, he is the living God, and an everlasting king: at his wrath the earth shall tremble, and the nations shall not be able to abide his indignation. 
Thus shall ye say unto them, The gods that have not made the heavens and the earth, even they shall perish from the earth, and from under these h
599, and lay the wood in order upon the fire: 
And the priests, Aaron's sons, shall lay the parts, the head, and the fat, in order upon the wood that is on the fire which is upon the altar: 
But his inwards and his legs shall he wash in water: and the priest shall burn all on the altar, to be a burnt sacrifice, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And if his offering be of the flocks, namely, of the sheep, or of the goats, for a burnt sacrifice; he shall bring it a male without blemish. 
And he shall kill it on the side of the altar northward before the LORD: and the priest
529, Baptist: notwithstanding he that is least in the kingdom of heaven is greater than he. 
And from the days of John the Baptist until now the kingdom of heaven suffereth violence, and the violent take it by force. 
For all the prophets and the law prophesied until John. 
And if ye will receive it, this is Elias, which was for to come. 
He that hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
But whereunto shall I liken this generation? It is like unto children sitting in the markets, and calling unto their fellows, 
And saying, We have pip
708,heard that they should eat bread there. 
And when Joseph came home, they brought him the present which was in their hand into the house, and bowed themselves to him to the earth. 
And he asked them of their welfare, and said, Is your father well, the old man of whom ye spake? Is he yet alive? 
And they answered, Thy servant our father is in good health, he is yet alive. And they bowed down their heads, and made obeisance. 
And he lifted up his eyes, and saw his brother Benjamin, his mother's son, and said, Is this your younger brother, of whom ye spake unto me? And he said, God be gracious unto thee, my son. 
And Joseph made haste; for his bowels did yearn upon his brother: and he sought where to we
701,goeth in to make an atonement in the holy place, until he come out, and have made an atonement for himself, and for his household, and for all the congregation of Israel. 
And he shall go out unto the altar that is before the LORD, and make an atonement for it; and shall take of the blood of the bullock, and of the blood of the goat, and put it upon the horns of the altar round about. 
And he shall sprinkle of the blood upon it with his finger seven times, and cleanse it, and hallow it from the uncleanness of the children of Israel. 
And when he hath made an end of reconciling the holy place, and the tabernacle of the congregation, and the altar, he shall bring the live goat: 
And Aaron shall
537,ck to rest at noon: for why should I be as one that turneth aside by the flocks of thy companions? 
If thou know not, O thou fairest among women, go thy way forth by the footsteps of the flock, and feed thy kids beside the shepherds' tents. 
I have compared thee, O my love, to a company of horses in Pharaoh's chariots. 
Thy cheeks are comely with rows of jewels, thy neck with chains of gold. 
We will make thee borders of gold with studs of silver. 
While the king sitteth at his table, my spikenard sendeth forth the smell thereof. 

626,aid, Hearken, all ye people. 
So the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat the king of Judah went up to Ramothgilead. 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, I will disguise myself, and I will go to the battle; but put thou on thy robes. So the king of Israel disguised himself; and they went to the battle. 
Now the king of Syria had commanded the captains of the chariots that were with him, saying, Fight ye not with small or great, save only with the king of Israel. 
And it came to pass, when the captains of the chariots saw Jehoshaphat, that they said, It is the king of Israel. Therefore they compassed about him to fi
567,nto Aholah and unto Aholibah, the lewd women. 
And the righteous men, they shall judge them after the manner of adulteresses, and after the manner of women that shed blood; because they are adulteresses, and blood is in their hands. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; I will bring up a company upon them, and will give them to be removed and spoiled. 
And the company shall stone them with stones, and dispatch them with their swords; they shall slay their sons and their daughters, and burn up their houses with fire. 
Thus will I cause lewdness to cease out of the land,
708, morning. 
And thou shalt prepare a meat offering for it every morning, the sixth part of an ephah, and the third part of an hin of oil, to temper with the fine flour; a meat offering continually by a perpetual ordinance unto the LORD. 
Thus shall they prepare the lamb, and the meat offering, and the oil, every morning for a continual burnt offering. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; If the prince give a gift unto any of his sons, the inheritance thereof shall be his sons'; it shall be their possession by inheritance. 
But if he give a gift of his inheritance to one of his servants, then it shall be his to the year of liberty; after it shall return to the prince: but his inheritance shall be his sons' for t
645, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will give this city into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall burn it with fire: 
And thou shalt not escape out of his hand, but shalt surely be taken, and delivered into his hand; and thine eyes shall behold the eyes of the king of Babylon, and he shall speak with thee mouth to mouth, and thou shalt go to Babylon. 
Yet hear the word of the LORD, O Zedekiah king of Judah; Thus saith the LORD of thee, Thou shalt not die by the sword: 
But thou shalt die in peace: and with the burnings of thy fathers, the former kings which were before thee, so shall they burn odours for thee; and they will lament t
597,ged Israel seven years. 
Then died Ibzan, and was buried at Bethlehem. 
And after him Elon, a Zebulonite, judged Israel; and he judged Israel ten years. 
And Elon the Zebulonite died, and was buried in Aijalon in the country of Zebulun. 
And after him Abdon the son of Hillel, a Pirathonite, judged Israel. 
And he had forty sons and thirty nephews, that rode on threescore and ten ass colts: and he judged Israel eight years. 
And Abdon the son of Hillel the Pirathonite died, and was buried in Pirathon in the land of Ephraim, in the mount of the Amalekites. 
And the children of Israel did evil
601, from mount Sinai with the two tables of testimony in Moses' hand, when he came down from the mount, that Moses wist not that the skin of his face shone while he talked with him. 
And when Aaron and all the children of Israel saw Moses, behold, the skin of his face shone; and they were afraid to come nigh him. 
And Moses called unto them; and Aaron and all the rulers of the congregation returned unto him: and Moses talked with them. 
And afterward all the children of Israel came nigh: and he gave them in commandment all that the LORD had spoken with him in mount Sinai. 
And till Moses had done 
618,possess it; the owl also and the raven shall dwell in it: and he shall stretch out upon it the line of confusion, and the stones of emptiness. 
They shall call the nobles thereof to the kingdom, but none shall be there, and all her princes shall be nothing. 
And thorns shall come up in her palaces, nettles and brambles in the fortresses thereof: and it shall be an habitation of dragons, and a court for owls. 
The wild beasts of the desert shall also meet with the wild beasts of the island, and the satyr shall cry to his fellow; the screech owl also shall rest there, and find for herself a place of rest. 
There 
550,ye had compassion of me in my bonds, and took joyfully the spoiling of your goods, knowing in yourselves that ye have in heaven a better and an enduring substance. 
Cast not away therefore your confidence, which hath great recompence of reward. 
For ye have need of patience, that, after ye have done the will of God, ye might receive the promise. 
For yet a little while, and he that shall come will come, and will not tarry. 
Now the just shall live by faith: but if any man draw back, my soul shall have no pleasure in him. 
But we are not of them
481,ent Solomon to Eziongeber, and to Eloth, at the sea side in the land of Edom. 
And Huram sent him by the hands of his servants ships, and servants that had knowledge of the sea; and they went with the servants of Solomon to Ophir, and took thence four hundred and fifty talents of gold, and brought them to king Solomon. 
And when the queen of Sheba heard of the fame of Solomon, she came to prove Solomon with hard questions at Jerusalem, with a very great company, and camels tha
491, until the pursuers be returned: and afterward may ye go your way. 
And the men said unto her, We will be blameless of this thine oath which thou hast made us swear. 
Behold, when we come into the land, thou shalt bind this line of scarlet thread in the window which thou didst let us down by: and thou shalt bring thy father, and thy mother, and thy brethren, and all thy father's household, home unto thee. 
And it shall be, that whosoever shall go out of the doors of thy house into the s
557, scribe before them. 
And at the fountain gate, which was over against them, they went up by the stairs of the city of David, at the going up of the wall, above the house of David, even unto the water gate eastward. 
And the other company of them that gave thanks went over against them, and I after them, and the half of the people upon the wall, from beyond the tower of the furnaces even unto the broad wall; 
And from above the gate of Ephraim, and above the old gate, and above the fish gate, and the tower of Hananeel, and the tower of Meah, even unto
500, an inheritance. 
Hebron therefore became the inheritance of Caleb the son of Jephunneh the Kenezite unto this day, because that he wholly followed the LORD God of Israel. 
And the name of Hebron before was Kirjatharba; which Arba was a great man among the Anakims. And the land had rest from war. 
This then was the lot of the tribe of the children of Judah by their families; even to the border of Edom the wilderness of Zin southward was the uttermost part of the south coast. 
And their south bor
709, are yet no gods? but my people have changed their glory for that which doth not profit. 
Be astonished, O ye heavens, at this, and be horribly afraid, be ye very desolate, saith the LORD. 
For my people have committed two evils; they have forsaken me the fountain of living waters, and hewed them out cisterns, broken cisterns, that can hold no water. 
Is Israel a servant? is he a homeborn slave? why is he spoiled? 
The young lions roared upon him, and yelled, and they made his land waste: his cities are burned without inhabitant. 
Also the children of Noph and Tahapanes have broken the crown of thy head. 
Hast thou not procured this unto thyself, in that thou hast forsaken the LORD thy God, when he l
523,onfidence of all the ends of the earth, and of them that are afar off upon the sea: 
Which by his strength setteth fast the mountains; being girded with power: 
Which stilleth the noise of the seas, the noise of their waves, and the tumult of the people. 
They also that dwell in the uttermost parts are afraid at thy tokens: thou makest the outgoings of the morning and evening to rejoice. 
Thou visitest the earth, and waterest it: thou greatly enrichest it with the river of God, which is full of water: thou preparest t
516, LORD, as did David his father. 
And he took away the sodomites out of the land, and removed all the idols that his fathers had made. 
And also Maachah his mother, even her he removed from being queen, because she had made an idol in a grove; and Asa destroyed her idol, and burnt it by the brook Kidron. 
But the high places were not removed: nevertheless Asa's heart was perfect with the LORD all his days. 
And he brought in the things which his father had dedicated, and the things which himself had dedicated, i
538,ry and enemy is this wicked Haman. Then Haman was afraid before the king and the queen. 
And the king arising from the banquet of wine in his wrath went into the palace garden: and Haman stood up to make request for his life to Esther the queen; for he saw that there was evil determined against him by the king. 
Then the king returned out of the palace garden into the place of the banquet of wine; and Haman was fallen upon the bed whereon Esther was. Then said the king, Will he force the queen also before me in the house? As the wor
542,se, and on thy gates. 
And it shall be, when the LORD thy God shall have brought thee into the land which he sware unto thy fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, to give thee great and goodly cities, which thou buildedst not, 
And houses full of all good things, which thou filledst not, and wells digged, which thou diggedst not, vineyards and olive trees, which thou plantedst not; when thou shalt have eaten and be full; 
Then beware lest thou forget the LORD, which brought thee forth out of the land of Egypt, from the house of bo
548, the blood: neither shall ye use enchantment, nor observe times. 
Ye shall not round the corners of your heads, neither shalt thou mar the corners of thy beard. 
Ye shall not make any cuttings in your flesh for the dead, nor print any marks upon you: I am the LORD. 
Do not prostitute thy daughter, to cause her to be a whore; lest the land fall to whoredom, and the land become full of wickedness. 
Ye shall keep my sabbaths, and reverence my sanctuary: I am the LORD. 
Regard not them that have familiar spirits, neither seek after wizards, to be
617,ve many. 
And when ye shall hear of wars and rumours of wars, be ye not troubled: for such things must needs be; but the end shall not be yet. 
For nation shall rise against nation, and kingdom against kingdom: and there shall be earthquakes in divers places, and there shall be famines and troubles: these are the beginnings of sorrows. 
But take heed to yourselves: for they shall deliver you up to councils; and in the synagogues ye shall be beaten: and ye shall be brought before rulers and kings for my sake, for a testimony against them. 
And the gospel must first be published among all nations. 
But when they
631,ht in mine heart to give myself unto wine, yet acquainting mine heart with wisdom; and to lay hold on folly, till I might see what was that good for the sons of men, which they should do under the heaven all the days of their life. 
I made me great works; I builded me houses; I planted me vineyards: 
I made me gardens and orchards, and I planted trees in them of all kind of fruits: 
I made me pools of water, to water therewith the wood that bringeth forth trees: 
I got me servants and maidens, and had servants born in my house; also I had great possessions of great and small cattle above all that were in Jerusalem before me
514,ve possessed it but a little while: our adversaries have trodden down thy sanctuary. 
We are thine: thou never barest rule over them; they were not called by thy name. 
Oh that thou wouldest rend the heavens, that thou wouldest come down, that the mountains might flow down at thy presence, 
As when the melting fire burneth, the fire causeth the waters to boil, to make thy name known to thine adversaries, that the nations may tremble at thy presence! 
When thou didst terrible things which we looked not for, th
639,e fountains, and the brook that ran through the midst of the land, saying, Why should the kings of Assyria come, and find much water? 
Also he strengthened himself, and built up all the wall that was broken, and raised it up to the towers, and another wall without, and repaired Millo in the city of David, and made darts and shields in abundance. 
And he set captains of war over the people, and gathered them together to him in the street of the gate of the city, and spake comfortably to them, saying, 
Be strong and courageous, be not afraid nor dismayed for the king of Assyria, nor for all the multitude that is with him: for there b
623,, that they may serve other gods: so will the anger of the LORD be kindled against you, and destroy thee suddenly. 
But thus shall ye deal with them; ye shall destroy their altars, and break down their images, and cut down their groves, and burn their graven images with fire. 
For thou art an holy people unto the LORD thy God: the LORD thy God hath chosen thee to be a special people unto himself, above all people that are upon the face of the earth. 
The LORD did not set his love upon you, nor choose you, because ye were more in number than any people; for ye were the fewest of all people: 
But because the LORD love
617,or he hath delivered me out of all trouble: and mine eye hath seen his desire upon mine enemies. 
Give ear to my prayer, O God; and hide not thyself from my supplication. 
Attend unto me, and hear me: I mourn in my complaint, and make a noise; 
Because of the voice of the enemy, because of the oppression of the wicked: for they cast iniquity upon me, and in wrath they hate me. 
My heart is sore pained within me: and the terrors of death are fallen upon me. 
Fearfulness and trembling are come upon me, and horror hath overwhelmed me. 
And I said, Oh that I had wings like a dove! for then would I fly away, and be
716,herds slumber, O king of Assyria: thy nobles shall dwell in the dust: thy people is scattered upon the mountains, and no man gathereth them. 
There is no healing of thy bruise; thy wound is grievous: all that hear the bruit of thee shall clap the hands over thee: for upon whom hath not thy wickedness passed continually? 
The burden which Habakkuk the prophet did see. 
O LORD, how long shall I cry, and thou wilt not hear! even cry out unto thee of violence, and thou wilt not save! 
Why dost thou shew me iniquity, and cause me to behold grievance? for spoiling and violence are before me: and there are that raise up strife and contention. 
Therefore the law is slacked, and judgment doth never go forth: for the
584, me, then shall ye give me thirty sheets and thirty change of garments. And they said unto him, Put forth thy riddle, that we may hear it. 
And he said unto them, Out of the eater came forth meat, and out of the strong came forth sweetness. And they could not in three days expound the riddle. 
And it came to pass on the seventh day, that they said unto Samson's wife, Entice thy husband, that he may declare unto us the riddle, lest we burn thee and thy father's house with fire: have ye called us to take that we have? is it not so? 
And Samson's wife wept before him, and said, Th
615,the pastures, and an hundred sheep, beside harts, and roebucks, and fallowdeer, and fatted fowl. 
For he had dominion over all the region on this side the river, from Tiphsah even to Azzah, over all the kings on this side the river: and he had peace on all sides round about him. 
And Judah and Israel dwelt safely, every man under his vine and under his fig tree, from Dan even to Beersheba, all the days of Solomon. 
And Solomon had forty thousand stalls of horses for his chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen. 
And those officers provided victual for king Solomon, and for all that came unto king Solomon's tab
550,, and of silver, of brass, of iron, of wood, and of stone. 
In the same hour came forth fingers of a man's hand, and wrote over against the candlestick upon the plaister of the wall of the king's palace: and the king saw the part of the hand that wrote. 
Then the king's countenance was changed, and his thoughts troubled him, so that the joints of his loins were loosed, and his knees smote one against another. 
The king cried aloud to bring in the astrologers, the Chaldeans, and the soothsayers. And the king spake, and said to the wise men of Ba
596,g an hundred and ten years old: and they embalmed him, and he was put in a coffin in Egypt. 
Now these are the names of the children of Israel, which came into Egypt; every man and his household came with Jacob. 
Reuben, Simeon, Levi, and Judah, 
Issachar, Zebulun, and Benjamin, 
Dan, and Naphtali, Gad, and Asher. 
And all the souls that came out of the loins of Jacob were seventy souls: for Joseph was in Egypt already. 
And Joseph died, and all his brethren, and all that generation. 
And the children of Israel were fruitful, and increased abundantly, and multiplied, and waxed exceeding mi
556,m the LORD, when king Zedekiah sent unto him Pashur the son of Melchiah, and Zephaniah the son of Maaseiah the priest, saying, 
Enquire, I pray thee, of the LORD for us; for Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon maketh war against us; if so be that the LORD will deal with us according to all his wondrous works, that he may go up from us. 
Then said Jeremiah unto them, Thus shall ye say to Zedekiah: 
Thus saith the LORD God of Israel; Behold, I will turn back the weapons of war that are in your hands, wherewith ye fight against the king of Babylon, and again
695, me, and the ships of Tarshish first, to bring thy sons from far, their silver and their gold with them, unto the name of the LORD thy God, and to the Holy One of Israel, because he hath glorified thee. 
And the sons of strangers shall build up thy walls, and their kings shall minister unto thee: for in my wrath I smote thee, but in my favour have I had mercy on thee. 
Therefore thy gates shall be open continually; they shall not be shut day nor night; that men may bring unto thee the forces of the Gentiles, and that their kings may be brought. 
For the nation and kingdom that will not serve thee shall perish; yea, those nations shall be utterly wasted. 
The glory of Lebanon shall come 
686,. 
The rich man shall lie down, but he shall not be gathered: he openeth his eyes, and he is not. 
Terrors take hold on him as waters, a tempest stealeth him away in the night. 
The east wind carrieth him away, and he departeth: and as a storm hurleth him out of his place. 
For God shall cast upon him, and not spare: he would fain flee out of his hand. 
Men shall clap their hands at him, and shall hiss him out of his place. 
Surely there is a vein for the silver, and a place for gold where they fine it. 
Iron is taken out of the earth, and brass is molten out of the stone. 
He setteth an end to darkness, and searcheth out all perfection: the stones of darkness, and the shadow o
503,. 
After these things Jesus walked in Galilee: for he would not walk in Jewry, because the Jews sought to kill him. 
Now the Jew's feast of tabernacles was at hand. 
His brethren therefore said unto him, Depart hence, and go into Judaea, that thy disciples also may see the works that thou doest. 
For there is no man that doeth any thing in secret, and he himself seeketh to be known openly. If thou do these things, shew thyself to the world. 
For neither did his brethren believe in him. 
Then Jesus 
551, fruits, and a bottle of wine. 
And the king said unto Ziba, What meanest thou by these? And Ziba said, The asses be for the king's household to ride on; and the bread and summer fruit for the young men to eat; and the wine, that such as be faint in the wilderness may drink. 
And the king said, And where is thy master's son? And Ziba said unto the king, Behold, he abideth at Jerusalem: for he said, To day shall the house of Israel restore me the kingdom of my father. 
Then said the king to Ziba, Behold, thine are all that pertained unto Mephibos
619,whom the LORD did choose. And the king said, I will give them. 
But the king spared Mephibosheth, the son of Jonathan the son of Saul, because of the LORD's oath that was between them, between David and Jonathan the son of Saul. 
But the king took the two sons of Rizpah the daughter of Aiah, whom she bare unto Saul, Armoni and Mephibosheth; and the five sons of Michal the daughter of Saul, whom she brought up for Adriel the son of Barzillai the Meholathite: 
And he delivered them into the hands of the Gibeonites, and they hanged them in the hill before the LORD: and they fell all seven together, and were put to 
654,is money. 
If men strive, and hurt a woman with child, so that her fruit depart from her, and yet no mischief follow: he shall be surely punished, according as the woman's husband will lay upon him; and he shall pay as the judges determine. 
And if any mischief follow, then thou shalt give life for life, 
Eye for eye, tooth for tooth, hand for hand, foot for foot, 
Burning for burning, wound for wound, stripe for stripe. 
And if a man smite the eye of his servant, or the eye of his maid, that it perish; he shall let him go free for his eye's sake. 
And if he smite out his manservant's tooth, or his maidservant's tooth; he shall let him go free fo
718,the devil, taking him up into an high mountain, shewed unto him all the kingdoms of the world in a moment of time. 
And the devil said unto him, All this power will I give thee, and the glory of them: for that is delivered unto me; and to whomsoever I will I give it. 
If thou therefore wilt worship me, all shall be thine. 
And Jesus answered and said unto him, Get thee behind me, Satan: for it is written, Thou shalt worship the Lord thy God, and him only shalt thou serve. 
And he brought him to Jerusalem, and set him on a pinnacle of the temple, and said unto him, If thou be the Son of God, cast thyself down from hence: 
For it is written, He shall give his angels charge over thee, to keep thee: 
And in their
570, and he hath charged me to build him an house at Jerusalem, which is in Judah. 
Who is there among you of all his people? his God be with him, and let him go up to Jerusalem, which is in Judah, and build the house of the LORD God of Israel, (he is the God,) which is in Jerusalem. 
And whosoever remaineth in any place where he sojourneth, let the men of his place help him with silver, and with gold, and with goods, and with beasts, beside the freewill offering for the house of God that is in Jerusalem. 
Then rose up the chief of the fathers of Judah and Benjamin, a
659,e found no cause of death in him: I will therefore chastise him, and let him go. 
And they were instant with loud voices, requiring that he might be crucified. And the voices of them and of the chief priests prevailed. 
And Pilate gave sentence that it should be as they required. 
And he released unto them him that for sedition and murder was cast into prison, whom they had desired; but he delivered Jesus to their will. 
And as they led him away, they laid hold upon one Simon, a Cyrenian, coming out of the country, and on him they laid the cross, that he might bear it after Jesus. 
And there followed him a great company of people, and of women, which 
509,thlehem: twelve cities with their villages. 
This is the inheritance of the children of Zebulun according to their families, these cities with their villages. 
And the fourth lot came out to Issachar, for the children of Issachar according to their families. 
And their border was toward Jezreel, and Chesulloth, and Shunem, 
And Haphraim, and Shihon, and Anaharath, 
And Rabbith, and Kishion, and Abez, 
And Remeth, and Engannim, and Enhaddah, and Bethpazzez; 
And the coast reacheth to Tabor, and Shahazimah
599,cording to Christ Jesus: 
That ye may with one mind and one mouth glorify God, even the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ. 
Wherefore receive ye one another, as Christ also received us to the glory of God. 
Now I say that Jesus Christ was a minister of the circumcision for the truth of God, to confirm the promises made unto the fathers: 
And that the Gentiles might glorify God for his mercy; as it is written, For this cause I will confess to thee among the Gentiles, and sing unto thy name. 
And again he saith, Rejoice, ye Gentiles, with his people. 
And again, Praise the Lord, all ye Gentiles; 
485,e children of Israel, saying, This is the thing which the LORD commanded, saying, 
Take ye from among you an offering unto the LORD: whosoever is of a willing heart, let him bring it, an offering of the LORD; gold, and silver, and brass, 
And blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine linen, and goats' hair, 
And rams' skins dyed red, and badgers' skins, and shittim wood, 
And oil for the light, and spices for anointing oil, and for the sweet incense, 
And onyx stones, and stones to 
482,not our Lord Jesus Christ, but their own belly; and by good words and fair speeches deceive the hearts of the simple. 
For your obedience is come abroad unto all men. I am glad therefore on your behalf: but yet I would have you wise unto that which is good, and simple concerning evil. 
And the God of peace shall bruise Satan under your feet shortly. The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you. Amen. 
Timotheus my workfellow, and Lucius, and Jason, and Sosipater, my kinsmen, 
489, sin offering hast thou not required. 
Then said I, Lo, I come: in the volume of the book it is written of me, 
I delight to do thy will, O my God: yea, thy law is within my heart. 
I have preached righteousness in the great congregation: lo, I have not refrained my lips, O LORD, thou knowest. 
I have not hid thy righteousness within my heart; I have declared thy faithfulness and thy salvation: I have not concealed thy lovingkindness and thy truth from the great congregation. 
Withhol
541,th your feet? 
And as for my flock, they eat that which ye have trodden with your feet; and they drink that which ye have fouled with your feet. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD unto them; Behold, I, even I, will judge between the fat cattle and between the lean cattle. 
Because ye have thrust with side and with shoulder, and pushed all the diseased with your horns, till ye have scattered them abroad; 
Therefore will I save my flock, and they shall no more be a prey; and I will judge between cattle and cattle. 
And I will set up one 
623,ptians, which did eat with him, by themselves: because the Egyptians might not eat bread with the Hebrews; for that is an abomination unto the Egyptians. 
And they sat before him, the firstborn according to his birthright, and the youngest according to his youth: and the men marvelled one at another. 
And he took and sent messes unto them from before him: but Benjamin's mess was five times so much as any of their's. And they drank, and were merry with him. 
And he commanded the steward of his house, saying, Fill the men's sacks with food, as much as they can carry, and put every man's money in his sack's mouth. 
And
572,you, Ye shall henceforth return no more that way. 
Neither shall he multiply wives to himself, that his heart turn not away: neither shall he greatly multiply to himself silver and gold. 
And it shall be, when he sitteth upon the throne of his kingdom, that he shall write him a copy of this law in a book out of that which is before the priests the Levites: 
And it shall be with him, and he shall read therein all the days of his life: that he may learn to fear the LORD his God, to keep all the words of this law and these statutes, to do them: 
That his heart be not l
537,ivide this land unto you according to the tribes of Israel. 
And it shall come to pass, that ye shall divide it by lot for an inheritance unto you, and to the strangers that sojourn among you, which shall beget children among you: and they shall be unto you as born in the country among the children of Israel; they shall have inheritance with you among the tribes of Israel. 
And it shall come to pass, that in what tribe the stranger sojourneth, there shall ye give him his inheritance, saith the Lord GOD. 
Now these are the names of 
494,LORD. 
So they laid hands on her; and when she was come to the entering of the horse gate by the king's house, they slew her there. 
And Jehoiada made a covenant between him, and between all the people, and between the king, that they should be the LORD's people. 
Then all the people went to the house of Baal, and brake it down, and brake his altars and his images in pieces, and slew Mattan the priest of Baal before the altars. 
Also Jehoiada appointed the offices of the house of the LORD 
628,was not clean, to sanctify them unto the LORD. 
For a multitude of the people, even many of Ephraim, and Manasseh, Issachar, and Zebulun, had not cleansed themselves, yet did they eat the passover otherwise than it was written. But Hezekiah prayed for them, saying, The good LORD pardon every one 
That prepareth his heart to seek God, the LORD God of his fathers, though he be not cleansed according to the purification of the sanctuary. 
And the LORD hearkened to Hezekiah, and healed the people. 
And the children of Israel that were present at Jerusalem kept the feast of unleavened bread seven days with great gladness: and
703,Let us get up early to the vineyards; let us see if the vine flourish, whether the tender grape appear, and the pomegranates bud forth: there will I give thee my loves. 
The mandrakes give a smell, and at our gates are all manner of pleasant fruits, new and old, which I have laid up for thee, O my beloved. 
O that thou wert as my brother, that sucked the breasts of my mother! when I should find thee without, I would kiss thee; yea, I should not be despised. 
I would lead thee, and bring thee into my mother's house, who would instruct me: I would cause thee to drink of spiced wine of the juice of my pomegranate. 
His left hand should be under my head, and his right hand should embrace me. 
I cha
679,David enquired of the LORD, saying, Shall I go and smite these Philistines? And the LORD said unto David, Go, and smite the Philistines, and save Keilah. 
And David's men said unto him, Behold, we be afraid here in Judah: how much more then if we come to Keilah against the armies of the Philistines? 
Then David enquired of the LORD yet again. And the LORD answered him and said, Arise, go down to Keilah; for I will deliver the Philistines into thine hand. 
So David and his men went to Keilah, and fought with the Philistines, and brought away their cattle, and smote them with a great slaughter. So David saved the inhabitants of Keilah. 
And it came to pass, when Abiathar t
511,led, The repairer of the breach, The restorer of paths to dwell in. 
If thou turn away thy foot from the sabbath, from doing thy pleasure on my holy day; and call the sabbath a delight, the holy of the LORD, honourable; and shalt honour him, not doing thine own ways, nor finding thine own pleasure, nor speaking thine own words: 
Then shalt thou delight thyself in the LORD; and I will cause thee to ride upon the high places of the earth, and feed thee with the heritage of Jacob thy father: for the mouth of 
713,on of man's heart is evil from his youth; neither will I again smite any more every thing living, as I have done. 
While the earth remaineth, seedtime and harvest, and cold and heat, and summer and winter, and day and night shall not cease. 
And God blessed Noah and his sons, and said unto them, Be fruitful, and multiply, and replenish the earth. 
And the fear of you and the dread of you shall be upon every beast of the earth, and upon every fowl of the air, upon all that moveth upon the earth, and upon all the fishes of the sea; into your hand are they delivered. 
Every moving thing that liveth shall be meat for you; even as the green herb have I given you all things. 
But flesh with the life thereof, w
499,n ears of corn after him in whose sight I shall find grace. And she said unto her, Go, my daughter. 
And she went, and came, and gleaned in the field after the reapers: and her hap was to light on a part of the field belonging unto Boaz, who was of the kindred of Elimelech. 
And, behold, Boaz came from Bethlehem, and said unto the reapers, The LORD be with you. And they answered him, The LORD bless thee. 
Then said Boaz unto his servant that was set over the reapers, Whose damsel is this? 
And 
623, of Zobah. 
So they hired thirty and two thousand chariots, and the king of Maachah and his people; who came and pitched before Medeba. And the children of Ammon gathered themselves together from their cities, and came to battle. 
And when David heard of it, he sent Joab, and all the host of the mighty men. 
And the children of Ammon came out, and put the battle in array before the gate of the city: and the kings that were come were by themselves in the field. 
Now when Joab saw that the battle was set against him before and behind, he chose out of all the choice of Israel, and put them in array against the Syrians.
621,thou mayest inherit the land wherein thou art a stranger, which God gave unto Abraham. 
And Isaac sent away Jacob: and he went to Padanaram unto Laban, son of Bethuel the Syrian, the brother of Rebekah, Jacob's and Esau's mother. 
When Esau saw that Isaac had blessed Jacob, and sent him away to Padanaram, to take him a wife from thence; and that as he blessed him he gave him a charge, saying, Thou shalt not take a wife of the daughers of Canaan; 
And that Jacob obeyed his father and his mother, and was gone to Padanaram; 
And Esau seeing that the daughters of Canaan pleased not Isaac his father; 
Then went Esau un
616,ht to do unto his people. 
And Moses turned, and went down from the mount, and the two tables of the testimony were in his hand: the tables were written on both their sides; on the one side and on the other were they written. 
And the tables were the work of God, and the writing was the writing of God, graven upon the tables. 
And when Joshua heard the noise of the people as they shouted, he said unto Moses, There is a noise of war in the camp. 
And he said, It is not the voice of them that shout for mastery, neither is it the voice of them that cry for being overcome: but the noise of them that sing do I hea
576,ildren to wrath: but bring them up in the nurture and admonition of the Lord. 
Servants, be obedient to them that are your masters according to the flesh, with fear and trembling, in singleness of your heart, as unto Christ; 
Not with eyeservice, as menpleasers; but as the servants of Christ, doing the will of God from the heart; 
With good will doing service, as to the Lord, and not to men: 
Knowing that whatsoever good thing any man doeth, the same shall he receive of the Lord, whether he be bond or free. 
And, ye masters, do the same things unto them, forbearing thre
614,o this day, rising early and protesting, saying, Obey my voice. 
Yet they obeyed not, nor inclined their ear, but walked every one in the imagination of their evil heart: therefore I will bring upon them all the words of this covenant, which I commanded them to do: but they did them not. 
And the LORD said unto me, A conspiracy is found among the men of Judah, and among the inhabitants of Jerusalem. 
They are turned back to the iniquities of their forefathers, which refused to hear my words; and they went after other gods to serve them: the house of Israel and the house of Judah have broken my covenant whic
583,on their borders. 
All these were reckoned by genealogies in the days of Jotham king of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam king of Israel. 
The sons of Reuben, and the Gadites, and half the tribe of Manasseh, of valiant men, men able to bear buckler and sword, and to shoot with bow, and skilful in war, were four and forty thousand seven hundred and threescore, that went out to the war. 
And they made war with the Hagarites, with Jetur, and Nephish, and Nodab. 
And they were helped against them, and the Hagarites were delivered into their hand, and all that were with them: for 
658,I yet pleased men, I should not be the servant of Christ. 
But I certify you, brethren, that the gospel which was preached of me is not after man. 
For I neither received it of man, neither was I taught it, but by the revelation of Jesus Christ. 
For ye have heard of my conversation in time past in the Jews' religion, how that beyond measure I persecuted the church of God, and wasted it: 
And profited in the Jews' religion above many my equals in mine own nation, being more exceedingly zealous of the traditions of my fathers. 
But when it pleased God, who separated me from my mother's womb, and called me by his grace, 
To reveal his Son in me, that I
498,s when I cried unto thee. 
O love the LORD, all ye his saints: for the LORD preserveth the faithful, and plentifully rewardeth the proud doer. 
Be of good courage, and he shall strengthen your heart, all ye that hope in the LORD. 
Blessed is he whose transgression is forgiven, whose sin is covered. 
Blessed is the man unto whom the LORD imputeth not iniquity, and in whose spirit there is no guile. 
When I kept silence, my bones waxed old through my roaring all the day long. 
For day and night 
534,n, that no one of you be puffed up for one against another. 
For who maketh thee to differ from another? and what hast thou that thou didst not receive? now if thou didst receive it, why dost thou glory, as if thou hadst not received it? 
Now ye are full, now ye are rich, ye have reigned as kings without us: and I would to God ye did reign, that we also might reign with you. 
For I think that God hath set forth us the apostles last, as it were appointed to death: for we are made a spectacle unto the world, and to angels, and to 
587,em; Elam, and Asshur, and Arphaxad, and Lud, and Aram, and Uz, and Hul, and Gether, and Meshech. 
And Arphaxad begat Shelah, and Shelah begat Eber. 
And unto Eber were born two sons: the name of the one was Peleg; because in his days the earth was divided: and his brother's name was Joktan. 
And Joktan begat Almodad, and Sheleph, and Hazarmaveth, and Jerah, 
Hadoram also, and Uzal, and Diklah, 
And Ebal, and Abimael, and Sheba, 
And Ophir, and Havilah, and Jobab. All these were the sons of Joktan. 
Shem, Arphaxad, Shelah, 
Eber, Peleg, Reu, 
Serug, Nahor, Terah, 
Abram; the same i
651,t as it was by one that sinned, so is the gift: for the judgment was by one to condemnation, but the free gift is of many offences unto justification. 
For if by one man's offence death reigned by one; much more they which receive abundance of grace and of the gift of righteousness shall reign in life by one, Jesus Christ.) 
Therefore as by the offence of one judgment came upon all men to condemnation; even so by the righteousness of one the free gift came upon all men unto justification of life. 
For as by one man's disobedience many were made sinners, so by the obedience of one shall many be made righteous. 
Moreover the law entered, that th
509,m the LORD your God. 
And Moses spake to the children of Israel, that they should bring forth him that had cursed out of the camp, and stone him with stones. And the children of Israel did as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses in mount Sinai, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, When ye come into the land which I give you, then shall the land keep a sabbath unto the LORD. 
Six years thou shalt sow thy field, and six years thou shalt prune thy vineyard, and 
534,ng with us. 
And the next day we touched at Sidon. And Julius courteously entreated Paul, and gave him liberty to go unto his friends to refresh himself. 
And when we had launched from thence, we sailed under Cyprus, because the winds were contrary. 
And when we had sailed over the sea of Cilicia and Pamphylia, we came to Myra, a city of Lycia. 
And there the centurion found a ship of Alexandria sailing into Italy; and he put us therein. 
And when we had sailed slowly many days, and scarce were come over against Cnidus, the wind
514,t we may smite Gibeon: for it hath made peace with Joshua and with the children of Israel. 
Therefore the five kings of the Amorites, the king of Jerusalem, the king of Hebron, the king of Jarmuth, the king of Lachish, the king of Eglon, gathered themselves together, and went up, they and all their hosts, and encamped before Gibeon, and made war against it. 
And the men of Gibeon sent unto Joshua to the camp to Gilgal, saying, Slack not thy hand from thy servants; come up to us quickly, and save us, and help 
623,tilly with his servants. 
He sent Moses his servant; and Aaron whom he had chosen. 
They shewed his signs among them, and wonders in the land of Ham. 
He sent darkness, and made it dark; and they rebelled not against his word. 
He turned their waters into blood, and slew their fish. 
Their land brought forth frogs in abundance, in the chambers of their kings. 
He spake, and there came divers sorts of flies, and lice in all their coasts. 
He gave them hail for rain, and flaming fire in their land. 
He smote their vines also and their fig trees; and brake the trees of their coasts. 
He spake, and the locusts came, and
533,nd his bones that were not seen stick out. 
Yea, his soul draweth near unto the grave, and his life to the destroyers. 
If there be a messenger with him, an interpreter, one among a thousand, to shew unto man his uprightness: 
Then he is gracious unto him, and saith, Deliver him from going down to the pit: I have found a ransom. 
His flesh shall be fresher than a child's: he shall return to the days of his youth: 
He shall pray unto God, and he will be favourable unto him: and he shall see his face with joy: for he will render 
656,strangers; 
Which have borne witness of thy charity before the church: whom if thou bring forward on their journey after a godly sort, thou shalt do well: 
Because that for his name's sake they went forth, taking nothing of the Gentiles. 
We therefore ought to receive such, that we might be fellowhelpers to the truth. 
I wrote unto the church: but Diotrephes, who loveth to have the preeminence among them, receiveth us not. 
Wherefore, if I come, I will remember his deeds which he doeth, prating against us with malicious words: and not content therewith, neither doth he himself receive the brethren, and forbiddeth them that would, and casteth them o
546,he seven angels which had the seven trumpets prepared themselves to sound. 
The first angel sounded, and there followed hail and fire mingled with blood, and they were cast upon the earth: and the third part of trees was burnt up, and all green grass was burnt up. 
And the second angel sounded, and as it were a great mountain burning with fire was cast into the sea: and the third part of the sea became blood; 
And the third part of the creatures which were in the sea, and had life, died; and the third part of the ships were destroyed. 
And 
577,evil thoughts, murders, adulteries, fornications, thefts, false witness, blasphemies: 
These are the things which defile a man: but to eat with unwashen hands defileth not a man. 
Then Jesus went thence, and departed into the coasts of Tyre and Sidon. 
And, behold, a woman of Canaan came out of the same coasts, and cried unto him, saying, Have mercy on me, O Lord, thou son of David; my daughter is grievously vexed with a devil. 
But he answered her not a word. And his disciples came and besought him, saying, Send her away; for she crieth after us. 
But he answered and sa
569,eighed the hair of his head at two hundred shekels after the king's weight. 
And unto Absalom there were born three sons, and one daughter, whose name was Tamar: she was a woman of a fair countenance. 
So Absalom dwelt two full years in Jerusalem, and saw not the king's face. 
Therefore Absalom sent for Joab, to have sent him to the king; but he would not come to him: and when he sent again the second time, he would not come. 
Therefore he said unto his servants, See, Joab's field is near mine, and he hath barley there; go and set it on fire. And Absalom's servan
656, of their hands. 
They shall not labour in vain, nor bring forth for trouble; for they are the seed of the blessed of the LORD, and their offspring with them. 
And it shall come to pass, that before they call, I will answer; and while they are yet speaking, I will hear. 
The wolf and the lamb shall feed together, and the lion shall eat straw like the bullock: and dust shall be the serpent's meat. They shall not hurt nor destroy in all my holy mountain, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD, The heaven is my throne, and the earth is my footstool: where is the house that ye build unto me? and where is the place of my rest? 
For all those things hath m
620,for the house of the LORD of bright brass. 
In the plain of Jordan did the king cast them, in the clay ground between Succoth and Zeredathah. 
Thus Solomon made all these vessels in great abundance: for the weight of the brass could not be found out. 
And Solomon made all the vessels that were for the house of God, the golden altar also, and the tables whereon the shewbread was set; 
Moreover the candlesticks with their lamps, that they should burn after the manner before the oracle, of pure gold; 
And the flowers, and the lamps, and the tongs, made he of gold, and that perfect gold; 
And the snuffers, and the ba
611,ll labour there is profit: but the talk of the lips tendeth only to penury. 
The crown of the wise is their riches: but the foolishness of fools is folly. 
A true witness delivereth souls: but a deceitful witness speaketh lies. 
In the fear of the LORD is strong confidence: and his children shall have a place of refuge. 
The fear of the LORD is a fountain of life, to depart from the snares of death. 
In the multitude of people is the king's honour: but in the want of people is the destruction of the prince. 
He that is slow to wrath is of great understanding: but he that is hasty of spirit exalteth folly
572,he LORD: 
They would none of my counsel: they despised all my reproof. 
Therefore shall they eat of the fruit of their own way, and be filled with their own devices. 
For the turning away of the simple shall slay them, and the prosperity of fools shall destroy them. 
But whoso hearkeneth unto me shall dwell safely, and shall be quiet from fear of evil. 
My son, if thou wilt receive my words, and hide my commandments with thee; 
So that thou incline thine ear unto wisdom, and apply thine heart to understanding; 
Yea, if thou criest after knowledge, and liftest up thy
528, unto Pharaoh. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
When Pharaoh shall speak unto you, saying, Shew a miracle for you: then thou shalt say unto Aaron, Take thy rod, and cast it before Pharaoh, and it shall become a serpent. 
And Moses and Aaron went in unto Pharaoh, and they did so as the LORD had commanded: and Aaron cast down his rod before Pharaoh, and before his servants, and it became a serpent. 
Then Pharaoh also called the wise men and the sorcerers: now the magicians of Egypt, they also did in li
627,ll be cut off from among his people. 
And whatsoever soul it be that doeth any work in that same day, the same soul will I destroy from among his people. 
Ye shall do no manner of work: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations in all your dwellings. 
It shall be unto you a sabbath of rest, and ye shall afflict your souls: in the ninth day of the month at even, from even unto even, shall ye celebrate your sabbath. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, The fifteenth day of this seventh month shall be the feast of tabernacles for seven days unto the LORD. 
On 
641,, 
Judah, and Benjamin, and Shemaiah, and Jeremiah, 
And certain of the priests' sons with trumpets; namely, Zechariah the son of Jonathan, the son of Shemaiah, the son of Mattaniah, the son of Michaiah, the son of Zaccur, the son of Asaph: 
And his brethren, Shemaiah, and Azarael, Milalai, Gilalai, Maai, Nethaneel, and Judah, Hanani, with the musical instruments of David the man of God, and Ezra the scribe before them. 
And at the fountain gate, which was over against them, they went up by the stairs of the city of David, at the going up of the wall, above the house of David, even unto the water gate eastward. 
And the other company
572,ael said unto him, We will go by the high way: and if I and my cattle drink of thy water, then I will pay for it: I will only, without doing anything else, go through on my feet. 
And he said, Thou shalt not go through. And Edom came out against him with much people, and with a strong hand. 
Thus Edom refused to give Israel passage through his border: wherefore Israel turned away from him. 
And the children of Israel, even the whole congregation, journeyed from Kadesh, and came unto mount Hor. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and Aaron in mount Hor, by the coast of th
589,and their sin. 
Then Jeremiah called Baruch the son of Neriah: and Baruch wrote from the mouth of Jeremiah all the words of the LORD, which he had spoken unto him, upon a roll of a book. 
And Jeremiah commanded Baruch, saying, I am shut up; I cannot go into the house of the LORD: 
Therefore go thou, and read in the roll, which thou hast written from my mouth, the words of the LORD in the ears of the people in the LORD's house upon the fasting day: and also thou shalt read them in the ears of all Judah that come out of their cities. 
It may be they will present their supplication bef
614, nought: 
But we speak the wisdom of God in a mystery, even the hidden wisdom, which God ordained before the world unto our glory: 
Which none of the princes of this world knew: for had they known it, they would not have crucified the Lord of glory. 
But as it is written, Eye hath not seen, nor ear heard, neither have entered into the heart of man, the things which God hath prepared for them that love him. 
But God hath revealed them unto us by his Spirit: for the Spirit searcheth all things, yea, the deep things of God. 
For what man knoweth the things of a man, save the spirit of man which is in him? even
531,ll the men of war were consumed and dead from among the people, 
That the LORD spake unto me, saying, 
Thou art to pass over through Ar, the coast of Moab, this day: 
And when thou comest nigh over against the children of Ammon, distress them not, nor meddle with them: for I will not give thee of the land of the children of Ammon any possession; because I have given it unto the children of Lot for a possession. 
(That also was accounted a land of giants: giants dwelt therein in old time; and the Ammonites call them Zamzummims
649,shall even live in them; they polluted my sabbaths: then I said, I would pour out my fury upon them, to accomplish my anger against them in the wilderness. 
Nevertheless I withdrew mine hand, and wrought for my name's sake, that it should not be polluted in the sight of the heathen, in whose sight I brought them forth. 
I lifted up mine hand unto them also in the wilderness, that I would scatter them among the heathen, and disperse them through the countries; 
Because they had not executed my judgments, but had despised my statutes, and had polluted my sabbaths, and their eyes were after their fathers' idols. 
Wherefore I gave them also stat
493,sent yourselves in the tabernacle of the congregation, that I may give him a charge. And Moses and Joshua went, and presented themselves in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And the LORD appeared in the tabernacle in a pillar of a cloud: and the pillar of the cloud stood over the door of the tabernacle. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Behold, thou shalt sleep with thy fathers; and this people will rise up, and go a whoring after the gods of the strangers of the land, whither they go to 
650,me them! 
And the harp, and the viol, the tabret, and pipe, and wine, are in their feasts: but they regard not the work of the LORD, neither consider the operation of his hands. 
Therefore my people are gone into captivity, because they have no knowledge: and their honourable men are famished, and their multitude dried up with thirst. 
Therefore hell hath enlarged herself, and opened her mouth without measure: and their glory, and their multitude, and their pomp, and he that rejoiceth, shall descend into it. 
And the mean man shall be brought down, and the mighty man shall be humbled, and the eyes of the lofty shall be humbled: 
But the LORD 
493,ected the word of the LORD, and the LORD hath rejected thee from being king over Israel. 
And as Samuel turned about to go away, he laid hold upon the skirt of his mantle, and it rent. 
And Samuel said unto him, The LORD hath rent the kingdom of Israel from thee this day, and hath given it to a neighbour of thine, that is better than thou. 
And also the Strength of Israel will not lie nor repent: for he is not a man, that he should repent. 
Then he said, I have sinned: yet honour me now, 
565,him. 
And his brethren also went and fell down before his face; and they said, Behold, we be thy servants. 
And Joseph said unto them, Fear not: for am I in the place of God? 
But as for you, ye thought evil against me; but God meant it unto good, to bring to pass, as it is this day, to save much people alive. 
Now therefore fear ye not: I will nourish you, and your little ones. And he comforted them, and spake kindly unto them. 
And Joseph dwelt in Egypt, he, and his father's house: and Joseph lived an hundred and ten years. 
And Joseph saw Ephraim's childre
562, heaven, and before thee, 
And am no more worthy to be called thy son: make me as one of thy hired servants. 
And he arose, and came to his father. But when he was yet a great way off, his father saw him, and had compassion, and ran, and fell on his neck, and kissed him. 
And the son said unto him, Father, I have sinned against heaven, and in thy sight, and am no more worthy to be called thy son. 
But the father said to his servants, Bring forth the best robe, and put it on him; and put a ring on his hand, and shoes on his feet: 
And bring hither the fatte
655, them that went up with me from Babylon, in the reign of Artaxerxes the king. 
Of the sons of Phinehas; Gershom: of the sons of Ithamar; Daniel: of the sons of David; Hattush. 
Of the sons of Shechaniah, of the sons of Pharosh; Zechariah: and with him were reckoned by genealogy of the males an hundred and fifty. 
Of the sons of Pahathmoab; Elihoenai the son of Zerahiah, and with him two hundred males. 
Of the sons of Shechaniah; the son of Jahaziel, and with him three hundred males. 
Of the sons also of Adin; Ebed the son of Jonathan, and with him fifty males. 
And of the sons of Elam; Jeshaiah the son of Athaliah, and with him seventy males. 
And
480, but I speak concerning Christ and the church. 
Nevertheless let every one of you in particular so love his wife even as himself; and the wife see that she reverence her husband. 
Children, obey your parents in the Lord: for this is right. 
Honour thy father and mother; which is the first commandment with promise; 
That it may be well with thee, and thou mayest live long on the earth. 
And, ye fathers, provoke not your children to wrath: but bring them up in the nurture and a
510,se the LORD better than an ox or bullock that hath horns and hoofs. 
The humble shall see this, and be glad: and your heart shall live that seek God. 
For the LORD heareth the poor, and despiseth not his prisoners. 
Let the heaven and earth praise him, the seas, and every thing that moveth therein. 
For God will save Zion, and will build the cities of Judah: that they may dwell there, and have it in possession. 
The seed also of his servants shall inherit it: and they that love his name shall dwell therei
707,t seek him, that seek thy face, O Jacob. Selah. 
Lift up your heads, O ye gates; and be ye lift up, ye everlasting doors; and the King of glory shall come in. 
Who is this King of glory? The LORD strong and mighty, the LORD mighty in battle. 
Lift up your heads, O ye gates; even lift them up, ye everlasting doors; and the King of glory shall come in. 
Who is this King of glory? The LORD of hosts, he is the King of glory. Selah. 
Unto thee, O LORD, do I lift up my soul. 
O my God, I trust in thee: let me not be ashamed, let not mine enemies triumph over me. 
Yea, let none that wait on thee be ashamed: let them be ashamed which transgress without cause. 
Shew me thy ways, O LORD; teach me thy paths. 
619, daughter of Aiah took sackcloth, and spread it for her upon the rock, from the beginning of harvest until water dropped upon them out of heaven, and suffered neither the birds of the air to rest on them by day, nor the beasts of the field by night. 
And it was told David what Rizpah the daughter of Aiah, the concubine of Saul, had done. 
And David went and took the bones of Saul and the bones of Jonathan his son from the men of Jabeshgilead, which had stolen them from the street of Bethshan, where the Philistines had hanged them, when the Philistines had slain Saul in Gilboa: 
And he brought up from thence the 
578,arkness hideth not from thee; but the night shineth as the day: the darkness and the light are both alike to thee. 
For thou hast possessed my reins: thou hast covered me in my mother's womb. 
I will praise thee; for I am fearfully and wonderfully made: marvellous are thy works; and that my soul knoweth right well. 
My substance was not hid from thee, when I was made in secret, and curiously wrought in the lowest parts of the earth. 
Thine eyes did see my substance, yet being unperfect; and in thy book all my members were written, which in continuance were fashioned, when
587,d men, all that were left of all the hosts of the children of the east: for there fell an hundred and twenty thousand men that drew sword. 
And Gideon went up by the way of them that dwelt in tents on the east of Nobah and Jogbehah, and smote the host; for the host was secure. 
And when Zebah and Zalmunna fled, he pursued after them, and took the two kings of Midian, Zebah and Zalmunna, and discomfited all the host. 
And Gideon the son of Joash returned from battle before the sun was up, 
And caught a young man of the men of Succoth, and enquired of him: and he described unto him 
709,the people which the LORD thy God shall deliver thee; thine eye shall have no pity upon them: neither shalt thou serve their gods; for that will be a snare unto thee. 
If thou shalt say in thine heart, These nations are more than I; how can I dispossess them? 
Thou shalt not be afraid of them: but shalt well remember what the LORD thy God did unto Pharaoh, and unto all Egypt; 
The great temptations which thine eyes saw, and the signs, and the wonders, and the mighty hand, and the stretched out arm, whereby the LORD thy God brought thee out: so shall the LORD thy God do unto all the people of whom thou art afraid. 
Moreover the LORD thy God will send the hornet among them, until they that are left, an
570,rrection is past already; and overthrow the faith of some. 
Nevertheless the foundation of God standeth sure, having this seal, The Lord knoweth them that are his. And, let every one that nameth the name of Christ depart from iniquity. 
But in a great house there are not only vessels of gold and of silver, but also of wood and of earth; and some to honour, and some to dishonour. 
If a man therefore purge himself from these, he shall be a vessel unto honour, sanctified, and meet for the master's use, and prepared unto every good work. 
Flee also youthful lusts: but
652,. 
Then the Spirit said unto Philip, Go near, and join thyself to this chariot. 
And Philip ran thither to him, and heard him read the prophet Esaias, and said, Understandest thou what thou readest? 
And he said, How can I, except some man should guide me? And he desired Philip that he would come up and sit with him. 
The place of the scripture which he read was this, He was led as a sheep to the slaughter; and like a lamb dumb before his shearer, so opened he not his mouth: 
In his humiliation his judgment was taken away: and who shall declare his generation? for his life is taken from the earth. 
And the eunuch answered Philip, and said, I pr
618,ffering of every month throughout the months of the year. 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering unto the LORD shall be offered, beside the continual burnt offering, and his drink offering. 
And in the fourteenth day of the first month is the passover of the LORD. 
And in the fifteenth day of this month is the feast: seven days shall unleavened bread be eaten. 
In the first day shall be an holy convocation; ye shall do no manner of servile work therein: 
But ye shall offer a sacrifice made by fire for a burnt offering unto the LORD; two young bullocks, and one ram, and seven lambs of the first year: they 
591,der, were tempted, were slain with the sword: they wandered about in sheepskins and goatskins; being destitute, afflicted, tormented; 
(Of whom the world was not worthy:) they wandered in deserts, and in mountains, and in dens and caves of the earth. 
And these all, having obtained a good report through faith, received not the promise: 
God having provided some better thing for us, that they without us should not be made perfect. 
Wherefore seeing we also are compassed about with so great a cloud of witnesses, let us lay aside every weight, and the sin which doth so easily beset us, a
519,bear met him; or went into the house, and leaned his hand on the wall, and a serpent bit him. 
Shall not the day of the LORD be darkness, and not light? even very dark, and no brightness in it? 
I hate, I despise your feast days, and I will not smell in your solemn assemblies. 
Though ye offer me burnt offerings and your meat offerings, I will not accept them: neither will I regard the peace offerings of your fat beasts. 
Take thou away from me the noise of thy songs; for I will not hear the melody of thy viols. 

679,nst him. Farewell. 
Then the soldiers, as it was commanded them, took Paul, and brought him by night to Antipatris. 
On the morrow they left the horsemen to go with him, and returned to the castle: 
Who, when they came to Caesarea and delivered the epistle to the governor, presented Paul also before him. 
And when the governor had read the letter, he asked of what province he was. And when he understood that he was of Cilicia; 
I will hear thee, said he, when thine accusers are also come. And he commanded him to be kept in Herod's judgment hall. 
And after five days Ananias the high priest descended with the elders, and with a certain orator named Tertullus, who informed
666,roved mine heart; thou hast visited me in the night; thou hast tried me, and shalt find nothing; I am purposed that my mouth shall not transgress. 
Concerning the works of men, by the word of thy lips I have kept me from the paths of the destroyer. 
Hold up my goings in thy paths, that my footsteps slip not. 
I have called upon thee, for thou wilt hear me, O God: incline thine ear unto me, and hear my speech. 
Shew thy marvellous lovingkindness, O thou that savest by thy right hand them which put their trust in thee from those that rise up against them. 
Keep me as the apple of the eye, hide me under the shadow of thy wings, 
From the wicked that oppress me,
688, among you, but of the ship. 
For there stood by me this night the angel of God, whose I am, and whom I serve, 
Saying, Fear not, Paul; thou must be brought before Caesar: and, lo, God hath given thee all them that sail with thee. 
Wherefore, sirs, be of good cheer: for I believe God, that it shall be even as it was told me. 
Howbeit we must be cast upon a certain island. 
But when the fourteenth night was come, as we were driven up and down in Adria, about midnight the shipmen deemed that they drew near to some country; 
And sounded, and found it twenty fathoms: and when they had gone a little further, they sounded again, and found it fifteen fathoms. 
Then fearing lest we shoul
606,sy, grievously tormented. 
And Jesus saith unto him, I will come and heal him. 
The centurion answered and said, Lord, I am not worthy that thou shouldest come under my roof: but speak the word only, and my servant shall be healed. 
For I am a man under authority, having soldiers under me: and I say to this man, Go, and he goeth; and to another, Come, and he cometh; and to my servant, Do this, and he doeth it. 
When Jesus heard it, he marvelled, and said to them that followed, Verily I say unto you, I have not found so great faith, no, not in Israel. 
And I say unto you, That many shall come from th
628,s gathered themselves together against me, and I knew it not; they did tear me, and ceased not: 
With hypocritical mockers in feasts, they gnashed upon me with their teeth. 
Lord, how long wilt thou look on? rescue my soul from their destructions, my darling from the lions. 
I will give thee thanks in the great congregation: I will praise thee among much people. 
Let not them that are mine enemies wrongfully rejoice over me: neither let them wink with the eye that hate me without a cause. 
For they speak not peace: but they devise deceitful matters against them that are quiet in the land. 
Yea, they opened their mouth wi
496, turn you away from the LORD your God, which brought you out of the land of Egypt, and redeemed you out of the house of bondage, to thrust thee out of the way which the LORD thy God commanded thee to walk in. So shalt thou put the evil away from the midst of thee. 
If thy brother, the son of thy mother, or thy son, or thy daughter, or the wife of thy bosom, or thy friend, which is as thine own soul, entice thee secretly, saying, Let us go and serve other gods, which thou hast not known, thou
686,er he shall be a wise man or a fool? yet shall he have rule over all my labour wherein I have laboured, and wherein I have shewed myself wise under the sun. This is also vanity. 
Therefore I went about to cause my heart to despair of all the labour which I took under the sun. 
For there is a man whose labour is in wisdom, and in knowledge, and in equity; yet to a man that hath not laboured therein shall he leave it for his portion. This also is vanity and a great evil. 
For what hath man of all his labour, and of the vexation of his heart, wherein he hath laboured under the sun? 
For all his days are sorrows, and his travail grief; yea, his heart taketh not rest in the night. T
505,n thou goest with thine adversary to the magistrate, as thou art in the way, give diligence that thou mayest be delivered from him; lest he hale thee to the judge, and the judge deliver thee to the officer, and the officer cast thee into prison. 
I tell thee, thou shalt not depart thence, till thou hast paid the very last mite. 
There were present at that season some that told him of the Galilaeans, whose blood Pilate had mingled with their sacrifices. 
And Jesus answering said unto them, Suppose ye 
498,e ye have not kept your master, the LORD's anointed. And now see where the king's spear is, and the cruse of water that was at his bolster. 
And Saul knew David's voice, and said, Is this thy voice, my son David? And David said, It is my voice, my lord, O king. 
And he said, Wherefore doth my lord thus pursue after his servant? for what have I done? or what evil is in mine hand? 
Now therefore, I pray thee, let my lord the king hear the words of his servant. If the LORD have stirred thee up ag
622,let him go, until I had brought him into my mother's house, and into the chamber of her that conceived me. 
I charge you, O ye daughters of Jerusalem, by the roes, and by the hinds of the field, that ye stir not up, nor awake my love, till he please. 
Who is this that cometh out of the wilderness like pillars of smoke, perfumed with myrrh and frankincense, with all powders of the merchant? 
Behold his bed, which is Solomon's; threescore valiant men are about it, of the valiant of Israel. 
They all hold swords, being expert in war: every man hath his sword upon his thigh because of fear in the night. 
King Solomon m
484,im, saying, Seeing that by thee we enjoy great quietness, and that very worthy deeds are done unto this nation by thy providence, 
We accept it always, and in all places, most noble Felix, with all thankfulness. 
Notwithstanding, that I be not further tedious unto thee, I pray thee that thou wouldest hear us of thy clemency a few words. 
For we have found this man a pestilent fellow, and a mover of sedition among all the Jews throughout the world, and a ringleader of the sect of 
639, 
And he commanded them to make all sit down by companies upon the green grass. 
And they sat down in ranks, by hundreds, and by fifties. 
And when he had taken the five loaves and the two fishes, he looked up to heaven, and blessed, and brake the loaves, and gave them to his disciples to set before them; and the two fishes divided he among them all. 
And they did all eat, and were filled. 
And they took up twelve baskets full of the fragments, and of the fishes. 
And they that did eat of the loaves were about five thousand men. 
And straightway he constrained his disciples to get into the ship, and to go to the other side before u
587,ests and the scribes sought how they might take him by craft, and put him to death. 
But they said, Not on the feast day, lest there be an uproar of the people. 
And being in Bethany in the house of Simon the leper, as he sat at meat, there came a woman having an alabaster box of ointment of spikenard very precious; and she brake the box, and poured it on his head. 
And there were some that had indignation within themselves, and said, Why was this waste of the ointment made? 
For it might have been sold for more than three hundred pence, and have been given to the poor. And they m
586,is written in the book of the prophets, O ye house of Israel, have ye offered to me slain beasts and sacrifices by the space of forty years in the wilderness? 
Yea, ye took up the tabernacle of Moloch, and the star of your god Remphan, figures which ye made to worship them: and I will carry you away beyond Babylon. 
Our fathers had the tabernacle of witness in the wilderness, as he had appointed, speaking unto Moses, that he should make it according to the fashion that he had seen. 
Which also our fathers that came after brought in with Jesus into the possession of the Gentiles, 
604,ut to deceive the nations which are in the four quarters of the earth, Gog, and Magog, to gather them together to battle: the number of whom is as the sand of the sea. 
And they went up on the breadth of the earth, and compassed the camp of the saints about, and the beloved city: and fire came down from God out of heaven, and devoured them. 
And the devil that deceived them was cast into the lake of fire and brimstone, where the beast and the false prophet are, and shall be tormented day and night for ever and ever. 
And I saw a great white throne, and him that sat on it, from whose face the earth
695,not be told nor numbered for multitude. 
And the priests brought in the ark of the covenant of the LORD unto his place, to the oracle of the house, into the most holy place, even under the wings of the cherubims: 
For the cherubims spread forth their wings over the place of the ark, and the cherubims covered the ark and the staves thereof above. 
And they drew out the staves of the ark, that the ends of the staves were seen from the ark before the oracle; but they were not seen without. And there it is unto this day. 
There was nothing in the ark save the two tables which Moses put therein at Horeb, when the LORD made a covenant with the children of Israel, when they came out of Egypt. 
608,t that offereth any man's burnt offering, even the priest shall have to himself the skin of the burnt offering which he hath offered. 
And all the meat offering that is baken in the oven, and all that is dressed in the fryingpan, and in the pan, shall be the priest's that offereth it. 
And every meat offering, mingled with oil, and dry, shall all the sons of Aaron have, one as much as another. 
And this is the law of the sacrifice of peace offerings, which he shall offer unto the LORD. 
If he offer it for a thanksgiving, then he shall offer with the sacrifice of thanksgiving unleavened cakes mingled w
717,hen said Absalom, If not, I pray thee, let my brother Amnon go with us. And the king said unto him, Why should he go with thee? 
But Absalom pressed him, that he let Amnon and all the king's sons go with him. 
Now Absalom had commanded his servants, saying, Mark ye now when Amnon's heart is merry with wine, and when I say unto you, Smite Amnon; then kill him, fear not: have not I commanded you? be courageous, and be valiant. 
And the servants of Absalom did unto Amnon as Absalom had commanded. Then all the king's sons arose, and every man gat him up upon his mule, and fled. 
And it came to pass, while they were in the way, that tidings came to David, saying, Absalom hath slain all the king's sons, and there 
633, also bases, and lavers made he upon the bases; 
One sea, and twelve oxen under it. 
The pots also, and the shovels, and the fleshhooks, and all their instruments, did Huram his father make to king Solomon for the house of the LORD of bright brass. 
In the plain of Jordan did the king cast them, in the clay ground between Succoth and Zeredathah. 
Thus Solomon made all these vessels in great abundance: for the weight of the brass could not be found out. 
And Solomon made all the vessels that were for the house of God, the golden altar also, and the tables whereon the shewbread was set; 
Moreover the candlesticks with their lam
655,d by following them, after that they be destroyed from before thee; and that thou enquire not after their gods, saying, How did these nations serve their gods? even so will I do likewise. 
Thou shalt not do so unto the LORD thy God: for every abomination to the LORD, which he hateth, have they done unto their gods; for even their sons and their daughters they have burnt in the fire to their gods. 
What thing soever I command you, observe to do it: thou shalt not add thereto, nor diminish from it. 
If there arise among you a prophet, or a dreamer of dreams, and giveth thee a sign or a wonder, 
And the sign or the wonder come to pass, whereof he spa
631, the cities of the nations fell: and great Babylon came in remembrance before God, to give unto her the cup of the wine of the fierceness of his wrath. 
And every island fled away, and the mountains were not found. 
And there fell upon men a great hail out of heaven, every stone about the weight of a talent: and men blasphemed God because of the plague of the hail; for the plague thereof was exceeding great. 
And there came one of the seven angels which had the seven vials, and talked with me, saying unto me, Come hither; I will shew unto thee the judgment of the great whore that sitteth upon many waters: 
With whom the kin
531, the poor in his affliction, and openeth their ears in oppression. 
Even so would he have removed thee out of the strait into a broad place, where there is no straitness; and that which should be set on thy table should be full of fatness. 
But thou hast fulfilled the judgment of the wicked: judgment and justice take hold on thee. 
Because there is wrath, beware lest he take thee away with his stroke: then a great ransom cannot deliver thee. 
Will he esteem thy riches? no, not gold, nor all the forces of strength. 
Desire not
571,nsidered it well: I looked upon it, and received instruction. 
Yet a little sleep, a little slumber, a little folding of the hands to sleep: 
So shall thy poverty come as one that travelleth; and thy want as an armed man. 
These are also proverbs of Solomon, which the men of Hezekiah king of Judah copied out. 
It is the glory of God to conceal a thing: but the honour of kings is to search out a matter. 
The heaven for height, and the earth for depth, and the heart of kings is unsearchable. 
Take away the dross from the silver, and there shall come forth a vessel fo
644,e air. 
There are, it may be, so many kinds of voices in the world, and none of them is without signification. 
Therefore if I know not the meaning of the voice, I shall be unto him that speaketh a barbarian, and he that speaketh shall be a barbarian unto me. 
Even so ye, forasmuch as ye are zealous of spiritual gifts, seek that ye may excel to the edifying of the church. 
Wherefore let him that speaketh in an unknown tongue pray that he may interpret. 
For if I pray in an unknown tongue, my spirit prayeth, but my understanding is unfruitful. 
What is it then? I will pray with the spirit, and I will pray with the understanding also: I w
674,ua discomfited Amalek and his people with the edge of the sword. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Write this for a memorial in a book, and rehearse it in the ears of Joshua: for I will utterly put out the remembrance of Amalek from under heaven. 
And Moses built an altar, and called the name of it Jehovahnissi: 
For he said, Because the LORD hath sworn that the LORD will have war with Amalek from generation to generation. 
When Jethro, the priest of Midian, Moses' father in law, heard of all that God had done for Moses, and for Israel his people, and that the LORD had brought Israel out of Egypt; 
Then Jethro, Moses' father in law, took Zipporah, Moses' wife, after he
708,and Absalom pitched in the land of Gilead. 
And it came to pass, when David was come to Mahanaim, that Shobi the son of Nahash of Rabbah of the children of Ammon, and Machir the son of Ammiel of Lodebar, and Barzillai the Gileadite of Rogelim, 
Brought beds, and basons, and earthen vessels, and wheat, and barley, and flour, and parched corn, and beans, and lentiles, and parched pulse, 
And honey, and butter, and sheep, and cheese of kine, for David, and for the people that were with him, to eat: for they said, The people is hungry, and weary, and thirsty, in the wilderness. 
And David numbered the people that were with him, and set captains of thousands, and captains of hundreds over them. 
And Davi
521,iend? 
And Hushai said unto Absalom, Nay; but whom the LORD, and this people, and all the men of Israel, choose, his will I be, and with him will I abide. 
And again, whom should I serve? should I not serve in the presence of his son? as I have served in thy father's presence, so will I be in thy presence. 
Then said Absalom to Ahithophel, Give counsel among you what we shall do. 
And Ahithophel said unto Absalom, Go in unto thy father's concubines, which he hath left to keep the house; and all Israel shall hear tha
600,time which he had diligently enquired of the wise men. 
Then was fulfilled that which was spoken by Jeremy the prophet, saying, 
In Rama was there a voice heard, lamentation, and weeping, and great mourning, Rachel weeping for her children, and would not be comforted, because they are not. 
But when Herod was dead, behold, an angel of the Lord appeareth in a dream to Joseph in Egypt, 
Saying, Arise, and take the young child and his mother, and go into the land of Israel: for they are dead which sought the young child's life. 
And he arose, and took the young child and his mother, and came into
555,o Pharaoh king of Egypt, to bring the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt. 
These be the heads of their fathers' houses: The sons of Reuben the firstborn of Israel; Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi: these be the families of Reuben. 
And the sons of Simeon; Jemuel, and Jamin, and Ohad, and Jachin, and Zohar, and Shaul the son of a Canaanitish woman: these are the families of Simeon. 
And these are the names of the sons of Levi according to their generations; Gershon, and Kohath, and Merari: and the years of the life of Levi were an hundre
591,he dry land springs of water. 
I will plant in the wilderness the cedar, the shittah tree, and the myrtle, and the oil tree; I will set in the desert the fir tree, and the pine, and the box tree together: 
That they may see, and know, and consider, and understand together, that the hand of the LORD hath done this, and the Holy One of Israel hath created it. 
Produce your cause, saith the LORD; bring forth your strong reasons, saith the King of Jacob. 
Let them bring them forth, and shew us what shall happen: let them shew the former things, what they be, that we may consider them, and
483,ir bow for lies: but they are not valiant for the truth upon the earth; for they proceed from evil to evil, and they know not me, saith the LORD. 
Take ye heed every one of his neighbour, and trust ye not in any brother: for every brother will utterly supplant, and every neighbour will walk with slanders. 
And they will deceive every one his neighbour, and will not speak the truth: they have taught their tongue to speak lies, and weary themselves to commit iniquity. 
Thine habit
634,me, and God is departed from me, and answereth me no more, neither by prophets, nor by dreams: therefore I have called thee, that thou mayest make known unto me what I shall do. 
Then said Samuel, Wherefore then dost thou ask of me, seeing the LORD is departed from thee, and is become thine enemy? 
And the LORD hath done to him, as he spake by me: for the LORD hath rent the kingdom out of thine hand, and given it to thy neighbour, even to David: 
Because thou obeyedst not the voice of the LORD, nor executedst his fierce wrath upon Amalek, therefore hath the LORD done this thing unto thee this day. 
Moreover the LORD will also 
710,nd shalt lift up thy face unto God. 
Thou shalt make thy prayer unto him, and he shall hear thee, and thou shalt pay thy vows. 
Thou shalt also decree a thing, and it shall be established unto thee: and the light shall shine upon thy ways. 
When men are cast down, then thou shalt say, There is lifting up; and he shall save the humble person. 
He shall deliver the island of the innocent: and it is delivered by the pureness of thine hands. 
Then Job answered and said, 
Even to day is my complaint bitter: my stroke is heavier than my groaning. 
Oh that I knew where I might find him! that I might come even to his seat! 
I would order my cause before him, and fill my mouth with arguments. 
I would know the
578,d Hamor, and Shechem Hamor's son. 
And the young man deferred not to do the thing, because he had delight in Jacob's daughter: and he was more honourable than all the house of his father. 
And Hamor and Shechem his son came unto the gate of their city, and communed with the men of their city, saying, 
These men are peaceable with us; therefore let them dwell in the land, and trade therein; for the land, behold, it is large enough for them; let us take their daughters to us for wives, and let us give them our daughters. 
Only herein will the men consent unto us for to dwel
497,ray at the entering in of the gate: and the Syrians of Zoba, and of Rehob, and Ishtob, and Maacah, were by themselves in the field. 
When Joab saw that the front of the battle was against him before and behind, he chose of all the choice men of Israel, and put them in array against the Syrians: 
And the rest of the people he delivered into the hand of Abishai his brother, that he might put them in array against the children of Ammon. 
And he said, If the Syrians be too strong for me, then tho
540,and he offered upon the altar, and burnt incense. 
And, behold, there came a man of God out of Judah by the word of the LORD unto Bethel: and Jeroboam stood by the altar to burn incense. 
And he cried against the altar in the word of the LORD, and said, O altar, altar, thus saith the LORD; Behold, a child shall be born unto the house of David, Josiah by name; and upon thee shall he offer the priests of the high places that burn incense upon thee, and men's bones shall be burnt upon thee. 
And he gave a sign the same day, saying, This 
576,the children of Israel and the children of Ammon. 
Howbeit the king of the children of Ammon hearkened not unto the words of Jephthah which he sent him. 
Then the Spirit of the LORD came upon Jephthah, and he passed over Gilead, and Manasseh, and passed over Mizpeh of Gilead, and from Mizpeh of Gilead he passed over unto the children of Ammon. 
And Jephthah vowed a vow unto the LORD, and said, If thou shalt without fail deliver the children of Ammon into mine hands, 
Then it shall be, that whatsoever cometh forth of the doors of my house to meet me, when I return in pea
636, thy soul. 
When thou art in tribulation, and all these things are come upon thee, even in the latter days, if thou turn to the LORD thy God, and shalt be obedient unto his voice; 
(For the LORD thy God is a merciful God;) he will not forsake thee, neither destroy thee, nor forget the covenant of thy fathers which he sware unto them. 
For ask now of the days that are past, which were before thee, since the day that God created man upon the earth, and ask from the one side of heaven unto the other, whether there hath been any such thing as this great thing is, or hath been heard like it? 
Did ever people hear the voice of God spe
654,ireling, his day. 
For there is hope of a tree, if it be cut down, that it will sprout again, and that the tender branch thereof will not cease. 
Though the root thereof wax old in the earth, and the stock thereof die in the ground; 
Yet through the scent of water it will bud, and bring forth boughs like a plant. 
But man dieth, and wasteth away: yea, man giveth up the ghost, and where is he? 
As the waters fail from the sea, and the flood decayeth and drieth up: 
So man lieth down, and riseth not: till the heavens be no more, they shall not awake, nor be raised out of their sleep. 
O that thou wouldest hide me in the grave, that thou wouldest ke
520,that stood about him, Hear now, ye Benjamites; will the son of Jesse give every one of you fields and vineyards, and make you all captains of thousands, and captains of hundreds; 
That all of you have conspired against me, and there is none that sheweth me that my son hath made a league with the son of Jesse, and there is none of you that is sorry for me, or sheweth unto me that my son hath stirred up my servant against me, to lie in wait, as at this day? 
Then answered Doeg the Edomite, which was set over the serv
496,lf. 
And when we had launched from thence, we sailed under Cyprus, because the winds were contrary. 
And when we had sailed over the sea of Cilicia and Pamphylia, we came to Myra, a city of Lycia. 
And there the centurion found a ship of Alexandria sailing into Italy; and he put us therein. 
And when we had sailed slowly many days, and scarce were come over against Cnidus, the wind not suffering us, we sailed under Crete, over against Salmone; 
And, hardly passing it, came unto a place which
550, to pass. 
And he shall bring forth thy righteousness as the light, and thy judgment as the noonday. 
Rest in the LORD, and wait patiently for him: fret not thyself because of him who prospereth in his way, because of the man who bringeth wicked devices to pass. 
Cease from anger, and forsake wrath: fret not thyself in any wise to do evil. 
For evildoers shall be cut off: but those that wait upon the LORD, they shall inherit the earth. 
For yet a little while, and the wicked shall not be: yea, thou shalt diligently consider his place, and it sh
639,estled with my sister, and I have prevailed: and she called his name Naphtali. 
When Leah saw that she had left bearing, she took Zilpah her maid, and gave her Jacob to wife. 
And Zilpah Leah's maid bare Jacob a son. 
And Leah said, A troop cometh: and she called his name Gad. 
And Zilpah Leah's maid bare Jacob a second son. 
And Leah said, Happy am I, for the daughters will call me blessed: and she called his name Asher. 
And Reuben went in the days of wheat harvest, and found mandrakes in the field, and brought them unto his mother Leah. Then Rachel said to Leah, Give me, I pray thee, of thy son's mandrakes. 
And she said unto he
670,d: and unto him hath he given all that he hath. 
And my master made me swear, saying, Thou shalt not take a wife to my son of the daughters of the Canaanites, in whose land I dwell: 
But thou shalt go unto my father's house, and to my kindred, and take a wife unto my son. 
And I said unto my master, Peradventure the woman will not follow me. 
And he said unto me, The LORD, before whom I walk, will send his angel with thee, and prosper thy way; and thou shalt take a wife for my son of my kindred, and of my father's house: 
Then shalt thou be clear from this my oath, when thou comest to my kindred; and if they give not thee one, thou shalt be clear from my oath. 

528,to Joppa. 
On the morrow, as they went on their journey, and drew nigh unto the city, Peter went up upon the housetop to pray about the sixth hour: 
And he became very hungry, and would have eaten: but while they made ready, he fell into a trance, 
And saw heaven opened, and a certain vessel descending upon him, as it had been a great sheet knit at the four corners, and let down to the earth: 
Wherein were all manner of fourfooted beasts of the earth, and wild beasts, and creeping things, and fowls of the air. 
And there c
545, 
For in those days shall be affliction, such as was not from the beginning of the creation which God created unto this time, neither shall be. 
And except that the Lord had shortened those days, no flesh should be saved: but for the elect's sake, whom he hath chosen, he hath shortened the days. 
And then if any man shall say to you, Lo, here is Christ; or, lo, he is there; believe him not: 
For false Christs and false prophets shall rise, and shall shew signs and wonders, to seduce, if it were possible, even the elect. 
But take ye heed: 
497,scended into the heavens: but he saith himself, The Lord said unto my Lord, Sit thou on my right hand, 
Until I make thy foes thy footstool. 
Therefore let all the house of Israel know assuredly, that God hath made the same Jesus, whom ye have crucified, both Lord and Christ. 
Now when they heard this, they were pricked in their heart, and said unto Peter and to the rest of the apostles, Men and brethren, what shall we do? 
Then Peter said unto them, Repent, and be baptized every one of you i
648,el hearkened unto him, and did as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And there arose not a prophet since in Israel like unto Moses, whom the LORD knew face to face, 
In all the signs and the wonders, which the LORD sent him to do in the land of Egypt to Pharaoh, and to all his servants, and to all his land, 
And in all that mighty hand, and in all the great terror which Moses shewed in the sight of all Israel. 
Now after the death of Moses the servant of the LORD it came to pass, that the LORD spake unto Joshua the son of Nun, Moses' minister, saying, 
Moses my servant is dead; now therefore arise, go over this Jordan, thou, and all this people, un
594,oungest son Segub, according to the word of the LORD, which he spake by Joshua the son of Nun. 
And Elijah the Tishbite, who was of the inhabitants of Gilead, said unto Ahab, As the LORD God of Israel liveth, before whom I stand, there shall not be dew nor rain these years, but according to my word. 
And the word of the LORD came unto him, saying, 
Get thee hence, and turn thee eastward, and hide thyself by the brook Cherith, that is before Jordan. 
And it shall be, that thou shalt drink of the brook; and I have commanded the ravens to feed thee there. 
So he went and did according unto 
615,th spoken in his holiness; I will rejoice, I will divide Shechem, and mete out the valley of Succoth. 
Gilead is mine, and Manasseh is mine; Ephraim also is the strength of mine head; Judah is my lawgiver; 
Moab is my washpot; over Edom will I cast out my shoe: Philistia, triumph thou because of me. 
Who will bring me into the strong city? who will lead me into Edom? 
Wilt not thou, O God, which hadst cast us off? and thou, O God, which didst not go out with our armies? 
Give us help from trouble: for vain is the help of man. 
Through God we shall do valiantly: for he it is that shall tread down our enemies.
651,RD. 
Regard not them that have familiar spirits, neither seek after wizards, to be defiled by them: I am the LORD your God. 
Thou shalt rise up before the hoary head, and honour the face of the old man, and fear thy God: I am the LORD. 
And if a stranger sojourn with thee in your land, ye shall not vex him. 
But the stranger that dwelleth with you shall be unto you as one born among you, and thou shalt love him as thyself; for ye were strangers in the land of Egypt: I am the LORD your God. 
Ye shall do no unrighteousness in judgment, in meteyard, in weight, or in measure. 
Just balances, just weights, a just ephah, and a just hin, shall ye hav
651,; Execute ye judgment and righteousness, and deliver the spoiled out of the hand of the oppressor: and do no wrong, do no violence to the stranger, the fatherless, nor the widow, neither shed innocent blood in this place. 
For if ye do this thing indeed, then shall there enter in by the gates of this house kings sitting upon the throne of David, riding in chariots and on horses, he, and his servants, and his people. 
But if ye will not hear these words, I swear by myself, saith the LORD, that this house shall become a desolation. 
For thus saith the LORD unto the king's house of Judah; Thou art Gilead unto me, and the head of Lebanon: yet sure
659,the mourning was past, David sent and fetched her to his house, and she became his wife, and bare him a son. But the thing that David had done displeased the LORD. 
And the LORD sent Nathan unto David. And he came unto him, and said unto him, There were two men in one city; the one rich, and the other poor. 
The rich man had exceeding many flocks and herds: 
But the poor man had nothing, save one little ewe lamb, which he had bought and nourished up: and it grew up together with him, and with his children; it did eat of his own meat, and drank of his own cup, and lay in his bosom, and was unto him as a daughter. 
And there came a traveller unto the ri
679,ldest not thou watch one hour? 
Watch ye and pray, lest ye enter into temptation. The spirit truly is ready, but the flesh is weak. 
And again he went away, and prayed, and spake the same words. 
And when he returned, he found them asleep again, (for their eyes were heavy,) neither wist they what to answer him. 
And he cometh the third time, and saith unto them, Sleep on now, and take your rest: it is enough, the hour is come; behold, the Son of man is betrayed into the hands of sinners. 
Rise up, let us go; lo, he that betrayeth me is at hand. 
And immediately, while he yet spake, cometh Judas, one of the twelve, and with him a great multitude with swords and staves, fr
630,he right ways of the Lord? 
And now, behold, the hand of the Lord is upon thee, and thou shalt be blind, not seeing the sun for a season. And immediately there fell on him a mist and a darkness; and he went about seeking some to lead him by the hand. 
Then the deputy, when he saw what was done, believed, being astonished at the doctrine of the Lord. 
Now when Paul and his company loosed from Paphos, they came to Perga in Pamphylia: and John departing from them returned to Jerusalem. 
But when they departed from Perga, they came to Antioch in Pisidia, and went into the synagogue on the sabbath day, and sat down. 
And after 
592, Wherefore passedst thou over to fight against the children of Ammon, and didst not call us to go with thee? we will burn thine house upon thee with fire. 
And Jephthah said unto them, I and my people were at great strife with the children of Ammon; and when I called you, ye delivered me not out of their hands. 
And when I saw that ye delivered me not, I put my life in my hands, and passed over against the children of Ammon, and the LORD delivered them into my hand: wherefore then are ye come up unto me this day, to fight against me? 
Then Jephthah gathered together all the men of Gile
492,, and enlarge my coast, and that thine hand might be with me, and that thou wouldest keep me from evil, that it may not grieve me! And God granted him that which he requested. 
And Chelub the brother of Shuah begat Mehir, which was the father of Eshton. 
And Eshton begat Bethrapha, and Paseah, and Tehinnah the father of Irnahash. These are the men of Rechah. 
And the sons of Kenaz; Othniel, and Seraiah: and the sons of Othniel; Hathath. 
And Meonothai begat Ophrah: and Seraiah begat Joab
688,ins and rulers, all of them desirable young men, horsemen riding upon horses. 
Thus she committed her whoredoms with them, with all them that were the chosen men of Assyria, and with all on whom she doted: with all their idols she defiled herself. 
Neither left she her whoredoms brought from Egypt: for in her youth they lay with her, and they bruised the breasts of her virginity, and poured their whoredom upon her. 
Wherefore I have delivered her into the hand of her lovers, into the hand of the Assyrians, upon whom she doted. 
These discovered her nakedness: they took her sons and her daughters, and slew her with the sword: and she became famous among women; for they had execute
612,self likewise took part of the same; that through death he might destroy him that had the power of death, that is, the devil; 
And deliver them who through fear of death were all their lifetime subject to bondage. 
For verily he took not on him the nature of angels; but he took on him the seed of Abraham. 
Wherefore in all things it behoved him to be made like unto his brethren, that he might be a merciful and faithful high priest in things pertaining to God, to make reconciliation for the sins of the people. 
For in that he himself hath suffered being tempted, he is able to succour them that are tempted.
645,rong drink, and shall drink no vinegar of wine, or vinegar of strong drink, neither shall he drink any liquor of grapes, nor eat moist grapes, or dried. 
All the days of his separation shall he eat nothing that is made of the vine tree, from the kernels even to the husk. 
All the days of the vow of his separation there shall no razor come upon his head: until the days be fulfilled, in the which he separateth himself unto the LORD, he shall be holy, and shall let the locks of the hair of his head grow. 
All the days that he separateth himself unto the LORD he shall come at no dead body. 
He shall not make himself unclean for his father, o
570, eat, that thou mayest have strength, when thou goest on thy way. 
But he refused, and said, I will not eat. But his servants, together with the woman, compelled him; and he hearkened unto their voice. So he arose from the earth, and sat upon the bed. 
And the woman had a fat calf in the house; and she hasted, and killed it, and took flour, and kneaded it, and did bake unleavened bread thereof: 
And she brought it before Saul, and before his servants; and they did eat. Then they rose up, and went away that night. 
Now the Philistines gathered together all their ar
696,ptians among the nations, and will disperse them through the countries. 
And I will strengthen the arms of the king of Babylon, and put my sword in his hand: but I will break Pharaoh's arms, and he shall groan before him with the groanings of a deadly wounded man. 
But I will strengthen the arms of the king of Babylon, and the arms of Pharaoh shall fall down; and they shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall put my sword into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall stretch it out upon the land of Egypt. 
And I will scatter the Egyptians among the nations, and disperse them among the countries; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
And it came to pass in the eleventh year, in 
673,ass, the iron for things of iron, and wood for things of wood; onyx stones, and stones to be set, glistering stones, and of divers colours, and all manner of precious stones, and marble stones in abundance. 
Moreover, because I have set my affection to the house of my God, I have of mine own proper good, of gold and silver, which I have given to the house of my God, over and above all that I have prepared for the holy house. 
Even three thousand talents of gold, of the gold of Ophir, and seven thousand talents of refined silver, to overlay the walls of the houses withal: 
The gold for things of gold, and the silver for things of silver, and for all manner of work t
707,e his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
There were therefore seven brethren: and the first took a wife, and died without children. 
And the second took her to wife, and he died childless. 
And the third took her; and in like manner the seven also: and they left no children, and died. 
Last of all the woman died also. 
Therefore in the resurrection whose wife of them is she? for seven had her to wife. 
And Jesus answering said unto them, The children of this world marry, and are given in marriage: 
But they which shall be accounted worthy to obtain that world, and the resurrection from the dead, neither marry, nor are given in marriage: 
Neither can they die any more: for they are equal unt
649,d, and the children crying in the temple, and saying, Hosanna to the son of David; they were sore displeased, 
And said unto him, Hearest thou what these say? And Jesus saith unto them, Yea; have ye never read, Out of the mouth of babes and sucklings thou hast perfected praise? 
And he left them, and went out of the city into Bethany; and he lodged there. 
Now in the morning as he returned into the city, he hungered. 
And when he saw a fig tree in the way, he came to it, and found nothing thereon, but leaves only, and said unto it, Let no fruit grow on thee henceforward for ever. And presently the fig tree withered away. 
And when the discip
549,onsumed. 
She hath wearied herself with lies, and her great scum went not forth out of her: her scum shall be in the fire. 
In thy filthiness is lewdness: because I have purged thee, and thou wast not purged, thou shalt not be purged from thy filthiness any more, till I have caused my fury to rest upon thee. 
I the LORD have spoken it: it shall come to pass, and I will do it; I will not go back, neither will I spare, neither will I repent; according to thy ways, and according to thy doings, shall they judge thee, saith the Lord GOD. 
Also the 
669,ribe of thy father, bring thou with thee, that they may be joined unto thee, and minister unto thee: but thou and thy sons with thee shall minister before the tabernacle of witness. 
And they shall keep thy charge, and the charge of all the tabernacle: only they shall not come nigh the vessels of the sanctuary and the altar, that neither they, nor ye also, die. 
And they shall be joined unto thee, and keep the charge of the tabernacle of the congregation, for all the service of the tabernacle: and a stranger shall not come nigh unto you. 
And ye shall keep the charge of the sanctuary, and the charge of the altar: that there be no wrath any more upon the childre
591,loved. 
Salute Apelles approved in Christ. Salute them which are of Aristobulus' household. 
Salute Herodion my kinsman. Greet them that be of the household of Narcissus, which are in the Lord. 
Salute Tryphena and Tryphosa, who labour in the Lord. Salute the beloved Persis, which laboured much in the Lord. 
Salute Rufus chosen in the Lord, and his mother and mine. 
Salute Asyncritus, Phlegon, Hermas, Patrobas, Hermes, and the brethren which are with them. 
Salute Philologus, and Julia, Nereus, and his sister, and Olympas, and all the saints which are with them. 
Salute one another wi
550, six hundred twenty and eight. 
The children of Azgad, two thousand three hundred twenty and two. 
The children of Adonikam, six hundred threescore and seven. 
The children of Bigvai, two thousand threescore and seven. 
The children of Adin, six hundred fifty and five. 
The children of Ater of Hezekiah, ninety and eight. 
The children of Hashum, three hundred twenty and eight. 
The children of Bezai, three hundred twenty and four. 
The children of Hariph, an hundred and twelve. 
The children of Gibeon, ninety and five. 
The men of Bethlehem and
720,ing himself. 
And they drew nigh unto the village, whither they went: and he made as though he would have gone further. 
But they constrained him, saying, Abide with us: for it is toward evening, and the day is far spent. And he went in to tarry with them. 
And it came to pass, as he sat at meat with them, he took bread, and blessed it, and brake, and gave to them. 
And their eyes were opened, and they knew him; and he vanished out of their sight. 
And they said one to another, Did not our heart burn within us, while he talked with us by the way, and while he opened to us the scriptures? 
And they rose up the same hour, and returned to Jerusalem, and found the eleven gathered together, and them that were with t
662,e Midianites, as the LORD commanded Moses; and they slew all the males. 
And they slew the kings of Midian, beside the rest of them that were slain; namely, Evi, and Rekem, and Zur, and Hur, and Reba, five kings of Midian: Balaam also the son of Beor they slew with the sword. 
And the children of Israel took all the women of Midian captives, and their little ones, and took the spoil of all their cattle, and all their flocks, and all their goods. 
And they burnt all their cities wherein they dwelt, and all their goodly castles, with fire. 
And they took all the spoil, and all the prey, both of men and of beasts. 
And they brought the captives, and the pre
610, arose, and followed him, and so did his disciples. 
And, behold, a woman, which was diseased with an issue of blood twelve years, came behind him, and touched the hem of his garment: 
For she said within herself, If I may but touch his garment, I shall be whole. 
But Jesus turned him about, and when he saw her, he said, Daughter, be of good comfort; thy faith hath made thee whole. And the woman was made whole from that hour. 
And when Jesus came into the ruler's house, and saw the minstrels and the people making a noise, 
He said unto them, Give place: for the maid is not dead, but sleepeth. And they l
645, of the first year for a sin offering. 
And the priest shall make an atonement for the soul that sinneth ignorantly, when he sinneth by ignorance before the LORD, to make an atonement for him; and it shall be forgiven him. 
Ye shall have one law for him that sinneth through ignorance, both for him that is born among the children of Israel, and for the stranger that sojourneth among them. 
But the soul that doeth ought presumptuously, whether he be born in the land, or a stranger, the same reproacheth the LORD; and that soul shall be cut off from among his people. 
Because he hath despised the word of the LORD, and hath broken his command
604, looketh southward: 
And it went out to the south side to Maalehacrabbim, and passed along to Zin, and ascended up on the south side unto Kadeshbarnea, and passed along to Hezron, and went up to Adar, and fetched a compass to Karkaa: 
From thence it passed toward Azmon, and went out unto the river of Egypt; and the goings out of that coast were at the sea: this shall be your south coast. 
And the east border was the salt sea, even unto the end of Jordan. And their border in the north quarter was from the bay of the sea at the uttermost part of Jordan: 
And the border went up to Bethhogla, and pass
607, men: grace is poured into thy lips: therefore God hath blessed thee for ever. 
Gird thy sword upon thy thigh, O most mighty, with thy glory and thy majesty. 
And in thy majesty ride prosperously because of truth and meekness and righteousness; and thy right hand shall teach thee terrible things. 
Thine arrows are sharp in the heart of the king's enemies; whereby the people fall under thee. 
Thy throne, O God, is for ever and ever: the sceptre of thy kingdom is a right sceptre. 
Thou lovest righteousness, and hatest wickedness: therefore God, thy God, hath anointed thee with the oil of gladness above
588,
For they prophesy falsely unto you in my name: I have not sent them, saith the LORD. 
For thus saith the LORD, That after seventy years be accomplished at Babylon I will visit you, and perform my good word toward you, in causing you to return to this place. 
For I know the thoughts that I think toward you, saith the LORD, thoughts of peace, and not of evil, to give you an expected end. 
Then shall ye call upon me, and ye shall go and pray unto me, and I will hearken unto you. 
And ye shall seek me, and find me, when ye shall search for me with all your heart. 
And I will be found 
502,ng of the Ammonites, and to the king of Tyrus, and to the king of Zidon, by the hand of the messengers which come to Jerusalem unto Zedekiah king of Judah; 
And command them to say unto their masters, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Thus shall ye say unto your masters; 
I have made the earth, the man and the beast that are upon the ground, by my great power and by my outstretched arm, and have given it unto whom it seemed meet unto me. 
And now have I given all these lands into th
676, know not, neither ye nor your fathers; and there shall ye serve other gods day and night; where I will not shew you favour. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that it shall no more be said, The LORD liveth, that brought up the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt; 
But, The LORD liveth, that brought up the children of Israel from the land of the north, and from all the lands whither he had driven them: and I will bring them again into their land that I gave unto their fathers. 
Behold, I will send for many fishers, saith the LORD, and they shall fish them; and after will I send for many hunters, and they shall hunt them from every mountain, and
